THAN the title suggests.  Whoops.
Thank you, willis3000.  This seems to be bunk:  self-discipline doesn't standard-deviation out well.  How do you measure it?   It, unlike IQ, is highly subjective, and non-controversial.   Perhaps more importantly, a two year study of eighth graders is just crap.   If they check back in in twenty years or so, this would perhaps have a shred of validity, but not a heck of a lot happens with eighth graders.  They tend not to start companies, write code or even novels, for whatever reason.    I agree fundamentally that self-discipline is important, but even the most disciplined person cannot teach themselves eg, Lisp, if they lack the cerebral capacity.
This was the first Paul Graham article I read that brought me to the realisation that, like many bright people, Paul does not realise the boundary where the intelligence of his insights cease. Not terrible.  But it really did bring me to the opinion that Paul is oblivious about (at least some of) his own limitations.
&gt; "We're good at making movies" *lol* Good at marketing them perhaps!  Can people really not tell the difference between the two anymore? Of course... when one has next to no access to alternatives, it is hard I suppose.
He's not willing to spend a 'few hundred bucks' [($199)](http://quickbooks.intuit.com/commerce/catalog/product.jhtml?prodId=prod0000000000007994337), but he's willing to spend [$189](http://www.vmware.com/request_processor?nextPage=/vmwarestore/newstore/category.jsp&amp;action=CATALOG.GETGROUPS&amp;application=store&amp;ProductGroupCodes=EXT-STORE-WKST-WIN,EXT-STORE-WKST-LX) for VMWare? It really sounds like he's making up excuses. If he'd rather use Ubuntu, Gnucash and VMWare than Windows and Quickbooks, he should just say so.
I have to say, I'm curious about the mod-downs. Is this a dupe? Boring? Reddit users don't like microformats?
"We're good at making movies and software" We are? Since when? In recent history Hollywood is routinely viewd as pumping out mostly utter crap.  Same with much of the shrinkwrap software industry, esp game industry.  Buggy, poor design, non-innovative. Small things make good things, large things don't.  Hollywood is big == craptacular movies. Independents are small make good software.  Same with game industry.  smaller software companies make innovative, not as shitty software as giant corporations.  The larger the organization the larger the propensity of systematic design.
Your mum. My mum. Everyone's mum(TM)
They were also asked about this during their earnings call, and the same message was repeated -- that they have no plans to do an OS.
It's made clear that it's not in the nature of pitbulls to attack? Here's a direct quote from the article:  "Most dogs fight as a last resort, when staring and growling fail. A pit bull is willing to fight with little or no provocation." I'm not disputing the fact that most bad pit bulls have bad owners. But I'd much rather a bad owner raise a breed that doesn't "try to inflict the maximum amount of damage on an opponent". I think the author's comparison to profiling is fitting. If profiling can help prevent the next 9/11, it's unthinkable to *not* use it as a preventitive tool. Likewise, if a town ordinance against pit bulls can help prevent my son from getting his face ripped off, I'm all for it. 
"But it really did bring me to the opinion that Paul is oblivious about...his own limitations." You've managed to set a table that all bashers of Paul G can admire without putting any legs under it.  Maybe your wisdom is obvious to the other "Aren't we so smart" folks in your club, but would you care to actually make an arguable statement?
The same article had the following quote: "Carl Herkstroeter, the president of the A.T.T.S., says. 'I’ve tested half of them. And of the number I’ve tested I have disqualified one pit bull because of aggressive tendencies. They have done extremely well. They have a good temperament. They are very good with children.' It can even be argued that the same traits that make the pit bull so aggressive toward other dogs are what make it so nice to humans. “There are a lot of pit bulls these days who are licensed therapy dogs,' the writer Vicki Hearne points out. 'Their stability and resoluteness make them excellent for work with people who might not like a more bouncy, flibbertigibbet sort of dog. When pit bulls set out to provide comfort, they are as resolute as they are when they fight, but what they are resolute about is being gentle. And, because they are fearless, they can be gentle with anybody.' The author made an argument against the pit bull breed in the beginning of the article and then blew it apart with some of the text quoted above. His point was that pit bulls were not dangerous enough to ban, the image of the evil pit bull was just an unfounded sterotype. Just like the unfounded and useless sterotypes we have about what a terroist looks like.
Talk about bragging...
If you prevent oil companies from making tidy profits when they are able to keep the oil flowing in spite of low supply, then the next time we have a major disaster, we'll *really* be fucked.
Actor David Chiu is putting himself up for auction on eBay to work on any legitimate show or production, and 100% of the auction proceeds will be donated to World Vision (www.worldvision.org). The winning bidder will have Chiu's acting services for up to two weeks to complete its project. 
A long long time ago 130kB was a pipe dream. And people back then wrote great software. Better than great! Anyone on here old enough to remember the trusty old C64, or ZX Spectrum? Yip, back then they had 48 or 64 kB, and boy did they make the most of it! Some of the later 3D games were absolutely amazing! There was a fixed hardware spec that stayed constant for quite a number of years - and all learned to work around the constraints and did great things. 
I think, as in everything, he only cares about the top %1 (e.g. of programmers, because, he says, they write 99% of the software people actually use); therefore, he is saying that the top 1% of software and the top 1% of movies in America are fairly good, where they aren't as good in (say) Japan.
All I learned from my programming paradigms classes can be reduced to:  * OOP is powerful, great for enterprise software, and better to get a high-paying blob-coding job.  * Functional languages are very powerful and underused.  * Lisp is more expressive, so I should use it rather than pure functional languages.  * I can be more productive in Prolog than in any other language, but my code can become terribly obscure to understand later, so I better not use logic programming for any reasonable-sized project.  * Newer paradigms are usually bullshit Any comments from an experienced programmer?
This is the award winning paper presented by Larry Rosler and Uri Guttman at the 1999 Perl Conference.  While 7 years old, it remains one of the most comprehensive and cogent explanations of non-trivial sorting in Perl.
Pit Bull Euthanized After Attack On DE 3-Year-Old http://kyw.com/local/local_story_030182154.html http://isteve.blogspot.com/2006/01/malcolm-gladwell-on-why-his-bestseller.html Anyway, the anti-pit bull laws are hardly a direct analogy to racial profiling by police. A much closer analogy would be when the cops pay more attention to a pit bull running loose than to a Labrador retriever running loose. And is that really so morally reprehensible or pragmatically ineffectual? But if you go look up the data on people killed by dogs, you find that of the 238 deaths from 1979-1998 for which the breed of dog is known, 66 were due to pit bull-type breeds (along with 10 people killed by part-pit bull mixed breed dogs). Pure-bred Rottweilers were far back in second place with 39 kills and pure-bred German Shepherds in third with 17. Unfortunately, we don't have terribly good data on the number of dogs by breed, but certainly the Labrador retriever is vastly more common than all the various pit bull breeds combined, yet only one person in those two decades was killed by a pure bred Labrador (and four by part Labradors).  Moreover, the danger to children (who comprise about 70% of dog fatalities) from pit bulls relative to Labradors is even worse than these numbers suggest because sensible dog owners buy dog breeds based on likely exposure to children. If you have a small child, you are much more likely to buy a Labrador to be his pet rather than a pit bull.  Gladwell misses the salient point about bulldog breeds -- they tend to be wonderfully loyal to their owners, but precisely because they are so monogamous in their loyalties, they can be dangerous to others, such as your child's friends, for example, if they get into a fight with your child. In contrast, Labradors are promiscuously friendly, so you don't have to worry about your Lab eating a guest who gets out of hand at your kid's birthday party.  
my favourite small piece of software is [dirkey](http://www.protonfx.com/dirkey/), which i now can't do without. it lets you place bookmarks on folders and jump around them using the keyboard. no interface.
%grep -r "Tiananmen Square" * %
building ugly cities is certainly not something that america does exlusively. one thing perhaps counting against cities in the states is that many are old cities now, compared to what is being developed in asia. if you were to develop a city now, you would base a lot of the decisions on what cities were in the past and how to improve on that model. when i first saw the skyline of manhatten i was suprised by how antiquated much of it looked. but it is a very old 'modern' city so i don't know why it suprised me at first.  as the world's first (and probably still vying for the best) major metropolis it's a piece of living history. newer cities (or ones undergoing rapid redevelopment) have the benefit of standing on the shoulders of giants, say.
I like this discussion, but not the article. I wonder if it would make sense to be able to rate the discussion and article separately?
Sometimes I feel like I must be the only person on earth who thinks that Cory Doctorow is an overly self-important blowhard attention whore.
Random numbers are not useful data unless you have a link to the source and the method by which they were obtained.
No juicy details about how the reported 20M "lifestyle expense" breaks down?  I mean, I'm supposed to be awestruck by news Ellison has constructed a Japanese tearoom and buys real estate holdings in (wait for it)...Malibu?  Boring!
The problem is not the IQ, it's the potential damage of following rules and, worst, infringing the rules or looking for holes in them to get better grades and whatnot. The potential of that is creation of legions of dumb people whoare supposed to rule the world.
precisely. all kids pick on every other kid they can.  by 25, normals have an outgoing tact filter and nerds have an incoming tact filter.  by 35, everyone has an outgoing filter. nerds realize that tact is a control variable that they can tweak to affect the quality of their lives. the only exceptions by 35 are the super-rich or super-talented. this allows the people around them to tolerate the tactlessness with the hope of some gain. thus, these folks cannot have MORE comfortable lives by inculcating tact and may never realize that it is a control variable. unless they lose their riches/talent.
since you are tactful you dont piss anyone off. if you DO, your in-filter wipes the pissedness. so, not only tactful, but very deluded/happy etc. OTOH, most "successful" people seem to have these filters e.g. your Great Dictator has both filters for fact, instead of tact.
Summary of the article: utorrent needs no installation, has a 100KB installable, uses 5MB memory. Has low marketshare but been downloaded 500K times since Sep 2005 launch. Done by Ludvig Strigeus in his free time.
Summary of the article: James Montier, global equity strategist for Dresdner Kleinwort Wasserstein concludes: Once you are earning £25,000 and upwards, he ventures, and your basic needs for food, shelter and healthcare are covered, money becomes increasingly irrelevant to genuine happiness. If you want to raise your happiness level, he says, spend your money on experiences (a safari/Himalayan trekking/a concert) rather than a Rolex, a yacht or a Ferrari because they will bring you more joy in the long run. Emotional benefits from "things" decay with time. Emotional benefits from "experiences" increase with time. People chasing "things" may be more likely to get ADD, paranoia, dependency issues.
Summary: Tact filters can sweeten what is said or heard to be less hurtful. Normal people sweeten what they say (only). Nerds sweeten what they hear (only) as a learnt defence mechanism from childhood, when they were taunted a lot. All interactions work ok with this except when Nerds speak and Normals hear - there is no filter in between and the Normals may be hurt. Nerds should realize this.
What, exactly is a "pit bull-type breed"? Most people [wouldn't know](http://www.pitbullsontheweb.com/petbull/findpit.html) a pitbull if it bit them on the rear, so they call any dog that bites people and is stocky looking a pitbull-type breed. That's a bit like calling any middle-eastern/south asian person who does something antisocial an Arab, then generalizing that Arabs should be viewed with suspicion because they want to blow us up. People who want mean dogs tend to prefer muscular, powerful dogs because they're more intimidating. Sometimes it's pitbulls, sometimes rottweilers and sometimes some random breed you've never heard of that *looks similar* to a pitbull, but isn't related at all. My original point stands: it should be illegal for mean people to own dogs of any kind.
It is made clear that it is not in the nature of pitbulls to attack **humans**. They were bred with dog fighting in mind, and **do** tend to have above-average dog aggression.
I wonder if it takes practice to get this good at talking to people...
In the UK university is free I believe (read funded from tax). Ditto healthcare.
Why is that ok?
Graham also [says](http://paulgraham.com/popular.html) "A good programming language should have features that make the kind of people who use the phrase "software engineering" shake their heads disapprovingly." This is the attitude of a hacker. It's not the sort of thing that works with large teams or at (most) big companies, but such places don't produce good software.
I wouldn't claim to be an experienced programmer just yet, but I think I have enough experience to comment. Languages that are "purely X" are great for teaching about X. For doing real work, it's optimal to have multiple paradigms available so you can use whatever techniques map most cleanly to the problem you're working on. In the real world, it also helps to have good libraries; that's one of the main reasons Perl is still as popular as it is. I like using Ruby for small stuff and Common Lisp for big stuff. Your statement about Lisp also applies to Ruby; it's the most expressive non-Lisp language I've used.
Good point, but not necessarily. We could continue generating wealth faster than population growth forever and still have the above be true. That generated wealth just couldn't fall into our hands.
Simply put, a multi-core processor has two or more computational engines within a single processor unit. The operating system sees each as a separate CPU. Both Intel and AMD have released dual-core processors that are showing up in systems well within the reach of the common user.
Crap PS rip-off of an exact joke from an episode of Family Guy
It hardly matters in this case. As they say, broken clocks are right twice a day. 
http://www.badrap.org/rescue/myths.cfm  Link on why pit bulls are not all bad
I think any person of normal intelligence can learn lisp to a competent level. I have no proof of this, but I've met relatively stupid people capable to understand relatively complex things (hamming code, the calculus, monadic IO). It's almost a truism that many intelligent people have self-discipline and will problems, they could do so much if they only tried, but for whatever reason they do not try hard enough. It could be a false stereotype, but I suspect there's something behind it. 
Well, StarForce ain't no darling that's for sure, but publishers use them because it works. When I say "works", I mean publishers see it taking longer before cracked versions of games appear on torrent sites and newsgroups. I'm not one to advocate StarForce's products (having installed Panzers: Phase I, a gorgeous game marred by StarForce) but there are other aspects of this issue than just malware snuck in by a legally bought game CD. Fact is StarForce games are very hard to copy. Forget all the rest, because this fact is all the publishers look at.  Fact is that illegally copied games are threatening to suck the life out of PC gaming. Very few PC titles make sales numbers to numb the impact of illegal copying. For the rest, every single sale is important. StarForce hasn't just come about because of cynical publishers, is my point. They have also come about because we, as PC gamers, do not feel the need to pay for PC games. If we want StarForce to go away, we have another part to play other than just complaining: We got to start paying for our PC games.
Snorting coke off hookers backsides is probably under "staff training". So no juicy details.
The article seems to state that preventing suicides is an inherently good thing. I'd say that the right of suicide (yes, I consider it a right) is a part of personal autonomy like any other. Sure, many people commit suicide because of clinical depression or with an unsound mind, but I don't think this is the case for all suicides. It can seem a strange idea that suicide might ever be justified, but I think if a person is sound of mine it's their choice whether they wish to keep on living. 
i agree.  the tone of his reply is "ha ha starforce, now i'm sic'ing my minions on you."  and it's too bad that you and i are going to get modded down for this, just because other people *don't* agree. for awhile there, i could convince myself that people were getting modded down not for unpopular views, but because they expressed them in an overly hostile way.  that could account for, say, two of the people that modded you down, because you have to admit, "attention whore" is far from neutral.  but the third guy, he modded you down just because you feel differently about cory doctorow than he does.  i've seen too many perfectly harmless and respectful comments that nonetheless get modded down to think otherwise. dear reddit folks: disagreement isn't a bad thing!  in fact, that's one of the primary ways you learn new stuff!  can't we all just get along?  save the down-arrow clicking for trolls and comments that don't contain any relevant information.
Aside from the problems already stated in other topics - okay, so, with better self-discipline you do better in school. Who says 'school performance' is something that's important in life? Just about every entrepreneur I know has low discipline, high IQ, and was an 'underachiever'.
That's right. Useful software could be squeezed into the C64's tape buffer, which wasn't used if one had a floppy drive. That was only 191 bytes!
I am sure you will like it, at least the photos!
"Yet why dont Italians make the cars to beat the Japanese?" Because in Italy the principal car company FIAT is a crap directed by cocaine addicted dumb idiots...the heritages of the Agnellil family...
BlogLines: www.bloglines.com. Not as pretty and buzzword-compliant as Reader (it uses frames!), but works great.
The Design Patterns book only applies to OO languages - so why do people keep bringing it up when talking about functional? Its like bringing it up when you are talking about car maintanance. Its just not relevant.
Surely people not dying is an inherently good thing?
The point when complaining about Starforce is the behaviour on computers of legal customers.
That's funny -- I use bloglines now and was wondering if it was worth it to switch to Google's aggregator.  Does Reader not measure up somehow?
Cringely says Google releases these to the general public just to confuse the competition.  Gmail would have been their biggest success that way -- a simple beta service run on a shoestring, that creates enormous headaches for Hotmail and Yahoo. They probably confirm these GooOS rumors occasionally for the same reason.
What about "How do I play this new movie trailer"? I use a stripped-down X/Sawfish with no multimedia stuff  (It's the only way I get any work done), and I've used it for a couple years now.  How do the cool kids to video on Linux?
given the growing pains reddit is going through right now, i thought it would be a good time to haul out this classic essay.
Graham states:  &gt;And yet when you pick up a new Apple laptop, well, it doesn't seem American. It's too perfect. It seems as if it must have been made by a Swedish or a Japanese company." Apple laptops don't seem American because they largely aren't. They are designed by a Brit (Johnathan Ive) and manufactured by Asians.
Corollary: People successful in narrow fields annoy us ordinary mortals by tending to think the considerations of their field are most relevant to a given problem or decision. E.g. "I don't care how many features you can pack into a Lisp web server.  We put the server admins through three reorgs this year, and they'll all quit if we force them to learn weird new software."
And America-imitating countries here in Europe.
And of course, we all apply the inverse filter when using the internet.  To a lot of internet conversationalists, anything that might be a flame, is a flame.  It would be interesting to see if nerds, who apply tact on input, are more successful internet communicators than normal people. Also open to further investigation: what is is about the internet that inverts our tact filters?  It can't just be that anonymity takes the consequences away, because people often do the right thing even in consequence-free situations ("on your honor" transactions, etc)
Hmm. People, help me out. I don't seem to get the entire point of this article/discussion. Yeah, sure, great software can live in 130kB. So what. "Great software" can also live in 5kB, or in 526kB, or in 301MB, or in [insert value of your choice here][insert unit of your choice here].  What's "great software" anyway? You can't seriously compare what's "great" or "useful" today with what was great or useful in 1960. Come on, give me a break. Tetris can live in 130kB. But you can't surf the Web or steer a jumbo jet with Tetris.  Is µTorrent great *just because* it lives in 130kB? Then I could just as well argue that µTorrent is total crap because it doesn't fit 191 bytes. Ah, and for you Joel Spolsky fans out there, you should probably read this:  http://www.joelonsoftware.com/articles/fog0000000020.html
I wish articles like this would include in what context this tidbit was revealed.  Out of context, it sounds smug, but who knows?
I think your definition of 'discipline' is a little off.  Entrepreneurs are the definition of discipline.  They do hard things for a long time in the hopes of very large amounts of gratification when it's all over. What entrepreneurs don't have is the "checklist" mentality that we've all been conditioned to believe is important by the public school teachers and IRS drones.  In fact, the same "fuck what you say, I'm gonna get rich" mentality that drives entrepreneurs would tend to make them 'underachievers', as you put it.
yes, it's a person's choice whether to die or not.  but you want them to make that choice based on reality, not misguided perceptions. the article mentions that thomas joiner's dad killed himself, and the implication is that he did so under the mistaken impression that he was unwanted and unappreciated.  if he'd brought that up, it may have prevented joiner's family from losing a member.
i would say no, not inherently.  for example, if i fall off a horse and end up like christopher reeve, well, i will be ready to go.
Good point. I was just getting a bit nostalgic. The good thing about µTorrent IMO is that it uses less CPU compared to the client I was using before (Azureus). How big the code is isn't important. 
A tutorial that shows you a very simple way how to change the color and add some cool effects to your car. This is a very good way to see how a company logo will look on a car!
In one phrase:  &gt; Epstein and his team note that overweight and obesity is increasing in America, but their experiments do suggest one way to help kids choose healthier foods: keep them on a limited budget, and increase the price of unhealthy foods compared to healthy ones.
yeah, agreed. there must be someone reading that stuff
&gt;You miss the point. He's saying the book has little value precisely because the author more or less purposefully (through his selection criteria) created a caricature of America. No. His point is that he thinks it is mocking Americans and there's no point for a book that openly mocks Americans to be written in English. This is despite the fact that his description of the text made it look a lot like Alistaire Cooke's [Letters from America](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/programmes/letter_from_america/default.stm) or even his own Prarie Home Companion radio broadcast. The only reasons I can imagine he wouldn't think the book should be translated into English would be he's pandering to anti-French sentiment or he simply forgot about the rest of the English speaking world. Considering the fact that he does Honda commercials in Britain, I'm guessing he's pandering. &gt;As for the obesity issue, there are two things wrong with your statement. One, Keillor is 64 years old. A cursory search on the web shows that about 60-75 percent of men his age are overweight. So what? &gt; Two, yes, he's taking issue with the notion that all Americans are fat, because it's simply not true. I haven't read the book, but nowhere in the review did he say it claims all Americans are fat. Although 60-75% is a significant majority. Take into consideration that the fact that Bernard-Henri Lévy is directly competing with Keillor through this book. Would you seriously consider GM's reviews of Honda's cars? Microsoft's critiques of Apple's software?
This just proves that grades in school is no measure of intelligence, but of how much you play the game.
Does Ruby's module system not scale well? How big is big for you?
HEY STOP BAGGING AVERAGE PEOPLE. AVERAGE PEOPLE RULEZ!!!!!?!?!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!?!?!!!***!**!!
They will down mod this.   They don't care for anything related to Africa. Anyway, maybe mention that he also confiscated land from black people. And destroyed the homes of around a million poor blacks. See:  http://www.news24.com/News24/Africa/Zimbabwe/Home/
Free O'Reilley Book on Asterisk available at end of entry!
Yeah, it's not really a race thing, even though that's how Mugabe tries to portray it.  He runs roughshod over everyone.
Shock! horror as idle speculation about everyone's favorite (*cough* red) bicycle shed isn't actually true! They're going to need a spokesperson whose sole job it is to stand there and debunk these things; "Um no, we're not actually starting our own airline."  "No, GoogleCola is not happening!"
Look at that - you were totally right...(-3) points at 9 am EST on Feb. 1. This is the crux of my article - I simply feel as though a smaller and smaller viewpoint is receiving accurate representation on reddit. When the service launched, I guess I had hopes that it would be more things to more people.
"Every time I see an Alfa Romeo pass by , I lift my hat.” Henry Ford
Go Nabokov. I need to actually finish Ulysees one of these days, too. Unfortunately, some of the best books require that you know half a dozen languages in order to read them properly.
The placebo effect is the same as the conscious decision to get better.  Fat people who take any action towards losing weight will necessarily lose more weight than people who take no action. Extremely few people would completely rely on the magic pill and the magic pill alone, and the placebo effect is measuring a statistical aggregate:  Some lose weight, while some have no effect... The total is a net aggregate effect. Another somewhat related effect.  I can cure my headaches and coughs by simple conscious decision that it should go away.  Headaches are more challenging to consciously manage than coughs, but with enough time and concentration, it goes away.  A key word there is TIME.  Whether or not I have any real conscious power over my health, time alone cures.  And wrapped in the placebo effect is both of those.  The historical mistake of science is to have attached the power of delusion to the medical and pharma intervention, is one of self importance. One way to test this theory as an explanation of the placebo effect would be to seperate smokers into 2 groups.  Ones who have no interest in quitting and those with varrying inclinations towards quitting. People with no interest in quitting smoking will be unlikely to quit even if given chemicals with real nicotine substitutes. People who get advice from a plumber (expert) are more likely to get a plumbing problem fixed even when the plumber doesnt do any real work, than those people who do not seek expert advice.   
"As intelligence goes up, happiness goes down. Look, I made a graph."
I'm not sold on the effectiveness of the rankings but its still a pretty cool experiment.
My mum isn't a federal purchasing agent. They count more than the Average Person (TM) considering the fact that the US federal government is Microsoft's #1 customer.
Nordic Design Blog is an interesting design industry blog.
"Premature optimization is the root of all evil in programming."  -- C.A.R. Hoare I thought this was attributed to Knuth.
While I agree with you on your reasons for down-modding a comment, if "disagreement isn't a bad thing" then why should you care whether or not people down-mod your comments?  :P (for the record I didn't mod you in either direction)
It seems to me the major point is that functionally *identical* software can live in, say, 700KB or 30MB, and that those other 29.3MB are therefore, well.. What, besides unnecessery? And no, you couldn't make that argument, because it is pretty much impossible to fit it in that much - there's probably more concepts involved than bytes. Oh sure, maybe if the language has enough libraries - i.e. with the unaddressed 'library cheat' you could.  With almost any language, you regularly refer to implementations, be it the VM's code, a dynamically linked library or somesuch. With compiled language, you usually compile a considerable part of implementation into your executable, for speed - and also there's static linking, which are usually used to have something not break when your set of installed libraries isn't quite the same, a lesser evil in the imperfect environment that is 'pick a computer, any computer'. Of course, by just the size measure that would make it suck. Then again, consider for example centericq; I disassembled it once because I could not get my head around why the executble alone was 8MB. It turned out to mostly be compiled templates, that were probably mostly never used. Its creators probably didn't want to rewrite everything  without templates, and it worked. That sort of attitude isn't necessarily bad, but it does bloat things beyond what is necessary. Then consider MenuetOS - 1.4MB, and is a complete graphical operating system with networking and a few games. Sure, it's an extreme case because it's written in assembly. But on the other hand, why can't everything compile that well? GCC uses RTL, which I suppose adds overhead by translation to x86 being imperfect, but still. The fact that identical functionality can be implemented in code many, *many* times as big/small is not only bloat, it's regularly an indication of the bored "add bits of code to this IDE here until they seem to work" attitude I fear goes into many things. Hmm.
Of course, Joel's point about swapping is very good - even if it's relying on the OS-based workaround, the workaround *is* effective. I should have added that what I meant with unnecessary bloat is "with the same amount of work, planning and consideration," which is a little iffy as an argument because convenience is likely the largest reason for bloat.
The article was interesting but I HATE roundabouts.  The only roundabout where I live is at the University I go to... and everybody there drives/walks/bikes like they own the place.
An absolute fantastic novel
Indeed it is. I'm not saying I condone StarForce, but the reason it is being used is because it works. Publishers find very few legal customers have issues with StarForce (http://forums.ubi.com/groupee/forums/a/tpc/f/1851065692/m/8121095173) and they see their sales go up as a result of using it. totalGainFromStarForce = SalesGainFromStarForce - AnnoyedCustomersLossFromStarForce Since StarForce is in use, and more and more so, totalGainFromStarForce is positive seen from the perspective of publishers. I'm not saying "don't complain". I'm saying that if SalesGainFromStarForce declined (i.e. using StarForce would not increase sales), the totalGainFromStarForce would get negative faster than if we just work on increasing AnnoyedCustomersLoss. We have to make it an interesting proposition to not use StarForce and at the moment we're only working with the one variable. We're not being as effective as we could be.
Title should mention why: for *wearing a t-shirt* that the Bushies didn't like.  Damn!  So much for that first amendment thingy.
Karma whoring comes to reddit
"Only the most paranoid clients phone me in my sleep." - Greg Egan, Quarantine
I like the idea of a short summary when the title can't explain it all. Thank you. But I dont think he says this: People chasing "things" may be more likely to get ADD, paranoia, dependency issues. I do not think he put down the cause/effect, but just says they are related.
i've always liked this one: "The only advice I can offer, should you wake up vertiginously in a strange flat, with a thoroughly installed hangover, without any of your clothing, without any recollection of how you got there, with the police sledgehammering down the door to the accompaniment of excited dogs, while you are surrounded by bales of lavishly-produced magazines featuring children in adult acts, the only advice I can offer is to try be good-humoured and polite." - 'The Thought Gang' by Tibor Fischer
Article deflating the hype surround the term Web 2.0 and pointing out that actually this stuff all existed ages ago, it just works now.
Another excellent view of authentic eastern thought. Excellent excellent!
On the not-so-useful-software side, the demo scene always comes out with great stuff in 64kb or 4kb. Farbrausch ruled for quite a while and then there was this insane RGBA 64kb intro:  http://www.pouet.net/prod.php?which=12821 Already 1.5 years old... Probably better ones exist now.
Articles like this always seem to make people worry about the nationality of corporations.  In 20 years, after Ford and GM have been strangled by their unions and atrocious product design, there will sill probably be car plants in America.  They'll make Kias and Toyotas, be 30% owned by New York investment banks, get their raw materials from Australia, etc. All of these comments are predicated on the idea that there isn't enough work to go around.  That's ludicrous.  Work is the only thing in the world whose supply is unlimited.
I enjoyed reading the financial advisor's emails. It's hard to tell what their business relationship is like: frustration? disappointment? fear? or does the guy just feel acceptance towards ellison acting like a spending nut? anyway, it's hilarious. You can't blame Ellison... he's got the money to spend and he earned it, but what's the deal with all the Japanese stuff?
An interesting perspective, but one that I disagree with completely.  People are happiest when their wealth is increasing, not if it is just high.  In this way they compare themselves to their past selves. Even the author is unhappy because he could not walk on property that the owner previously allowed him to. He mentions that in the US, average well being has declined, but draws the wrong conclusion, which is that everyone getting wealthier is the problem.  The problem is when government prevents people from earning and keeping wealth, people have no choice to compare themselves to their neighbors rather than simply looking at their own progress. And finally, the author sounds a bit like a spoiled child when he asserts that people have a "right" to walk on property they do not own.  How about a "right" to drive other people's cars, or live in other people's houses when they're not at home?
I agree that convenience/laziness is a factor. However, I'm not sure if it's the largest one.  For instance, we shouldn't forget the ever-shrinking time-to-market. Let me repeat that. *Ever* since the first piece of software was created, the time-to-market has been *continuosly* shrinking.  In the same time, the number of features has been *constantly* rising. The deadline for your application is slipping and your boss (or even worse: your customer) comes in and tells you to cram in yet another 2057 new features in 14 minutes. So you just copy&amp;paste 10,000 lines of code, then edit, like, 1-2 of them, and commit so you can ship on time. Sound familiar? So the actual problem ain't always laziness.  On the one hand, the customers' patience ain't endless. On the other hand, *most* customers just don't care whether your software is 700kB or 30MB. So there you have it. Ah, and for you Joel Spolsky fans out there:  "Ask Lotus. When they first shipped 123 version 3.0, it required an 80286 computer, which wasn't very common then. They delayed the product by 16 months while they worked to shoehorn it into the 640K memory limit of the 8086. By the time they were done, Microsoft had a 16 month lead in developing Excel, and, in a great karmic joke, the 8086 was obsolete anyway!" http://www.joelonsoftware.com/printerFriendly/articles/fog0000000245.html
"The most merciful thing in the world, I think, is the inability of the human mind to correlate all its contents."   - H. P. Lovecraft, The Call of Cthulhu (1926)
It's relevant in teaching new concepts, especially in the bootstrapping stage. When teaching you have to lead people on a mental journey from the known, into the unknown. That requires words. Design patterns give us a rich vocabulary of words, and everyone seems to agree about what the words mean. It makes a wonderful foundation to build on. Here the author is trying to explain monads, an unknown concept, to a bunch of mainstream programmers. Mainstreamers these days know OO and design patterns. So starting from there is it possible to bootstrap some useful monad examples? Apparently so. I have read quite a number of monad explanations, trying to get a handle on how I might understand and use monads. This one did it for me. So I applaud the author's use of vocabulary. That "Maybe" example got me past the blank stare stage. 
Everything here is ganked from Wikipedia - what's so difficult about citing sources?
Yeah.  I agree.  Still, at least it's a fairly balanced account on a subject that's almost as polarized as the red/blue state issues.
I love that their definition of a girl using a guy is any situation in which he does something for her without getting sex in return.  Clearly, I need to start sleeping with all my friends or else I'm a heartless girl who uses people.
The cartoon on the front page of France Soir that is mentioned in the article can be seen here:  http://flickr.com/photos/zimmerbrand/94090426/
great story
Fifteen men.  Armed with guns.  Held the nearest European thing they could find hostage.  To express their disagreement with some political cartoons. These people are fucking crazy.   And I feel *insensitive* for saying so.  WTF?
I second that. Roundabouts are the DEVIL. I'd take waiting an extra few seconds at a light over a roundabout any day.
How about letting everyone see on the comments page?
Your karma is 97, doesn't seem so bad ;)
"It was a pleasure to burn" should have been a lot higher on the list.
Also posted on reddit: [The Cuba Diet: What will you be eating when the revolution comes?](http://reddit.com/info?id=20985) Similarly about planned agriculture failing an authoritarian nation. The Cuba Diet is about their subsequent agricultural recovery.
The people at Google are not idiots. The last thing they would do is compete with Microsoft on PC operating systems.
Did you even read the article?  1) At no point does it say that America is doing "better" than Europe.  2) The first thing it points out is that the CIA was not involved in this study.
Boo-fucking-hoo.  I'm more than satisfied with each of my Apple purchases. I'm also more than willing to call them on their bullshit but I'm not going to make a retrospective of all the things I got burned on because I'm a bitter whiner.
The best ever first paragraph (not strictly what we were after, I realise) from Clive Barker's Weaveworld. "Nothing ever begins. There is no first moment; no single word from which this or any other story springs. The threads can always be traced to some earlier tale, and to the tales that preceded it; though as the narrator's voice recedes the connections wil become more tenuous, for each age will want tale told as if it were of it's own making. Thus the pagan will be sanctified, the tragic become laughable, great lovers will stoop to sentiment, and demons dwindle to clockwork toys. Nothing is fixed. In and out the shuttle goes, fact and fiction, mind and matter, woven into patterns that may have only this in common: hidden amongst them is a filigree which will with time become a world.
duplicate. Maybe triplicate, tetraplicate ...
Some woman -- it may have been Mary Matalin, but if so she's aged a lot and and not very well -- made the most horrible face right behind Bush's back. I think she was saying "And next, Bobo &lt;i&gt;eat Romaaaaaaaaania&lt;/i&gt;." Probably the most sensible statement of evening.
I'll upmod it. It bothers me that Mugabe is looked at, at worst, as some sort of backwards guy who means well. Hello, the guy stole land from farmers and bulldozes houses for fun. And then he gets a standing ovation at the UN when he bitches out Dubya. Believe me I'm no fan of Bush, but I'm realistic enough to say that despite his follies, he hasn't starved half of America yet or made a quarter of New York homeless.
Lots of good free material on drummers and drumming.
Trust me, you are not alone.
on the plus side, his science fiction is laughably bad.
Old stuff. Surprised it made the front page. I read this back in 1999.
And here I thought the article was going to be about his embarrassing articles on "intelligent" design.
I don't know if many people care about chess much here, but KataChess is really an interesting tool to drastically improve one's chess skills
Thats right a Japan company called Web Technology has released a Development tool for the Next Generation console “Sony PlayStation 3″, and even you can download a trail demo so you can try it before invest in it. .....
Well, you can't blaim that on the roundabout, you should blaim that on "everybody there".  After all, if I ignore a stop sign/red light, then it's *my* fault and not the sign's/light's. Same for roundabouts. If I don't know how to use a roundabout, it's my fault, not the roundabout's.
“I against my brothers, my brothers and I against my cousins, my cousins, my brothers and I against the world.” This isn't about Black vs White, it's the difference between an 'Indvidualist' society versus a culture that places more importance on the 'Group'. All cultures fall somewhere in the continuum  between extreme individualism and 'Borgism' - it's just that Americans (and Protestent Europeans in general?) fall on one end of the line and often have a hard time comprehending the "crazy" motivations of others.
It seems to me that the problem must be that the confiscation and subsequent redistribution was poorly managed. I cannot say I see it as a grievous historical wrong to have wealth built on slaves back be redistributed to benefit said slaves descendants at large. Of course, it is better when it does not have side-effects like starvation. --- On a slightly different note... I find the "white people" mentality from white people to be quite ludicrous. If someone non-caucasian can't be bothered to differentiate, oh well.  But really... truly... do Americans have much more of a cherished brotherhood with Russians, Danes, Estonians, Italians, Serbians, Albanians, Portugese, and Georgians then they do with Malaysians, Koreans, Japanese, Kenyans, and Egyptians? I define myself primarily by my ethnocultural background, and find being grouped in with "white people" to be on the offensive side.  There are lot of specific white people I find quite distasteful and reprehensible, and a number of mostly caucasian countries whose general trends I would characterise likewise.  Being included with "white people", I really feel, puts me in some bad company. I expect I have more meaningfully in common with quite a lot of non-caucasians than I do with hordes of cacuasians not of my own ethnocultural background. So, unlike most people it seems, reading about "white farmers" having their land confiscated does not arouse the least bit of emotion in me. Mostly because "white farmers", the way I read it, really stands for "well-to-do descendants of wealthy owners of African slaves".  And my ancestors going back at least a millenium, almost certainly did not own slaves of any sort, and couldn't possibly have owned african slaves due to details of history and geography. So... these poor, poor "white farmers" are nothing like me, though I may be caucasian, and elicit no fraternal empathy from me whatsoever. Sorry for the long rant... but it irritates me that there seemingly was an expectation that the description would elicit an emotional response.  And it irritates me that from many it does, even though the most meaningful thing they have in common with said farmers is skin-colour.
This list is great.  I'm especially glad that it includes the opening line of The Voyage of the Dawn Treader.  It's been my favorite opening line of a book for a very long time now.
Get a preview of what the market looks like in your area.  Browse for photos and profiles at the top three dating sites  all at the same time side-by-side.
... so now we should learn to do threading.
They are upmodding it, probably because Mugabe is fashionable to hate as "a little Hitler", even (or perhaps especcially) by  people who are oblivious to most details and facts about him and/or his country. --- On a humorous aside: The fact that he actually has a hitler moustache does not help at all.  Is he unaware or merely unconcerned with the parallel?
Details and facts are of little consequence in your world--aren't they?
I might have considered giving it a point, but with all the NSFW passion.com links I'm going to take away a point.
funny
Not if they want to die. People have different utility functions. To most people, pain has negative utility, but to a masochist or a mystic it might have positive utility. To most people life is desireable, in the balance of things the utility sum (or the expected utility sum later in time) turns out positive. But if all there is in front of you is unhappiness, dissatisfaction, generally speaking negative utility states, then yes, dying is a good thing. 
No insight can be gained from such a short article.  Journalists, especially Brittish media, are very keen on pointing out Mugabe's shortcomings. What they will *never* point out if how much the economic sanctions are harming Zimbabwe.  Here's a more balanced view: http://www.newzimbabwe.com/pages/sanctions32.13170.html Once again, it seems to me that the West isn't concerned about democracy and the welfare of the people. Rather, it angers them that white farmers of European descent have been destituted from land that, in effect, was stolen land. Was it not? Do we expect colonial ownership and heritage in 2005? I mean, for real...Mugabe is scum. But such biased journalists (on a payroll?) are scum too.  There's an agenda here. Watch out when you read such reports on the Western media. Get the fact from different angles.
I usually mod up dupes where the first one is really old (like this one), but mod down dupes of stories that were posted in the last day or two.
The reason the article deserves to me modded down is that it is very short, biased and uninformative.
Interesting if true.  There were a lot of people there.  I would like to hear some sort of corroboration of her story.
You're absolutely right when you comment on this use of the terminology "white farmers."  It is a terminology either specifically designed to spur empathy, or, at best, coming from someone who has very little respect or concern for the specific historical issues that revolve around the issue. Either way, it just debases the journalist who employs such terminology. In fact, ironically, the ones who do use those terms are just agreeing with Mugabe's own distorted, hypocritical and demagogical point-of-view and manipulation tactics.
Roundabouts are easy if you use them a lot.  Here in the UK they're everywhere.  Milton Keynes, near where I live, is a new city built with a grid system of roads, and the entire thing is done with roundabouts, no traffic lights.  Accidents are few and far between.
Not on the list and recalled and translated: "The day god died the milk went sour." I don't remember title or author though. It was a historian novel about Goethe, Schiller, Grimm Brothers, Illuminati and others. The book goes on to explain 'god' was an actor for Goethes Faust and the milk went sour, because of the poison in it, which killed the actor. ;)
Yes, but not as much as you think. The thing you have to practice is asking about them. Them. THEM. Then shut up and listen. Shut up and listen. SHUT UP AND LISTEN. I'm in real estate. The thing I learned is to ask people about their move. "I'm being transferred." Where do they work? Shut up and listen. "I'm getting a divorce." Sorry, still have to shut up and listen. "I need a bigger house because we are having our third child." Oh really? How old are your kids? Shut up and listen. Oh your oldest plays soccer? Shut up and listen. Gifted and talented? You don't say? Shut up and listen. 1. Don't look bored.  2. Don't talk about yourself. Resist resist! Frankly I forget this from time to time and lose client opportunities over it. It does take practice. But if you get remotely close, you win. I really should be writing this in my OWN blog. :-/
My work filter flagged this nsfw.
Man, Reddit's system drives me nuts sometimes.  I posted up a link to these cartoons around three days ago. http://reddit.com/info?id=156w And it's ranked -2.  I lost karma over this damnit.  ;)
I pay for my Internet access. Every single web page I read is hosted by a company that pays for its Internet access. Both ends of the transaction are paying for the priviledge. Here's my question - Who -exactly- does AT&amp;T think is getting a free ride?
Wikipedia does provide that. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/IQ#IQ_correlations
Yeah, the ads on the page are NSFW. The worst part is I'm so inured to porn ads that I read the entire page before I finally noticed that this wasn't the type of thing that should stay up on my screen at work. 
steve gibson has concluded this is an intentional backdoor inserted by microsoft, yet the wine project has the exact same bug.  it's open source, so someone would have noticed code that was inserted for malicious intent.  here's a more balanced response, from Mark Russinovich of sysinternals.com: http://www.grc.com/wmf/russinovich.htm
With all the press Cindy Sheehan has gotten in the last year how can she say that her freedom of speech has been curtailed in any significant way? The Capital Police is a creation of Congress yet Sheehan will spin the incident as some manifestation of Bush's evil empire.
Microsoft still thinks it can control the market by sticking to the old Desktop which they own. They don't go very far in supporting formats which will enhance the browser experience.
I'm not the right person to ask about Ruby's module system. I use Ruby for small stuff because it's easy. Ruby is great for the same things people use Perl and shell scripts for. It's great for quickly adding some dynamic behavior to otherwise static HTML - like PHP. Lisp is not so good for these things, but if something is going to be more than a few hundred lines, I'd rather use Lisp. This has more to do with the strengths of Lisp than the weaknesses of Ruby.
I heard on KQED (public radio, San Francisco) a report of a woman with a pro-troop t-shirt on was also removed. No fan of the war but if there is a rule against this sort of thing at least it is being applied across the board. Can anyone confirm this?
Knowing that a breed has a tendency to be dog-aggressive means that you can deal with it so it doesn't become a problem; neuter the dog early, expose it to lots of other dogs while it's a puppy, repremand it immediately if it acts aggressive. Most dog breeds have traits that can cause serious problems if not handled correctly. You should know what those traits are before you get a dog so you can properly train your dog.
at the time of this writing, that comment i made is nine hours old.  i keep checking it every now and then.  it went as low as -2 and as high as +2, right now it is at zero.  i'm "controversial!" i care about people's reactions because i don't want to hurt their widdle feewings, just as i don't want them to hurt *my* widdle feewings.  i don't want people to feel injured when they interact with me.  i just want to have an honest exchange of views, *including* views that don't jibe with theirs, and vice versa. when i was younger i had a real problem disagreeing with people effectively.  i'd often scrape their egos so badly that they didn't want to have anything further to do with me.  obviously that was hurting me more than it was them.  i think i've gotten better at interpersonal relating as i've gotten older, but i still have to watch my behavior. i'm finding myself obsessively fascinated by the reddit comment rating system.  typing something here and getting nearly instantaneous feedback on how it was received is very useful.  there may be many readers who are thinking "hey, you're out of line" but would not reply with those words, yet they have no problem clicking the down arrow.  at first it was kind of creeping me out.  it's like being criticized and not being able to face your accuser.  but now i'm thinking of it more like a "mood ring" that changes color to reflect how you're being perceived, and that's valuable. i'm starting to predict what the final score of each of my comments will be as i write them.  my predictions are getting better.  with enough practice, i will be able to use this experience to soften my interactions with people in the real world.
According to a Fox "News" story someone else was arrested for their opposing apparel.  http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,183392,00.html
I'm Venezuelan, so I've first hand experience about Chávez.  IMO this article is true from head to tail. I've been victim of discrimination last year because I signed a petition to remove Chávez from the presidency. The information contained the petition, which contained about 2+ millions of signatures, was suposed to be private, only for the eyes of the CNE (National Electoral Council), which is (in theory) an independent body responsible for the elections of legislative an executive powers. Well, the CNE gave this info to a chavista congressman named Luis Tascon (http://www.luistascon.com/), who in turn published it in his web page! Now the list is removed from the pageafter Chávez ordered to bury it, but there are still a lot of CDs, widely distributed which can be consulted.  http://daniel-venezuela.blogspot.com/2005/04/tascon-list-modern-political-apartheid.html  http://www.venezolano.web.ve/archives/472-Chavez-ordeno-enterrar-la-lista-de-Luis-Tascon.html The result of these actions was that many public employes were fired, and no person who apeared on that list could aply for a job in the government and government owned companies (like PDVSA). In my case, I was aplying for a contract to make a software system for the National Superintendence of Cooperatives, and my proposal was dismised because I signed for the revocatory referendum (I was explicitly told so!) And, to add a recent event that doesn't appear in the article, at the end of an act that declares open a new year of operation for the legal system in Venezuela, the Supreme Court of Venezuela and all the judges of the country chanted a popular chorus sang in political gatherings pro-Chávez that says: Uh, Ah, Chávez no se va (Uh, Ah, Chávez stays) This is the measure of the independence of powers in Venezuela, more than half of the judges (the ones that weren't chavistas) have been replaced by "temporal" judges, being their status of temporal ideal to control them, or remove them if they become uncontrolable. 
The supreme court: Tribunal Supremo de Justicia  http://www.tsj.gov.ve/ The singing judges:  http://www.noticierodigital.com/forum/viewtopic.php?t=55822  http://www.vcrisis.com/index.php?content=esp/200308230119
There are quite a few tools that convert DVDs to files that can be viewed with iPod. Among them Cucusoft, Xilisoft and PQDVD product.  Looks like some new software has been released and claims to be up to 300% faster. Probably not true
Good info, of course, but it's been very widely known and read since 1997. Everything on useit.com is pretty much a standard reference text for anyone who makes web sites. This isn't crap, but it is old and already well-known. Why post it here?
[VLC](http://videolan.org) will play almost anything, but for the exceptions, [MPlayer](http://mplayerhq.hu/homepage/design7/news.html) with the [w32codecs](http://ubuntu.wordpress.com/2005/12/04/libdvdcss2-and-w32codecs-for-ubuntu/) package installed is still the best solution.
I believe it's also generally known that it is easier to recall something if you're in the same state that you learned it in. I wonder if this could be used to recreate useful mental states.  Say, remember, as best you can, a time when you were very receptive to information before you start learning, remember a time when you were relaxed to help you relax, etc.
Whitacre doesn't understand the economics of peering.  He thinks that if Google isn't directly paying AT&amp;T for an OC48 or GigE into their datacenters, for example, then they're "stealing" bandwidth from AT&amp;T because all of AT&amp;T's downstream customers have end users surfing porn on Google Images and Google Video all day.  He doesn't understand that AT&amp;T and their downstream customers are also hosting web sites that the other carriers' downstream customers are surfing porn (or whatever) on all day. What's changed is probably mostly that Vonage has become successful and AT&amp;T has a competing VoIP service.  Also Google and other companies are making a lot of money and AT&amp;T's dazed and confused CEO is wondering where his piece of the action is. 
Huh? Link? *EDIT:* [link](http://dilbertblog.typepad.com/the_dilbert_blog/2005/11/intelligent_des.html) I see, it's embarassing because he presents a different point of view, instead of mindlessly validating yours. That *is* embarassing. Here's a key quote:   &gt;I’d be surprised if 90%+ of scientists are wrong about the evidence for Darwinism. But if you think it’s impossible, you’ve lived a sheltered life.
Malkin: "In civilized societies, if you are offended by a cartoon, you do not burn flags, take up guns and raid buildings, chant death to your opponents, or threaten suicide bombings. You write a letter to the editor." On the other hand, if you're offended by a t-shirt, you just have the person wearing it arrested, right? Not that that's enough for Malkin ...
It seems like you're saying Mugabe isn't so bad.  What's up with that -- do you have information to support?
I remember fondly the hoopla she stirred up outside Bush's ranch in August. It was a comedic political quandry for the administration: they couldn't frontally attack a grieving mother of a dead soldier without abandoning the visceral high-ground they cherish. She was like Fox News Kryptonite. Unfortunately, nobody got her a political advisor, or at least a competent one, 'cause she started hanging out with Hugo Chavez. Way to go, you just alienated your moderate supporters and are now left with the fringes that would have been there had you never existed.  Hope Hugo made you feel special Cindy, 'cause you just took a big dump on the political capital that you didn't even get to spend.
Funny, angry screed on lousy installers.
My first impression was that this article's green-screen terminal look sucks. But the text is kind of interesting :-) 
The cartoon-controversy and debate on freedom of expression,  today spread to the rest of Europe.
Fewer, fewer, fewer
She's been hanging with Hugo Chavez!?  You mean the guy who is giving away free heating oil to poor people in the US?  Giving away free stuff like that is just wrong, obviously communist and alienates moderates!
Let me guess, that's why you modded it down? It's a useful, interesting resource; modding it down is a disservice to this site and to those who might not frequent other social link sites as often as you.
Bicycle. Most Efficient Machine. Ever.
AD
I'd love to see what $200m bought in Woodside.
how the users interact with a system is important. it should be considered a design flaw if everyone is misusing it.
microsoft behind the scenes
It'd be interesting to see what the author would make of the "faith-based" governance of islamic theocracies in the middle east, or tribal governments on reservations. If he had guts (the "courageous pursuit of the proper course" kind, not the "I don't know anything and that's the best way to be" kind), he'd make an even-handed approach to these issues. I happen to think that the "Idiot America" phenomenon has a lot less to do with the particular culture of 'muricans and more to do with a general human attribute that people instinctually tend to respect authority (note: I say TEND TO), and a lot of these people are using a populist "I'm no expert" ruse as a badge of such authority.
As a member of the free internet community, I call for an end to AT&amp;T.
Yes, it is wrong. Chavez didn't produce anything that he is "giving away." That's how communism works. You deem Chavez admirable for taking (by force) from those who have more than what he considers "enough" and redistributing it to those who he says "need" it. How can the heating oil be "free" if it cost FREEDOM?
Perhaps when they talk about the subject at hand, yes. But often times they are incorrect in spite of their knowledge of a given subject, mainly because facets of that subject are interjecting in a larger context, and the nerd, seeing the subject he recognizes, assumes more authority than is wise. A good example is how many nerds openly wonder why software tool/language/application X isn't used by everyone everywhere. The nerd might be an expert in such a case, but he is ignorant of the fact that different people have different needs and maybe some people just aren't interested in it. Note: this also applies (in fact, quite readily) to "normal" people where their political convictions are involved.
what optimal said.
She was only "asked to leave", though, not arrested.
So what? Who in their right mind would want to live in a country where they can be arrested for their t-shirt?
Such a bad choice for the name. I'll bet most people are pronouncing it "you-torrent" rather than "mu-torrent".
i'll give utorrent a shot. anyone have any negative points about it?
How far can they take it before people as a whole get sick of terrorism? In my mind I automatically reject anything that uses terrorism as an excuse, because if I accept it that means terrorism is working. Now if we need a program to beef up security because we find it lacking, lets do it, examine the issues at hand, and not use the T word. It just seems like the more they do these "media blitz" things, the more obvious it becomes that they are just trying to control the country with fear. The sad thing is that many (not all) Fox users are actually succeptable to this. It is just making me sick how much terrorism is working, many Americans are living in fear, and the government is just faning the flames.
i was pronouncing it mu-torrent until the article pointed out that it was micro-torrent. i'm also an idiot. "micro" clearly makes sense.
Okay, so this article is too simplistic, even if it shares the view that Mugabe is a very bad man.  Assuming you don't like sanctions, what are our other options? To paraphrase [Matt Welch](http://mattwelch.com/old/2001_11_04_lettersarchive.html#6944345): * Economic aid: suggests we implicitly support what the regime is up to.  see Egypt, Indonesia  * Humanitarian aid: allows the regime to continue to neglect its own people, when the aid itself doesn't get stolen.  See Nigeria, Afghanistan  * Trade: Legitimizes the regime and gives it a financial lever to use on us.  Opportunity for large corporations to profit from the repression.  See Saudi Arabia, China.  * Economic Sanctions: Make the situation worse. * Military Attack: Iraq.  Iraq.  Iraq Iraq Iraq.  Really, the less said, the better.  * Doing Nothing: We can't just sit here while they kill or brutalize thousands of people.  Are we racist monsters?  See: Sudan, Rwanda, Bosnia.
agreed.
&gt; This isn't crap, but it is old and already well-known. Why post it here? There is a fundamental assumption by link engines (reddit, digg) that links as a resource are unlimited. They are not. Because a link to a story, article, picture has variable quality. So a scarcity of good stories being released on any one day forces karma hungry users to look to the past. At some stage I think reddit may place more value on comments on stories, images, etc rather than the mere link itself. This is one thing slashdot has got right.
It's missing: "There was no possibility of taking a walk that day" from Jane Eyre, one of the most famous opening lines ever. I also rather like Ishiguro's "It seems increasingly likely that I really will undertake the expedition that has been preoccupying my imagination now for some days." from Remains of the Day. And Saul Bellow has another nice one in “Shortly after dawn, or what would have been dawn in a normal sky, Mr. Artur Sammler with his bushy eye took in the books and papers of his West Side bedroom and suspected strongly that they were the wrong books, the wrong papers.” From Mr. Sammler’s Planet.
Ugh.  This is one topic that needs more serious thought and less petty politicking:  If you can agree with a fascist neocon on this one you should savor it. Some of these Palestinians would shoot you both as soon as look at you.
negative filters: Go to prefs and check the box next to "don't show sites after i've disliked them".  Then dislike anything you don't, well, like.  And it's gone.  Problem solved.  Next?  Ah yes... "zippit": Seems you've already found the solution: summarize the content of the link in a comment.  If you're right and Reddit needs summaries, then your comments will get lots of likes. 
Excellent.  Now they need to apply this technology to home carpeting, furniture upholstery and clothes.  Or at least mine.   
In this article:  Apps in a Browser   Collaboration and Community   Search and Maps   The New Web Starts Here   Widgets Break Out of the Browser   IM via the Web   The New Web at Work   Roll Your Own Service  
Good call buddy to whoever caught this article.  Goes in tune with the $200 billion telecom scam and the AT&amp;T make Google et al. pay for it's traffic too!!
Oh I barely do any web programming. No wonder I haven't really run into Ruby. :)
ExxonMobile made almost $11 Billion in profit last quarter - record profit for any US company ever (and they made $36Billion for the year).  This in the aftermath of Katrina &amp; Rita putting much of the Gulf of Mexico production out of commission causing gasoline, natural gas and heating oil prices to skyrocket.  Can you say 'theft'? According to wikipedia, in Venezuela "The oil sector operates through the government-owned Petroleos de Venezuela (PDVSA)".  Government owned.  So how is Chavez giving oil to poor US citizens any different than the US giving aid to poor people with AIDS in Africa? 
Poor, poor Larry.  A single tear rolls down my cheek. 
Software lets users play videos and MP3s and offers easier access to digital images.
Regardless of if Hugo Chavez is a saint or satan, he is largely portrayed in the states as a nutcase who solidifies his political popularity in Venezuela by regularly embarking on Anti-US diatribes. The middle ground (moderate) portion of the US electorate are the sought after ones, since voters of the right and left are pretty much entrenched. In the politics of perception ('truthiness'), foreign leaders who rail against the one's home country automatically raise the defensive flags, and are an anathema to be associated with politically. Like it or not, politics are all perception, and that wouldn't be such a bad thing if the average citizen's perception ran deeper than 15 second soundbites on 24 hour news stations.
Because our freedom of speech includes the right to peacefully protest by wearing a !@#$ing T-shirt and not saying a bloody word whilst an audience member at a State of the Union address. She wasn't permitted to do that. They threw her out (unlawfully) for it. They arrested her (unlawfully) for it. Yeah, we're all free to rant and rave mindlessly (or even mindfully) online or in public where people rarely pay attention, but we're being severely curbed and restricted in what we say to people in *control* of anything. That's officially Very Bad.
Aww, but GoogleCola would be based on heuristic search algorithms of what everybody else thought it should taste like, and would probably be delicous!
Well, I think qualifying the redistribution of historical slave-owners' land as "stealing" is deceptive at best, delusional at worst. Is the US government stealing when it makes use of eminent domain?  It may be a stupid cliché, but it's true... if the government is doing it, it's legal (assuming they had a modicum of foresight with recent legislation). Buldozing houses for fun?  Probably not his finest hour.  But it rather seemed to me like a dumbly orchestrated aid grab.  Did he fully reject the UN tents or did he cave in eventually? As for starving half the country--that's a malicious lie.  His government's policies (whether heavily influence or solely guided by him) had the unfortunate side-effect of causing food supply problems.  Presumably he did not confiscate the farms of the white people in a devilish plot to starve the black people. Anyways... rafuzo, it seems to me, was merely reciting the soundbites from some media establishment of about Fox News' level of reputation. I'd welcome new information about Zimbabwe.  If I am wrong, I am wrong... but when government officials and media start mischaracterising a foreign government's or leader's actions in order to make it/him/her look immoral or evil... well, when a person is really evil, you only have to tell the truth to get people to agree with you.  It is when there is plentiful moral ambiguity that governments need to start making up stuff to sway the masses in the intended direction.
Actually, Malkin never said that.  Besides, the post is about the Danish cartoons and not about Japan or WWII at all. Basically, a bunch of raving lunatics with guns threatened to take hostages over a series of cartoons.  Malkin suggests this is insane.  You suggest that to find this behaviour disturbing infers that Americans don't believe anything.
Remember that karma on Reddit is not just about posting the link before anyone else does.  How well you write the headline has a lot to do with how a link gets modded.
It is amazing to me that millions of people spend their money on lotteries, HOPING to win when all odds are against them. If you compare lottery odds against the odds of dying it becomes incongruous to me to ever think of buying a lottery ticket again.
The feds have been pusing for this for years, and it always seems to fail.  I'm not quite worried yet.
It not 'theft' if ExxonMobile did not FORCE customers to buy their fuel.   "So how is Chavez giving oil to poor US citizens any different than the US giving aid to poor people with AIDS in Africa?" There's very little difference. If it is wrong for you to rob Peter to pay Paul, it is wrong for Uncle Sam too.
Because Chavez is actually doing it whereas the US is just saying ["don't have sex, please"](http://www.guardian.co.uk/aids/story/0,7369,1262718,00.html).
Hmmmm... perhaps you are right, and there is no way to come out smelling like roses. But it's not like Zimbabwe is killing or brutalizing people.  Surely there is some difference between: 1) white farmers becoming poor, 2) poor people losing housing, 3) some [lots?] poor people having increasingly less food available to them, and 1) racially/ethnically motivated murdering and raping of your own people.  In fact not many of the countries you mention are in particularly the same league.  Zimbabwe seems pretty harmless by most of the comparisons you implied.  I personally would argue for non-intervention, mixed with sensible levels of aid and trade.  You cannot impose order from the outside.  It must come from within. If people are being oppressed, they must rise up.  That is as true in Zimbabwe as it is in the United States. Of course, western countries dislike genuine revolutions; because the resulting governments tend to treat them with well-earned distrust.  But it really is the best way on the long run, I think.  A genuine revolution that succeeded in paving way to a new and stable state is a historic triumph.  A coup by a minor faction funded by foreign money however is a source of national shame, whether hidden or widely known.
Actually very funny, but I don't like it.  It seems like stooping to his level.
Weinberg, I. "The prisoners of despair: right hemisphere deficiency and suicide", 2000, http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/entrez/query.fcgi?cmd=Retrieve&amp;db=PubMed&amp;list_uids=11118607&amp;dopt=Citation
Severely curbed?  You have a strange definition of 'severe'.  You think disallowing protests in the House gallery during a joint session with the Supreme Court and the President is a severe limitation to the right of free speech? Insisting that the right to protest should be extended to all places and all times is less than useful.  Claiming that the House gallery should be available for protest without restriction is an absolutist position that seems unworkable to me.
In answer to "Why all the Japanese stuff": http://www.paulgraham.com/usa.html or more sucinctly: Because it looks good.
...her name is Beverly Young, the wife of 18-term Republican U.S. Rep. Bill Young of Florida, who wore a shirt that read, "Support the Troops." She too was removed. The street goes both ways, as "House rules bar demonstrations in the galleries." http://www.cnn.com/2006/POLITICS/02/01/sheehan.arrest/index.html
It might not be OK.  But it's still useful to understand that dog-aggression and human-aggression are are not significantly correlated behaviors.  Must people instinctively (and wrongly) assume that they are. APBTs are also not bred to "try to inflict the maximum amount of damage on an opponent".  They are bred to "grab and hold".  This makes a lot of sense when you look at the rules surrounding an organized dog fight.  If APBTs were really bred to do maximum damage they would try to bite many times and in many places and traditionally bred APBT simply won't do this. See the APBT FAQ for more details about organized dog fighting: http://www.nyx.net/~mbur/apbt.html The FAQ also provides a lot of other interesting information about the breed. And a quick note about bite stats: Zak pointed in an earlier post to the the excellent "FIND THE PITBULL" page: http://www.pitbullsontheweb.com/petbull/findpit.html It's not hard to understand why so many "pit bull" attacks are wrongly attributed to the breed.  If you're really interested in the subject, you might also want to take a look at "Bandit: Dossier of a Dangerous Dog" by Vicki Hearne.  It's a good and interesting read.  In it she does a bit of investigation into a number of "pit bull attacks" and it actually almost funny what breeds get transformed into "pit bulls" for the sake of a more captivating newspaper headline. It's also probably instructional to stop by your local SPCA and take a look the number of APBTs and APBT crosses represented there.  Many of the dogs that end up at animal shelters were previously abused.  So it's not hard to make the inference that there are a LOT of abused APBTs out there. I don't mean to suggest that making generalizations (or acting on them) is a bad thing.  It's just a human thing, and one of our most important distinguishing cognitive characteristics.  And it's a useful ability.  But it also gets us into a lot of trouble.  It's what leads to statements like "Muslims like blowing people up" or "Black people are dumb".  We simply need to make sure we think clearly about how we arrive at the generalizations we inevitably make -- and about the consequences of acting on them.
You are absolutely right.  Capitalism is such a stupid idea.  I think the government should just seize all private property, nationalize all industry, and redistribute the profits of all the greedy corporations to all the truly needy people.   We all know that government does a much better job at just about *anything* than private industry.
I think it's to keep non-elected folks from influencing senate work in the chambers. Obviously just outside there are armies of lobbyists, but inside only the elected officials are allowed to use their freedom of speech. So my take is that Sheehan gets attention for her stunt, but ultimately she knew exactly what she was doing and what the consequences would be. 
Indeed, comrade. If only the fat cats would spend less time greedily pursuing evil profits, they could read the history books and see how great our system works.
Terry Pratchett has some good ones that are not on the list.
About fifty years ago people in America misread "all men are created equal" as "all men are equal" (this is a similar mistake as the one made in Russia in 1917 which has led to similar but more ghastly problems outside of America). One of the things that had to get fixed in order to make everyone equal is to get rid of the word "man" and substitute a gender-neutral word like "person". Anyway, as a result, if all people are equal, then all points of view must be equal as no point of view exists independently of a person. If all points of view are the same, then all cultures are the same a culture is nothing but a collective point of view. The outcome is there is no longer any notion of facts or correctness or best as everything is equal.  There is just a morass of "equality" where, since we can't all be superior, and some of us can't even be mediocre, we all have to be bottom-of-the-barrel together (but don't tell anyone as it may hurt someone's feelings). Until we are no longer afraid to admit some people are actually are winners and some people are losers (just as some people are taller/shorter, fatter/thinner, smarter/dumber) we will never get back to making progress. This is obvious as progress implies something is better than something else and better is a word being struck from our vocabulary.
"what's a nerd, exactly?" I don't know, but anyone who asks for a precise definition of "nerd" clearly qualifies :)
And people think that Israel can negotiate with people like this. Sheesh.
Embarrassing?  Looks to me like he was talking about human interaction, emotional investment, and the herd mentality, and pulled no more conclusion than "there is no easy way to untangle these arguments."   Take your dogma for a walk, dude.
Ruby is good for most any kind of high-level programming, but it's been getting a lot of attention lately due to the Rails web framework. Ruby also has good tools for scripting on just about any OS, creating GUIs, networking, etc....
Sheehan's shirt *was* pro-troop.
Hi Forgive me for offering this correction as it does not detract from the point you are making but is only a technicality. There is no such word as "Bantus". Bantu is already in the plural being the plural of "Muntu". Bantu means people in sub saharan africa (Muntu meaning 1 person). So the Zulus are one of the many Bantu tribes. Regards  
*I see* No, actually, you don't.  Adams takes false assumptions about evolution, based on ignorance, and runs with them. I'm not going to spend time go into detail. [Here](http://pharyngula.org/index/weblog/comments/scott_adams_is_a_wally/) is a decent explanation if you are interested.
How much *terrorism* is working?  Agreed, people are living in fear.  But you're mixing up the causes here: this isn't the media letting the terrorists succeed in their attempts to scare Americans; it's the media (at least, a portion of the media) *actively* attempting to frighten Americans further because it furthers the goals of the current administration. You're afraid, I'm afraid, and someone out there profits (monetarily or in terms of power/control) by our fear.  This is no different than the transparent ads that try to scare you into buying antibacterial soaps and "air sanitizers" (my god that product is ridiculous) by showing you cartoon bacteria monsters and throwing out phrases like "75 million bacteria living in your toilet!". An exaggeration? You wish.  The formula is (slahsdot style) (1)find something people are afraid of, (2)verify that people will be hard-pressed to objectively assess whether your cleverly-named product/policy adequately addresses the threat, (3)scare people into buying your cleverly-named product/policy, (4)profit!. For reference, see also The Clean Air Act, No Child Left Behind, etc.
It seems more like a list of the first lines of a set of 100 books the writer liked. Many lines that lots of people would like on the list are ommitted, and there are also some that don't seem all that interesting or cool when looked at solely on the basis of first-line-ness.
Amusingly, there is another story on the reddit front page rather relevant to your comment --   "Greetings from Idiot America" http://www.aboyandhiscomputer.com/Greetings_from_Idiot_America.html The basic thesis is that "the Gut" has displaced "the mind" in our discourse. Scott Adams' "point of view" has that Gut quality; it has what Stephen Colbert would call "truthiness". Translating back to conventional English, that means Scott Adams' post was ignorant and uninformed. But since the Gut now rules, and Scott's musings sound okay to your Gut, his "point of view" is just as valid as the "knowledge" accumulated by millions of scientists over more than a century of research.
Alot of countries have a more socialist outlook than America, you'd do well to not label everything communism. Your play on words are very misleading, countries constantly give things away to the unwashed masses, for example Social welfare assistance, Health care, education. I don't know enough about Chaves to judge the man, but I see one picture of him coming from the right leaning press, and another from the left leaning press.  That's to be expected.
Regarding your comment on languages that are "purely X," which seems to be a reference to Haskell, often described as "purely functional," I should point out that Haskell is not limited to purely functional programming paradigms.  It is, for instance, great for imperative programming. The core language itself is pure but can be used to construct imperative computations naturally using a sequential syntax that will be familiar to imperative programmers.  As a bonus, the type system ensures that you don't accidentally mix imperative bits into computations that you intend to be pure.  So you can be pure and impure in the same program, using each approach where it makes sense, all while being assured that neither side of the program is muddying the other. For example, implementing a concurrent port scanner is a "real-world" kind of problem that is by its very nature highly impure, and yet it can be solved elegantly in Haskell: http://blog.moertel.com/articles/2004/03/13/concurrent-port-scanner-in-haskell In sum, the line between "purely X" and "not purely X" is rather easy to cross, and not as strongly separating as many people seem to believe. Cheers. --Tom 
The new PS3 Dark Sector is a third-person shooter where players assume the role of the protagonist, A modern-day superhero, You are Hayden Tenno that have the availability too morph into different combat forms ....
Indeed, politics is perception and if people see a 15 second soundbite on TV showing how Chavez is giving heating oil to poor Americans I think they'll have a positive perception of Chavez even if they are moderates.  That's why Chavez doing this was so brilliant: he's helping people who have been forgotten by their own country and the even though the leaders of that country seem to have it in for him.
In Venezuela the people own the oil resource under their feet - what's wrong with that?  Nobody says they can't make a profit with that resource on the world market (and they are), since that resource is considered part of their national treasure they all get to share in it.  What's wrong with that model?  It's not applicable to everything, of course, but for a natural resource like Oil it's quite applicable and it's a failry commonly held view outside of the US.
This is old news. The journalist might have missed it since it was listed under [SBC](http://www.businessweek.com/@@n34h*IUQu7KtOwgA/magazine/content/05_45/b3958092.htm) when it came up in November. SBC has since bought AT&amp;T and rebranded under that name.
Read the linked threads. Evidently this was nabbed w/o permission off of an Apple machine at a developer conference. Instead of sending in the Army of Lawyers, the original author looks like he's going to finish the code.
It writes to disk a lot and some people think that this is an unnecessary tradeoff for a smaller footprint. In my humble opinion, though, disk space is cheap, and RAM ain't. Otherwise, it is *the* best-behaved client for use on any tracker by anyone.
Which is why Adblock is your friend.
This isn't really an article; it's a advertisement for a   book, disguised as an news article.
"the point?"  i didn't see one in the original article, more like a statement of fact.  further, telling me i've "missed the point," whether i have or not, is no way to foster a respectful discussion.  the reason why i think this is good news is because the "india is taking all the tech jobs away from americans" was becoming a serious big-time meme.  whether they actually *were* taking jobs away from americans or not was almost beside the point, but it definitely *was* shaping many people's thinking.  they were all like "dude, we totally have to start off-shoring tech support and grunt-work programming and stuff, to stay competitive!"  but this new development wipes out that argument.  now we know that any country that has cheap tech labor today will become successful enough that they are no longer cheap tomorrow.
poor professor Myers, getting his blog slashdotted *and* reddited in the same day... good thing he moved it off of the G5 mac in his office onto a hosting service.
a blog, a blogger and another thing :-)
Gosh ruby fans are sensitive...
Indeed, China's economy has been expanding at 10% pa. for the last decade.
Yes, I think disallowing silent, non-disruptive protests during a joint session with the Supreme Court and the President is a severe limitation. Aren't those *exactly* the people we *want* to hear us when we have a grievance? Aren't they supposed to be representive of what "we the people" want? She was wearing a !@#$ing T-shirt, not shouting slogans or hanging a big-ass banner across the bleachers.
Which is irrelevant to a discussion of the efficiency of a planned economy. China is totally hybridized w.r.t. capitalism and communism.
To the shining example of the Chicago Boys in Pinochet's Chile?
The price for speakeasy.net &amp; other premium ISPs is of debatable value right now. As the dickheads roll out antagonistic traffic shaping and fuck up our ability to access our favorite web pages, speakeasy's star will rise. Just saying.
We have the same problem where I live, we have a sudden influx of people coming from eastern Europe looking for a better life. It's obvious that these immigrants are honest genuine people.  It's still hard to face the uncertainty of what your neighbourhood is going to be like in 5 years. It may be the best thing that ever happened, or it may be a disaster. One things for certain it will be different.
I guess my point was that it was idiotic and disprovable to suppose that the private sector somehow managed to exclude incompetence and ineffiency through the magic/sleight of hand of the free market. Regarding railways (and water, gas etc) - they are clear examples of natural monopolies and the only reasons to put them in private hands are ideological/superstitious (or simply corruption - doubtless the real reason imo).
Another example is the Huffman encoding -- it came about in a similar way. Huffman came in late to class, saw a problem on the board which asked for the provably *optimal* lossless data compression algorithm and constructed one, without relying it was a problen his professor was trying (but couldn't solve).
Fewer signs, fewer accidents C'mon!
yes, what reddit really needs is for a link bookmarked while using frames to not be made unusable when the submitter deletes it. Its happened to me already.
Even if I did agree with you that T-shirts with slogans should be permitted in the gallery.  The fact that they aren't permitted is *not* an example of severe curbing of free speech in this country.
"In the second century of the Christian era, the Empire of Rome comprehended the fairest part of the earth, and the most civilised portion of mankind. The frontiers of that extensive monarchy were guarded by ancient renown and disciplined valour." - Edward Gibbon, The Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire (1776)
I think being thrown in jail for 4 hours is severe.  Perhaps you'd like to try it and report back whether or not you agree.   
There is no prohibition against T-shirts with slogans on them. That, nitwit, is the point.  The police apologized for tossing her in jail.
You're completely ignoring freedom of the individual. Maybe someone else would be better at making my decisions for me. However, that gives him no right to force me to submit to his will.
The article is short enough not to need a distorted summary. Stop it.
If you have great ideas, business concepts or inventions check this site out.
It was new to me...
This guy has an interesting model of the world. This is just the first in a series of chapters. Read, think, discuss.   Just watch-out for the kool-aid, it's some heady stuff.
Physics lecture? or Social commentary? Only time will tell.
i want a "concept/theme" filter, not a site filter. That may be hard, so a keyword filter might be ok too. zippit - i cant do it alone. would like more people to do it AND keep it isolated in one place in the UI for quick scanning. at the moment, comments bounce up and down as determined by "time of last post in a thread"
What also seems a bit crappy is 2/5 of the determination of self-discpline is based on a parent and teacher questionaire. I would have thought most parents/teachers think their kids are not self-discplined if they don't get good marks. So its a bit of a circular measure. I bet previous high marks correlate very well with future high marks.
On an entirely personal aside, I'd like to point out that I really appreciate your comments on reddit. I imagine we disagree on many of the various controversial issues, but I never feel that your comments are childish or reactionary. Reddit doesn't have a space for personal communication, so I'll take this one. I'd google you, but "rah" isn't googleable.
It is a parody of all those pixel-selling sites.
A team of maverick podcasters have developed technology that stitches together MP3s files on the fly, allowing listeners to create dynamic custom taylored episodes.
It would be very interesting to see how site content or even post title relates to mods.  Many sites are using tagging as course categorization on content, and a spider/scraper might be able to come up with a relatively quick way of sorting posts into buckets.  The site itself, technorati, digg, and even del.icio.us would be obvious sources of this information.  I don't know how "bad form" it would be to query your "competitors" for information on a given link, but such sites are designed for querying...  They wouldn't be public otherwise. The next questions to ask is how do you effectively group tags into more general groups that are suitable for presentation on "new post" sites like this.  You could almost predict how a user would mod based on tags, URL's themselves, and previous performance, which might be a good way to utilize the "recommended" page on this site. Anyway, enough brain storming for now.
Who better to make your decisions than someone you elect?
Applicable.
Hmm, a thought on modding, buckets, and karma.  Perhaps you have a user, like myself, who enjoys technical articles and tends to mod them up, ignoring the other stuff.  Let's say I see an interesting title on a post that talks about knitting Irish wool sweaters.  I visit it, like it, and mod up the post.  I've effectively participated in modding a set of links I wouldn't normally be concerned with.  Shouldn't that weight the score for that post?  Instead of modding up a point, perhaps it should go up two.  The catch is that it's not my decision how much weight it receives.  So now you have two points of data for the post: mods (up and down), and a weighted score.
ROFL
Doubleplusgood, citizen!
Don't like it? Don't vote for it!
Thanks!  I can pay you much the same compliments. Though we very definitely disagree on many things, I also recall some unexpected points of agreement.  It is most gratifying to note we can be mutually appreciative of one another even despite our sometimes "adversarial" contacts. Thank you for your encouragement.  Despite my semi-regular disparagement of reddit modding/modders; I actually paranoidly believe I developed a dedicated group of anti-fans who seek out my comments in anticipation of disliking them.  (But unlike you, and other interesting sparring opponents, instead of replying they just mod.)  I believe this not because of any diagnosed (or undiagnosed) medical condition, but because I occasionally find comments of mine downmodded that contain not a shred of opinion, only readily verifiable facts At any rate: C'est la vie.  I just hope comment modding won't soon start having an impact, because that would (as you probably well know) pretty much remove me from all discussions. --- I await with immense curiousity how this comment will be modded in comparison to my other comment, and in comparison to your equally off-topic (though shorter) comment. "Just because you're paranoid, doesn't mean they're not out to get you!"
If the situation wasn't so sad, you'd be funny.  Maybe you should move to Zim for a few months, and tell us what it's like afterwards. Lots of wide open spaces there. Have a look at Nelson Mandela's view on Mugabe:  Mandela expresses anger at Mugabe:  http://www.namibian.com.na/Netstories/2000/May/Africa/007A98DA73.html Mandela adds to Mugabe pressure  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/africa/739258.stm   COSATU, the largest SA trade union, and part of the ANC alliance are absolutely anti-Mugabe. They recently blocked the border between SA and Zim. Now, I don't know how familiar you are with the political setup in this region, but this should give you some indication of how the workers perceive him. Have a look at:  Zimbabwe: Lessons for South and Southern Africa  http://www.cosatu.org.za/speeches/2001/zv010214.htm He confiscated white farms almost as a smoke screen to hide his other attrocities behind. I think I said this elsewhere, but these days you get a $50,000 bill in Zim. For two reasons: Else you'd need something larger than a wheelbarrow for your cash. And to avoid an arbitrage situation developing with toilet paper - it is literally cheeper to use zim dollars than toilet paper.   
as a complement ...(see above), I have a dumbed down thing called linkr8r which works with  ezproxy, databases, and some opacs. http://linkr8r.org/ ..Charles L
I agree - if they were really concerned about democracy and destroying tyranny they would have bombed Mugabe before they bombed Sadam. If any Western/Eastern leader did what he's done (and forget about the stolen farms) and there would have been international outcries. Had any middle eastern country done it they would have been bombed and invaded (and here I have to exclude Israel, there are "special rules" for them). The fact that it's happening in Africa means that the West can't really give a damn. The only reason anyone in the West knows anything about Mugabe is because of the confiscated white farms. Had it been black farms they wouldn't have given it a second thought. Sad thing is the farm issue is the tip of the ice berg.
**[speakeasy prices](http://www.speakeasy.net/home/compare/)** Sure they're posted. Basically, $50/mo + activation for the slowest service. $6 premium if you want "onelink", meaning DSL without getting a phone line via your local carrier. And it's a $30/mo bump to the next speed level, then a $10/mo bump and another $10/mo bump. Not extremely attractive compared to slightly faster service from your local Bell IF you can keep your bill less than $56. I'd have paid less if I'd gone with speakeasy. SBC always manages to surprise me with the monthly bill.
The first link you posted is practically void of content.  Mandela's opinion is of no consequence to me unless it is well reasoned... and in the article you linked, there really isn't any reasoning.  Sorry--I'm not part of the western Nelson Mandela fan-club... which reminds me too much of the western Dalai Lama fan-club. The second link points out that on at least one thing, **Mr. Mugabe and Mr. Mandela agree**.  Guess what it is?  The very topic this article is about: &gt; Mr Mandela backed "equitable" change to land ownership in Zimbabwe, where "50% of the land... is owned by whites". The last link... god that man goes on and on.  Perhaps you could highlight specific sections of relevance for me?  The general gist of it though is that everything happening in Zimbabwe is terrible.  Well... the general gist of it is that from what reports he receives in South Africa, things are terrible. Are there any media sources you could direct us to that shed light on events?  Something with more details, instead of just quotes of celebrity Africans?
As a South African I have to absolutely disagree with your views on Mandela. Had it not been for him South Africa would have seen an extremely bloody civl war. All of us owe him our eternal gratitude. I saw the Man in action, I saw the effect he had on white and black alike. He is one of the only true Hero's of the past century. Read "Long Walk to Freedom" by Mandela, and to get a view from the perspective of the then ruling class read "The Afrikaners" by Herman Gilliomee. Mugabe started off as one of the greatest liberation leaders of his generation. No-one knows why after 20 years of rule he suddenly changed. I would really like to know if there is anything less ego-centric behind his actions. As for the rest of your post: I think you're trolling.
What **is** happening, BruceWarne?? You keep telling us we know nothing... why don't you make a point form list of the things you attribute to Mugabe. Here let me start you off (from what I recall):  * nationalising media outlets   * silencing political oposition through both non-violent and violent means (although the violent means are not always directly government applied) : *how many alleged victims of violent silencing there are would be relevant to know*   * confiscation of white farms   * mishandling of confiscation of white farms   * causing starvation and other economic suffering through mismanagement of white farm confiscation program What else? --- I should mention I very much agree with most of you post... except for the part where you advocate the bombing of Zimbabwe. But then, I would rather my nation endure yet another century or two of tyrrany (it presently does not face such) than to have barbarians destroy and desecrate the land and material accomplishments of my ancestors (both direct and national). I do not claim moral superiority, but that is how I feel.
I don't troll. If we disagree, we disagree.  There are individuals very reverently "worshiped" in my country as well who, on closer examination, are far less worthy than the average person's attitude would suggest.  But maybe Mandela is one of the few genuine heroes of incredible virtue out there.  I don't know.
rah, sorry to destroy your illusions.  I was in Zimbabwe in 2001 with my brother and his girl-friend, we traveled through Southern Africa (South Africa, Botswana, Zimbabwe and Zambia) because we wanted to see the eclipse in Zambia.  In Hwange National Park we had our first encounter with Mugabe in the form of a three-meter (10 feet) portrait in the entrance room. This alone disturbed me; which kind of people do really like huge portraits of themselves ?  Anyway, we befriended a camp guard in the National Park. During our stay in Zimbabwe we ran out of gas in Vic Falls and were forced to buy it on the black market (So the crisis on the supply markets was already showing; the Zimbabwe dollar had already a high inflation rate).  We tried to keep in contact and the letters we received are getting worse and worse. No maize meal, no tourists coming, etc. After a year (I sent money in letters, this is not a Western Union land) the contact finally broke because some letters disappeared and Martin wasn't even able to buy stamps.  From my viewpoint the tribal structure in Zimbabwe isn't so much a problem, but I was only one week there.  So my views of Mugabe is quite....negative. 
Comrade.  You mean, doubleplusgood, comrade!  ;)
Rah, sorry I have to get some work done here - can we continue this debate later? Google for Mugabe site:za for more info. Or go live there for a while. Yes, the West only gives attention to the man because of his confiscation of white owned farms. In South Africa however, he gets coverage for what he does to blacks.  Free press in Zim is all but dead - so unfortunately you can't really expect to get an unbiassed Zimbabwean view on the situation (you'd either get views from zim journalists who have been deported or from those who are working for the government).
You are right. I modded it up primarily because I think it is fostering interesting discussions.
BruceWarne--I am in no hurry to finish our debate. I would appreciate though if you stopped telling me to move to Zimbabwe.  We both know it isn't going to happen.  Surely that fact does not preclude me from being able to intelligently reason based on available data.  And the "move to Zimbabwe" comments (as well as some of your other comments) make me wonder whether you are trying to arouse "white man's guilt" in me. I have no white man's guilt.  As noted in another comment of mine on this page, I find being generalised as a "white man" rather offensive.  My ancestors were not, and my national was not one that participated or benefitted from African exploitation.  I am not beholden to my African neighbours any more than I am to other people the same skin-colour as me; nor am I automatically fraternal toward or prejudiced against either group. If I misinterpreted you, I apologise; and please do not take it personally.  Just wanted to make sure we are on the same page on this point. I'll look at some Zimbabwen stuff as I can find it on Google tomorrow.  Hopefully it will provide me with some additional insight. ;-) Have a good day at work!
This is an update from Web Design World San Francisco about Web 2.0. Finally someone discusses whether or not Web 2.0 is a marketing ploy.
investing thru stock markets is never a win-win strategy
Ah but American English was a fully native speaking English community from day 1. The grammar of American and British English is effectively identical. Whereas Indian English was a second language to Indians that basically became a creole language, and is only now being de-creolised.  The grammar of your average Indian English speaker is considerably different to American and British English. For example "Do you have a pen?" is often said as "You have pen, no?" in Indian English. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indian_English#Grammar_tweaks
well if the intention was to be offensive then they get 10 out of 10.  if it was to be funny then they get 7.
This should give you some more background:  http://www.news24.com/News24/Africa/Zimbabwe/Home/ 
This is from a program aired in mid-2003. I doubt that 75% of Americans still believe the invasion was a good idea.
If this story had any basis then there would be a class action lawsuit rather than a $20 eBook.
My goodness, what a pompous windbag... you'll need your hip-waders to make it through this mess.
Mugabe and the idiots who voted him into power got what they deserved.  Lets see how long it takes them to beg for food from the colonial powers.   Wait, I forgot, South Africa will probably end up paying for everything again...
I've found the mapper/packer distinction useful for understanding certain types of conflicts, but it's not really black and white.
I'll leave it to other members to attack your racist views. Just this:  I'm a white South African, and I've been living quite a nice life here under a BLACK government for the past 12 years. Violent crime is ridiculously high, and AA is applied in a fashion that can definitely be seen as reverse discrimination. But for the rest all is going quite well. I live a better life than my parents ever did. The economic policy is up there with the best. SA's foreign debt has been paid off a long time ago. If they could get rid of violent crime it would be one of the best places in the world to live. But, alas, it is violent crime and not generally bad/black government that is driving emigration at the moment.  I also feel that race relations in SA are generally much better than in most places in the US.
Nobody cares. The Nazis are so last century.  You Nazi-haters need to give it a break. Why not go back to picking on the Caananites for a change?
Those who know what Commodore 64 means remember awesome game called Galaga. Bugatron is a cool 3D remake of Galaga and runs on any PC.  Quite cool.
Whites suffer from violent crime and AA. But most are extremely patriotic. We're a strange bunch down here - the world will never truly understand us. Most people who had problems with the new political setup emigrated 10 years ago. The people who are leaving now are doing so because of the fear of violent crime. Just before the elections in 1994 a general in the army told a general in the police: "With your men and mine, we could take this country in an afternoon". The other general replied: "Yes, we could. But what do we do tomorrow morning? All the problems will still be there". A war would have accomplished nothing but delay the inevitable for a few decades. And the generation who would have had to fight that war (my generation) were not prepared to offer themselves on the altar of their grand-parents' idiotic ideas. Oh, yes, most of the perpetrators of violent crime are not even from SA, but from Rwanda, the Congo, and elsewhere. Ex child soldiers.
"Its 1942, and there is an unbelievable amount of shit happening all over the world, all at the same time." Noel Stephenson, Cryptonomicon (not strictly from the start of the book).
You guys want to take this budding little love affair off-line?
How is observing what blacks do racist? Is it not the case that blacks do that stuff? If blacks do that stuff, how is it racist to conclude that blacks tend to reduce societies? Also, the fact that you've had it good does nothing to dispute the fact that black rule has been hell for millions of people, blacks, whites and coloreds. For the mass of people, but especially whites, it has been a huge loss. Also, if the government's job is to control crime (and not, say, private industry), how can you but blame the black government for failing to keep things in check?  You aren't making sense.
I'm as much of a Feynmaniac as anyone but why does anything vaguely associated with him automatically go to 100 points? If he and Paul Graham had a baby would that become the new reddit mascot? In fairness seeing as they are male and ones dead it probably should.  My second favorite piece by him http://wwwcdf.pd.infn.it/~loreti/science.html  the other is on reversible computers.
"Wild animals never kill for sport. Man is the only one to whom the torture and death of his fellow creatures is amusing in itself."-    Froude
you sir are a karma whore- and I am a karma whore for calling you on it!
The worst part for me is that many countries still believe what America does is the golden standard, ie. it must be emulated at all costs.  In my opinion this emotion/heart/faith over rational thought approach is already becoming a global trend.  Sad days, sad days indeed :(. The funniest (saddest as well) part for me of the essay/article was with regards to anticipating the levee problems in New Orleans:  "... The poor bastards in the Ninth Ward certainly anticipated it. Hell, four generations of folksingers anticipated it." I grew up with one of dem songs :).
Investing thru stock markets is never a going to be a win-win strategy
"There are some things you can't share without ending up liking each other."- J. K. Rowling
His speech on the state of science a thousand years from now is awesome, too. Read it in "Perfectly Reasonable Deviations From The Beaten Track"  http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0738206369/002-6891420-1110428?v=glance&amp;n=283155
I never saw that before, so I'm glad it was posted.
Very well remarked. Indeed, for every book in the list I read (a shamingly low number), rereading that first sentence brought back the entire atmosphere of the book. I remember a thriller by Stephen Hunter that started with "Lamar had the biggest dick of the entire prison." or something along those lines :)
no queezle. we call those snobs or assholes here in the US.
... and then the editor of France Soir got fired:  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/europe/4672642.stm
It is not new, but still a very interesting short read.
Not much to add to this except: Good Call. you're absolutely right.
And you can bet our representatives up on the Hill stopped stuffing cash in their pockets long enough to hear them.
I never meant to say you did.  My point is that your post -- "Michelle Malkin's thoughts are unclean!" -- detracts from the debate at large. If we were all more interested in quality of ideas and less interested in their source, we could try and think up some real solutions instead of just shrugging at each other and saying "...but what can you do?", while the lunatic fringes bicker. 'cause there damn sure isn't a lot of thinking going on in Palestine right now.
This site is a plagiarized rip off of the original: http://www.4q.cc/chuck/index.php?topthirty ~jeff
"Double Standards In the West" ! What, do you think this is a college application essay or something?  WTF? **Of Course** there's a double standard in the west.  Westerners are self-interested just like everyone else.  We'll fight for our strategic interests, which means "our best guess about how to preserve our way of life."  Sometimes we're wrong, and it's never very noble, but it's arguably better than any other hegemonic power in human history. I refer you to my post below: which of those other options would you luminaries have us pursue?
What about all the idiots who stayed home to protest Mugabe's rigging the vote?
" Do remember that defendants are always Mr, Mrs, Miss until convicted, however obvious their guilt and appalling their crimes. ". Who said standards were slipping?
You've just totally mischaracterized the American South.  It's not like that here.  I'd say only about half the population is really unhappy about the 'mestizo invasion', which has been important economically regardless.  Black-on-black crime is much more common than black-on-white crime.  And if the mass media is controlled by an elite that's hostile to the majority, that would make it a lot like plantation farming, wouldn't it?
Maybe he should try [skiing](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/england/lincolnshire/4665494.stm)
Who the hell approves of talk like this?  How many accounts do you have, pica? Even if were true it's off-topic and inflammatory. CLARIFICATION: I'm trying to say that "Liberals are habitual liars" is a dumb generalization to make.  That's all.
Perhaps the author and all the other "haters" (I love it when ghetto expressions go mainstream) should work on producing something better, instead of just complaining. In the author's own words (page 18): "Unix survives only because everyone else has done so badly." Well said.   
Pica's point was that the Southerners of long ago would not have given up. The modern day population is different, and thinks differently.  The now dead Southerners would not be happy at all to see how things are. The interesting thing about South Africa is that the people who decided to throw in the towel are still alive.   
When picking "best lines", there's a choice. You can either pick ones that stand well alone, or ones that are powerful in the context of the story and pretty much meaningless otherwise. A lot of these are in the second group, but kudos on the Pride and Prejudice opener; that's a terrific book.
I approve of such frank, honest discussion of important topics, race included.
I do. To many, the whole discussion thread is practically offtopic and inflammatory, including your statement.  
And if George Washington could see New York or D.C., he'd go nuts.
Is there a link anywhere to the original article that got the guy fired?
http://ieblog.members.winisp.net/images/main-browsing-ui.jpg I don't know what specifically is wrong with this but it is a thing of great evil.
It's nicer to link [the print version](http://www.wired.com/wired/archive/14.02/mayfield_pr.html) of the article, rather than the second page. Just a lot easier to read.
Call of Cthulhu isn't really a novel. I still modded you up tho, because it's such a great opener.
I'm no fan of Fox - far from it - but it was Gee Dub that said it first, not Fox.
This is one of the more mature, fair comparisons of the uses of the two languages that I have seen here.  The author acknowledges that there are many factors that skew his results, so he accepts that his conclusion can only be that Ruby can be a viable alternative to Java and may, sometimes, be better. I may give Ruby a try knowing that it has its uses in my field of software development.
I wonder why it was modded down. Was this a less valid contribution than any of the others? Or is there just a Gregg Egan hater in the house.
The [Implicit Association Tests](https://implicit.harvard.edu/implicit/) (which sound like what the article is talking about, though it calls them association tests) are really cool. I'm not going to go into how they work because it might change how you do them, but doing one or two can be surprising.
RTFA. They document how the White House started spinning it and Fox fell in line.
True, it's not really black and white.  Still I must admit this was like a bolt from the blue: I was wondering why everyone else in my office was so *stupid*.  By adopting this guy's point of view (that some people pack and others map) I can see that I could view myself as a mapper and most other people in my office as packers - and that they only seemed stupid to me because they don't have really good maps. Anyway I think the guy uses the terms too early, without really defining them until the end of the first chapter, but if you persist the definition comes out.
Entry about Steve Kubby and Corey Maye
Somewhat sadly, I've had to give up on DSL.  Up until a few years ago, I had a T1 provided by my then-employer (sweeeet), but then they decided they wanted to charge me $200/month for the local loop (not so sweet).  That's pretty cheap for a T1, but not cheap enough to make it a justifiable expense just for the upstream bandwidth and other advantages over DSL or cable.  So I used a cable modem for a few months as a quick fallback, then got DSL. It was pretty decent.  Only went down a couple of times during the ~3 years we had it, was fast as the T1 on downstream, and we could cope with the upstream well enough that we didn't move our web sites off of our server at home. But when we moved recently, and the DSL was moved, things went south quick.  For several weeks it didn't work at all.  Then they sent somebody out from Covad and he did some rewiring, and it sort of worked, for a little while (a few days).  Then I started having to reset the modem every day, and it was slowwww when it was up. Eventually we found out that we were just too far from the CO to get reliable or fast service.  So I relunctly investigated cable modem service.  I found out that our local provider, Charter, has a business service with 3Mbps downstream (twice what we got with DSL) and 384Kbps upstream (same as what we got with DSL), with static IP, that you can run servers on freely, for $75/mo.  And you can get it in your home if you know who and how to ask. This is not an endorsement, but the service works well enough for me.  I've only been using it for a few months, though. The point is, though, that the LECs (or at least SBC - now called AT&amp;T again) need to get their acts together if they want to beat out the cable companies.  If they can't provide DSL to somebody living in a house in a very affluent medium-density neighborhood, in a major suburb of a significant city, that is not in any way semi-rural ("out in the boonies"), then they are doing something wrong in my book. 
This is out-of-date now, and hence misleading.  I have my Firefox set to "release", and this morning (2nd Feb) received the FF1.5.0.1 update - the article was written on the 17th Jan. Hnady for Firefox Beta testers a week or two ago, but useless and confusing now - vote down ;-)
We have always said citizen, citizen.
Thank you for the clarification, but the article was still interesting to me.
Uhhh... me.
There is a prohibition on protests and demonstrations on the capital grounds.  It seems that the Capital Police has now decided that tee-shirts are not protests as they first stated.  OK, they've changed their story.  I'll support them either way and defer to their judgment. Even so, the expulsion of Sheehan and Young does not cause me to worry about free speech in this country. In the Gaza Strip armed gunmen took over some EU offices because of a political cartoon!  The newspaper in Denmark that published the cartoons has received a bomb threat.  Arab countries have withdrawn ambassadors. Which of these two situations is better evidence of intolerance of free speech? 
Agreed, Malkin at best is a half-assed version of Ann Cooters.
It is about amasing Eastern spiritual sound ie - stylised mantras
There is not a real difference between Protestent and Catholic countries in Europe, maybe 20 years ago but not so much now.
http://www.mnftiu.cc/mnftiu.cc/war52.html What part of No More 9/11's don't you understand, Constitution Boy?
A very interesting idea to create a 10,000 year clock. To build the clock, a mountain in Nevada was brought and the clock build into the cliff face.
I'm not a big fan of the traffic circle.  You should try it in MA!  You're likely to see 3 lanes of cars instead of 2 =p
google stock
This post is somewhat misleading now as many people are now going to think that they are in a beta channel instead of the release channel.  Hopefully mozilla will update their site to reflect the change.
I do not understand the theft accusation. ExxonMobile made a lot of money because of a natural disaster. They had a larger market share in a market that had the same demand but limited resources. I just don't get where the "theft" was.
Guy Kawasaki is a fascinating guy and all, but does every one of his blog posts need to be posted here?
So you are saying that a hybridised capitalist/communist economy is more successful than a purely capitalist one.
Well, I have noticed in my life that once I patiently applied myself to things I had never considered that I could ever be any good at (and had avoided having anything to do with for that reason), I made much more progress than I would have thought possible. For example, I had never so much as touched a piano until my son and daughter started taking lessons.  So I began helping them with their lessons, doing it with them.  Within a few months, having only practiced a few hours a week, I was playing pieces I would have thought would take me much longer to learn. I am sure Paul Graham, when he makes assertions like, "they'd get suprisingly far" is drawing on personal experiences in which he tackled a subject out of necessity and was suprised at how far he got in a reasonable time.  I am also pretty sure, in comparing notes with other people, the he noticed he wasn't the only one to notice this. He then puts the observation in an essay and it resonates with lots of people. Now, that is hardly a double blind study, if that was what you were looking for, but it isn't as if the only useful things we know are what we learn from double blind studies. Observing patterns in one's own life and comparing notes with others is, I think, how we learn quite a bit of our practical knowledge. 
It's not an either/or thing. If you measure your principles or morals relatively, it's a good indicator that don't have any.
diskspace is cheap, but disk writing time isnt, is it? i was worried that would be the tradeoff. but i'm guessing my bottleneck is my internet connection, not my disk speed or RAM. i tried the program last night and it seems pretty good. works well, good options and it connects for a couple of torrents i was unable to with bitcomet. i'm not sure why that is, but if it works, i wont concern myself with why bitcomet failed. it does seem like i'm connecting with much fewer peers than i did with bitcomet. i probably just need to mess around with the settings.
Been a huge fan of findory for a long time. To this day I think is is the best blog/news recommendation site I have found.
As a thought experiment, I wonder what it would be like if instead of building their own stores, companies like a Starbucks franchised existing coffee houses, helping them cut costs through collective purchasing power of the franchises, helping them manage their books, etc, while still letting the franchisees maintain their own quirky style.  Probably not as much profit to be made that way, but would it be viable nonetheless?
Similar to launch.yahoo.com but it's recommendations are based on song qualities as opposed to how many people like it. Leads to being much less of a popularity contest. It's become my main method of discovering new music.
Of course they do. Reddit was actually designed as a Joel on software/Paul Graham/Guy Kawasaki/Dilbert greatest hits archive. The rest is just spam that will be dealt with eventually.
Next to www.pandora.com I think Launch is the best system out there for discovering new music. People always focus on it's online selection of music but the real beauty of yahoo music is helping you discover new music.
&gt;How do I read ppt files? Very carefully. &gt;Thanks. You're welcome. If you really want to though, you can get a powerpoint viewer for free off microsoft's site.
I feel so retarded for laughing my ass off at those.
You make some sense, but I think there's a huge difference between personal property (pen, book, car, home), and ownership of the majority of land by a small class of landlords who acquired the land violently in the first place.   I think the concept that people can own land - maybe apart from a working farm or allotment - is ridiculous. The land has been there millions of years - all of us just pass over it. Except some people try to stop others passing over it.
www.last.fm rules them all!
Wow, looks like it sucks less. Somehow I imagine that wasn't difficult.
My Miata can reach speeds significantly higher than is usually safe. It does so in response to user input, in a fairly predictable way. Perhaps I should sue Mazda.
Another music recommendation site in the same vein as yahoo launch and pandora. Probably more similar to yahoo then pandora.
"Domestic Spying" is as loaded a term as "Terrorist Surveillance."   If you're going to bash someone, can't you choose some better wording for your title. I don't like when I see my allies in this "surveillance without warrant" argument botching it so badly.
That sounds nice but is hopelessly Utopian. In the real world there are shades of grey.  If you insist on making everything black and white you'll be disappointed time and time again. Freedom of Speech (for example) is not absolute.  If you think it is then you haven't thought about it too much.
It was funny as hell, makes me want to go get one just to see if I can scare the hell out of my wife.
ESR(the subject of this piece) is a tool. Neither his code nor his nebulous "support of the movement" contributions to OSS are of any real value. He sees causation in the spouting off that he has done for years and the recent business interest in open source. All I see is correlation, and a lot of bandwidth wasted on hot air.
It's too cluttered... too many buttons trying to get your attention. Compare it to the Safari UI:  http://www.apple.com/macosx/features/safari/
Javascript is often looked down on for how it is commonly used instead of being evaluated on its merits as a language. The more I play with it the more I realize how wrong I was in treating it as a piece of junk.
Has got to be the most useless quote I have seen in an article. Bad enough I had to point it out. The quoted doesnt seem to have any credentials or anything to add. Some redemption in the 2nd page of the article though.   &gt;"It (was) smart on their part," said Sreenath Sreenivasan, the dean of students at the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism. "They didn't go after some guy who sold 5,000 copies. They went after a guy who sold 3.5 million copies."
Yes, China has a mixed economy. Unlike Russia which underwent a rapid, shock transition to private ownership. (Sarcasm Warning!) What an economic dynamo they unleashed right? Russia's economy has contracted pretty much every year since the fall of Communism, and is now smaller than Belgium's.
Anyone know where you can find a copy of the complete list? I tried Google, but with no luck.
We all know by now that you can't believe a thing he says.
The way to get the best decisions made about running the British Railway system is to put you in charge? 
&gt;Kids would rather be the way they came into the world:  &gt;naked. And as they adapt to the world of clothing, extra  &gt;layers -- particularly coats -- add to their heightened  &gt;perception of constriction. &gt;"It feels like they're being really tightly bound, and it  &gt;feels bad," I dissagree.
Please tell me Prez. W isn't THIS stupid!  Please?
"Guyyyyyy Kawasakkiiiii" is what Chuck Norris exclaims prior to roundhouse kicking you in the head.
I guess we have to look a little harder.  http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0433116/
Neuromancer isn't great literature, but its first line (which is included in this list) is one that has always stuck in my mind, word for word: "The sky above the port was the color of television, tuned to a dead channel." It's hard to imagine an opener that could possibly have the set mood any better.
DB has become a millionaire because of newspapers. He thinks that they are finished. He may well be right.
First, you send the author a nasty email about how Powerpoint is evil... then you download [Openoffice](http://openoffice.org).
You don't see Bush driving himself around in a beat-up Ford Tempo because millions of Americans are too poor to afford health insurance.
free version?
Downvoted due to the obnoxious back-button-breaking redirect, not the content.
Did anybody think to cache this? Coral isn't working, and the site appears to be down.
Easy tutorial on howto add album art to you songs.
It would be more energy efficient to have people travel in bulk, but you have to run the trains/buses/whatever all the time so people will pay attention to your system at all.  That means that outside of rush hour, you'll be operating your trains/buses/whatever with very light loads, but at approximately the same cost in energy.  So you have to hope that you make up during peak hours what you lose during the rest of the day, and that only happens in very dense cities with large numbers of people that work bankers' hours.
Chill out guys it's just a cool political simulation game that lets you recreate 2004 election.
Have we met before? On digg perhaps?
This is interesting, but it's different from AT&amp;T's desire to charge companies like Google or Vonage directly for the ability to reach the end users of their network unimpeded. What Verizon is basically saying is that they are implementing QoS for their IPTV service.  They're carving out 80% of their backbone capacity for guaranteed bandwidth that they believe they will need to support that service.  This is not really controversial IMNSHO.  If IPTV usage causes other services to suffer, they'll end up having to adjust or they'll lose customers who need reliable Google access (or whatever).  Cable operators will love this.  WiMax startups will flourish. So this is interesting for people who are interested in IPTV, network carrier strategies (Verizon's in particular), etc.  But I don't see why Congress should care if Verizon shoots itself in the foot. 
Fringe speculation -- "Vince Foster was murdered" redux
"They have absolutely no taste ... and i don't mean that in a small way" -- Steve Jobs
Hmmm
*its bandwidth* its = belonging to it it's = it is
Thanks, borga, for making reddit just like slashdot. That's a great contribution to mankind, too.
hilarious
I'm no MS fanboy, but one thing IE7 (or Opera) has over Firefox is that there is a new tab button on there by default. I'm not sure mom would know about ctrl+t or customising toolbar. As tabbed browsing is touted as a main feature, the new tab button should be there ... anybody agree?
Just plain funny.
These Shot Glasses are faithful reproductions of a Winchester 12-gauge shell, terrific for a collection or for actual double-barrel enjoyment!
Yeah, it's OK.
I like much of what he says, but I have some fundamental issues with the mapper/packer distinction as just too simplistic. The funny thing was when I realized I was a mapper in some areas, but a packer in others. Most people are. The less interested I am in a subject, the less likely I am to expend the energy to create a map. My curiosity has few limits, but my energy does. If I can "get by" in a subject of which I have no permanent interest by learning just enough by rote to function, I will do so. Further, packing has its advantages in some cases. Creating a map, at least for me, usually ties into the emotional system - witness a hacker who cringes at ugly code.  I've seen teachers who can map through the entire theory of teaching, and of their subject, but can't associate concepts on computers. Notice that they love teaching, but have no interest in learning any more than they have to about a computer. This is a conditioned response; in a school system, the teacher who knew their way around a computer ended up with additional (unwanted) responsibilities. I found mapping and packing as useful constructs of information gathering, but much less useful as a personality trait.
I told you so, the site sells cheap downloadable software.
what a tempest in a teapot.. c'mon dawkins, religion is okay, fundamentalism, not so much...  i mean, ye wouldn't kick the crutch out from under some geezer would ye, where's the sport in that?  /.02 cents (cdn)
Umm... maybe I wasn't clear - the fact that some people want to censor some cartoons doesn't make the US a bastion of free speech _simply by comparison_. Principles by definition are not relative. That is nothing to do with seeing the world in black and white terms (quite the opposite).
do they explain anything about the ton of bugs?
You could just, y'know, not post comments dissing every article posted here.  Or, I dunno, make a point every now and then or something.
All the people you listed have a style that makes their writings often come off as The Absolute Truth, true. As a critical thinker, however, it is your job to filter out any biases and extract any useful information and insights. Is that too much to ask?
First let me go on record that, as a libertarian, I have serious problems with much of what Bush has done.  That having been said, the headline is yet another instance of someone making things up for their own purposes. From the article: "Prime Minister Blair responded that he was: 'solidly with the President and ready to do whatever it took to disarm Saddam.'" Notice the word "disarm".  You don't talk about disarming someone who you know has no arms. Also from the article "He [Bush] went on: 'It was also possible that a defector could be brought out who would give a public presentation about Saddam's WMD'". Clearly, according to the article, Bush and Blair both believed there were WMDs. Why do people make up things like the headline to the post above?  Is it that they are part of the "loony left" and are desperately hoping if you repeat a lie often enough someone will believe it?  Or is it someone working on the "radical right" putting out postings to make the left look loony? No matter what is going on, it is harmful to the rest of the world.  Events are hard enough to understand without disinformation being added to the mix.
I'm using this instead of Firefox. Its just cleaner in my opinion. There's less in the way. Plus IE just renders faster.
Wasn't 4k basic written on an altair emulator running on a Harvard PDP-10 running TOPS-10 which students did not have permission to use for commercial work? Gates was already a hypocrite 30 years ago.
The author thinks that compressing pages with zlib makes PHP run faster - in fact PHP should run slower (albeit marginally) if zlib compression is enabled.  However, the amount of data transmitted to the client is less, making the load time quicker, provided the PHP code isn't poky.
Personally, I don't have a problem with seeing his blog posts on reddit as long as the posts are interesting and insightful.  I do see how it could get old, though.  Maybe reddit needs a soapbox.reddit.com special-interest site for the Kawasaki/Graham/Spolsky-esque posts.
Yes, that is a bit disturbing.
Do they have a FreeBSD version, or will I have to use my Linux compatibility module? (-:
I propose we go along with Robert Anton Wilson's naming scheme, and give all Kuiper objects Disney names. So we've got Pluto, UB313 could be Mickey, and the next one we find would of course be Goofy.
No, I don't think so, why?
I also have problems with what Bush has done but.... The title of the article is "The White House Memo".  The article goes on to say: "Channel 4 News has seen minutes from that meeting.....". What is this memo? What are these minutes?  The rest of the article just quotes a book by someone who was not at the supposed meeting, nor are there any claims that the author saw any memos or minutes. 
OpenOffice.org has a FreeBSD version, and handles the .ppt quite well enough.  Open it with the 'Impress' piece of OO.o, and then press F5 to fullscreen.  Left-click for next page, right-click for previous.
Note to myself - Play with Erlang's SDL interface!
My recollection is that the default computer use agree, gave Harvard 50% of Commercial Proceeds lets see 50% of M$ is ...  (Not that Harvard needs it.)
Why anyone expected different is beyond me - as soon as government and business intersect, the customer/public loses.  Keep them seperate!
oooooooooold
All illegal aliens are undocumented workers. These sets are equivalent. All people put under NSA surveillance are NOT terrorists. Only a tiny fraction are. These sets are NOT equivalent. So, logically speaking, "Terrorist Surveillance" is NOT equivalent to "NSA Surveillance"
I like having the tab bar when there is only one tab because otherwise the tab bar appears when you open your second tab and everything moves. :( I use tabbrowser prefernces to enable this feature.
dupe: http://reddit.com/goto?id=16n4 
A better headline makes all the difference ...although we should have caught the dupe in the first place.
**Correction**: *months* before the invasion; *days* before going to the UN. My stupid mistake. The point stands though.
My old left wing college professors, who want to believe this crap, would blush if they saw it. You need to go no further than his monetary blatherings to realize this kid believes what he saw on X-files. A few reasons why the administration won't roll divisions into Iran anytime soon:  1) Domestically, they couldn't sell it unless an ayatollah was filmed sitting on some newly-made nukes on CNN with a promise to drop them on American cities. Folks may not have noticed, but domestic approval ratings for the president, and in particular, the Iraq war, are quite low. 2) Iraq is a country of about 26m people, and are split into different ethnic groups and religious sects that love to hate each other. Though few want foreign troops to stick around, most were happy to see Saddam brought down. Iran has nearly 3 times the population of Iraq, and are overwhelmingly of one religious sect, and by most reports, a lot more cohesive than Iraq. Occupying Iran would entail numbers of US troops that would dwarf the Iraq numbers. As a preemptive war, it just wouldn't fly politically. 3) Whatever one may think the Bush administration's intent is, they are working for a stable Iraq. Few viable conspiracy theories suggest otherwise. Going into Iran would likely send the *relatively* stable Shiite south of Iraq into a frenzy, and would empower those attempting to destabilize in other regions too. This is also why they will be hesistant to bomb specific sites, or to let Israel do so. There are many other reasons, but those are the big boys that come to mind. Oh yeah, the Bush administration won't have **any** help for a coalition this time.   Hurry up and disagree with me, I feel it coming...
Not bad, not bad at all
I myself bemoan the level of screechyheadedness that permeates American politics, but I'm going to have to disagree with you. When someone illegally puts me under surveillance, they are -spying- on me.
Damn, I already have most of these.  Except the baby doll t-shirt.  But let's not go there. 
Yep
Actually I submitted this with a similar headline a while ago, it kept getting dislikes so I deleted it.  I guess I shouldn't have given up so easily. 
And that's the art of maintaining code that wasn't written by you. Suppressing the urge to run away or change everything. I have to maintain code in two languages I wouldn't have chosen for these projects. One choice was a bit of a design failure, too. But it works. And money can be made with it. 
The title says it all
I didn't claim the US was a bastion of free speech (in some sort of absolute sense).  According to your statement, if I observe that the situation is far, far, far worse outside the US then I have no principles or morals because I made that comparison? If you choose to label the Cindy Sheehan incident as 'severe', how to you label  the cartoon incident?  As 'severely severe'?  My original post and subsequent posts were trying to point out that using 'severe' to describe the actions of the Capital Police skews the discussion such that it becomes difficult to make  any kind of distinction because every situation is considered 'severe'. While I would certainly agree that there are free speech concerns in the United States, the situation can hardly be called severe within the larger global or historical context. Can the situation in the US be improved?  Sure, but it is much, much, much better than most of the rest of the world (including much of Europe).
So is this available in the US?
It's not free, you've got to buy it
No, chucknorrisfacts.com has a pretty face and wants to sell you crappy stuff. ;)
Who do you think owns the railways prior to them being nationalized?  Individuals (perhaps as a group via individual choice to enter into a corporate or partnership agreement). You guys need to read up a bit on libertarianism, socialism, private property, capitalism, communism, and so on. It is reasonable to put forth arguments for state ownership but don't pretend that you are not arguing *against* private ownership and individual economic choices  (e.g., Do I want to sell my property or not?). Take a look at the recent Kelo v. New London decision by the US Supreme Court to get a sense of the various points of view with respect to private property and public interests.
This could be an interesting development.
I agree with shaper_pmp  This wasted my time, because I didn't notice the article was out of date.  Also, it's easier to look at about:config than to go editing .js files
Jeez. So what's the website address?
Sounds like a fine compromise (on whether to call it a planet or not)
i'm actually not complaining. i'm just not sure how i like that. and i figure if anyone else tries to submit the article they will end up here. sorry if i ruined a great article but this is pretty big news... not something you wont see elsewhere
I really needed a good laugh today.
Google is your friend.   "cellphone tracking" turns up several likely-looking candidates, though that's not to say he used one of those.
make sure you have the Google Toolbar installed
Big Brother is wathing you...and soon everyone else will too, it seems.
what a bizarre and interesting article, but why are the articles in this magazine so long
Now that's sneaky: posting an article on Reddit that on its turn links to a list Paul Graham and Guy Kawasaki articles... Hmmm...
My hope is that you are right...but  1) Bush's approval ratings can't go a lot lower and remember that he's a lame duck, so who cares, if he furthers the neocons agenda?  2)I don't think it would start out as a war, but as air raids.  The UGLY Iran/Iraq war of the 80's was a stalemate, despite the fact that the US backed Iraq.  3)whether or not they are working towards a stable Iraq, the simple fact is they underestimated what it would take to occupy Iraq for 3 years. A lot of this article is over-hype right now, but if it gets to the point where Bush decides to do bombing runs of nucular facilities, escalation could follow. No doubt a drawn-out war in the west of Iran and an escalation of war in Iraq would be awfully profitable for Cheny's friends and you are assuming that we understand all of the neocons' motivations.
for those of you wondering, the website he's talking about is http://www.world-tracker.com/. It only works in the UK for now, though the website says they have plans of extending the service to the US.
Great Title you've for that website - I would like it enriched with daily news ;-)
Who are Paul Graham and Guy Kawasaki?  Do these names often come up here?
It is sickening what the West is doing under the guise of "Democracy" and "Freedom". The cartoon is clearly offensive to Muslims and should be apologized for.
Online books, articles and audio etc. from Noam Chomsky.
I guess Micro-Soft's bad experience with the hobbyist market explains why [their stance on DRM](http://dooooooom.blogspot.com/2006/01/drm-go-go.html) is:   &gt; We don't want this technology to be available to every hobbyist. We need to keep the number of licensees down to a manageable number. We charge a license fee to keep the number of people we have to deal with down to a level we can handle. If only those hobbyists hadn't used Atair BASIC warez!
It's even easier to track someone's phone than he makes out in the article. You don't even need physical access to a person's phone. If all that person has to do is reply with "LOCATE" or some other canned response, then all someone has to do is use a 'prank' text message provider which allow you to send SMS messages which appear to come from any number you set. Obviously that person will still receive the original messages from the tracking service, but most of them will probably think it's spam. Virgin in the UK are the only network not providing tracking data to companies like this.  Scary stuff.
"The cartoon is clearly offensive to Muslims and should be apologized for." Give me a break, the uproar caused by those cartoons show how the sick and radicalized sections of Islam actually speak for the Muslim world at this moment. How can a cartoon in Denmark cause such a problem? I mean how messed up in the head do you actually have to be to give a crap about something like that. We have our beliefs, they have theirs. We believe in freedom of press, they don't. If that causes them offence big deal. 
a cool news site
your work treats you like a two yearold.
What are the languages?  I don't want to bother.
Wow, how cool is that!!!!
Could you please explain the concept of "offensive" to me. People seem to use this word to suppress all kinds of things, from sex or violence in games, movies, TV,... to parodies, satire and other political or (anti-)religious content. From my perspective it looks like "offensive" is a term always used when there are no real, objective arguments why something is bad. Usually the content in question is just "bad because our tradition says so" which is not the best argument to have especially when advocating strong measures like censoring of the free press.
I'd never heard of SawStop before. The videos on their website are amazing!
There's also a Jack Bauer one too (although there's plenty of crossover):   http://www.notrly.com/jackbauer/index.php?topthirty 
ROTFLOL :)
am I crazy or this is obvious? Damn ...
Well, years f Usenet and mailing lists have taught me that the path to enlightment is hitting the 'Send' button.  Writing things out, as opposed to simply mulling them over in your head, is a pysical process that seems to inoke different thinking modes.   And hitting 'send' is the trigger that reveals the answer after you've announced your ignorance.  So maybe making yourself the recipient is a way to get the best of both worlds. (Here's hoping this very post isn't too ironic ...)
See also: http://reddit.com/info?id=01607 a day earlier
Balanced ternary arithmetic  http://www.mortati.com/glusker/fowler/ternary.htm Setun computer - 1958  http://www.icfcst.kiev.ua/MUSEUM/PHOTOS/setun-1.html
Hey! These guys are ripping off -- oh, yeah, JEFF beat me to that post.
"Remember you're theoretically writing this to the smartest, busiest person you know," that's not a theory in my case. I actually don't know anybody.
&gt;half of americans already support war with iran right now, according to a poll released feb 2. Maybe you took the poll yourself, 'cause I sure couldn't find it anywhere. Provide a link. &gt;at the very least there is a real possibility israel...will be helping In gulf war I, the US provided Israel with Patriot missile batteries. The US insisted (begged) Israel not to retaliate when Saddam dropped scuds on them. Saddam hoped to pull them into the war, for that would have made it nearly impossible for the Arab governments in the region to maintain their support. The hatred of Israel is one of the greatest unifying factors in the region. In the current Iraq war, you will find no Israelis around. They would be very helpful, but there was a very conscious decision to keep them out of it. Do your homework. Also, with respect to a few of the European governemnts that initially contributed troops to the current Iraq war: Spanish government: tossed from office. Italian government: about to be tossed from office. British government: Took major losses in the recent election. Europeans electorate as a whole: More opposed than ever. &gt; what they want is access to oil, a puppet regime to them is just bonus points If this is true (I believe it is much more complicated than *just* oil) then they need stability to get oil out. Production in Iraq still has not reached the pre-war output numbers. Besides this, by looking at their actions post-invasion, you can discern that they are working for stability, regardless of the often moronic mistakes they make in attempting to do so.
not quite quite the same thing, but take a look at [Mologogo](http://www.mologogo.com/)
If I manage to do anything real with Common Lisp one day, consider his point proven. Until that day, the jury is out.   
I would guess that congress might be upset about so much of our nations bandwidth running through a single provider. Also there might be some lobbying by cable tv to try and stave off the growth of IPTV. Personally I think that as long as demand for more bandwidth exists someone will find a way. Short term this might cause some growing pains, but long term verizon will either put up more bandwidth or increase the amount publicly available. That and someone else could fill the space as well.
If we are allowed to quote things not directly from the start of a book, the passage in Snow Crash about being the baddest motherfucker in the world earns high marks.
Exactly what I thought. I used to work at a Subway as a teen. What exactly is so beautiful as a package wrapped like a sandwich? They must not eat subs in Japan.
Democracy is more than just elections.  
Freedom does not mean everyone has to agree. Freedom means that everyone gets to express their opinion. Google on "The bill of no rights" for a bit of satire that might clarify things a little. Specifically: # ARTICLE II -- You do not have the right to never be offended. This country is based on freedom, and that means the freedom for everyone, not just you! You may leave the room, turn the channel, express a different opinion, etc., but the world is full of idiots and probably always will be.   
Next time I'm using a sausage as a push stick, I can rest assured that the sausage is still edible afterwords. This has been a major issue in my workshop. Lots of brats shredded by table saw accidents. If they're so convinced it works, let's see the inventors fingers  and not a cheap hotdog.
Or let's rename Ass Kissing into Schmoozing and pretend like we invented a new form of mathematics.
flattery gets you no where, pandering on the other hand...
I think borga has a point here.  Looking at IE or Exchange, its honestly hard to believe anyone at Microsoft uses their own software.  Even the old Netscape still rendered pages faster than IE.  Exchange always was and is still rubbish! 
Functional languages.
I agree with your post, but do you have any links that debunk the whole Iranian Oil Bourse trading in Euros theory? Will it not hurt the dollar? I found this:  http://www.energybulletin.net/12463.html But it seems to argue in favour of the "monetary blatherings".
Careful... that also makes you the dumbest, laziest person you know.
Also check out http://www.verilocation.com/
morality is relative. there are certain things that you would surely find offensive, that i won't attempt to name. i'm not going to defend the controversy around the cartoons, because to me they're just cartoons and i don't care about them or religion. but if you're suggesting that there are no grounds to being 'offended' perhaps you need to revisit your own views of morality and see if there isn't anything that is, or could be, offensive to you.  as it stands, i am hearing your argument as 'i am normal'. what is taking something too far for you is not ok, what is not that someone else thinks is, has no grounds. you are not normal, or at least are not the measuring device from which to judge the justification for everyone else's sense of right and wrong from. paul graham has an interesting piece of writing titled 'what you can't say', where he discusses the taboos we have in western society now, and how in the future we might find those taboos ridiculous censoring.
The ideas that are getting the most votes are tech related
totally agree.  He's from tech, but he ain't talking tech.  And I'm not here for tech (or at least not software)
&gt; According to your statement, if I observe that the situation is far, far, far worse outside the US then I have no principles or morals because I made that comparison? Not at all, you used that comparison to make the point that the US was tolerant of free speech. This is a bogus argument imo and it could be used to justify almost anything. You may not find it worrying that somebody is arrested for having a statistic printed on her shirt, but to me it's the sort of thing we would criticise in a country like North Korea. The fact is that the US is seen increasingly as a threat by the rest of the world, partly due to these kinds of incident.
I agree that it does seem a bit simplistic.   I wonder if maybe the value of making the mapper/packer distinction so strongly comes from that it puts them in such high contrast. Yes, I map and I pack, and here was presented a mapping concept (meta-mapping?) with which to think about it and even a vocabulary with which to discuss it. My map has grown. (Of course, many mappers around here will have thought about these things before, and recognize these concepts) Mapping appears as a tendency, and one can realize that they have only a small portion of Universe mapped and that they have many flaws in what they do have, i.e. a realistic map of their map. The map is not the territory. One spends a good deal of their life working so I would hope that one would put a good deal of energy and emotion into engaging with that work, or finding some other type of work more engaging. Not bothering to have a map of prime-time T.V. shows does not make you a packer. The Programmers' Stone defines packing at one point as "socially conditioned conventional thinking". Certainly conventional thinking can get you through a conventional day, but, being conditioned, it would be difficult to toss it aside to solve a non-conventional problem. So, to the point, using mapper/packer just to label things or people seems like a packer activity. A mapper can use mapper/packer as a launch-point for thinking about things. 
Uhh...my contention is that English could die today as a spoken language and still rank among the most influential languages ever.  It is already one of the most widespread languages in history, and about a quarter of the world speaks it at some level of competence(1).  The demand for english skills in the other 3/4 of the world is very strong, and does not show any signs of subsiding just yet.  It has exerted influence of unprecedented breadth on other languages, a trend which, again, does not show any signs of subsiding just yet. English is disproportionately the language of science:  about 2/3 of the world's scientific papers are in English.  Latin never had the same distinction, I believe, as it had to share the field with Chinese, Greek and Arabic, and later on, English.   In the face of this, it would seem useful for you to clarify what would qualify as getting into the big leagues of accomplished languages. (1) http://www.britishcouncil.org/english/engfaqs.htm
With regard to the blathering, my dismissal comes primarily from his oversimplification summarized in the quote "The only thing that keeps the dollar afloat is that oil is traded exclusively in greenbacks rather than some other currency". Like the motivations behind the Neocon's push for war in Iraq, the reasons behind the U.S. Dollar's strength is much more complicated then oil being primarily traded in dollars.  That said, I don't think there is any doubt that it derives much of its importance (strength) from being a primary currency used in international commodity transactions. It will hurt the dollar if main producers of oil begin selling their goods in other currencies.  However, alienating the US is not a good idea for the oil producing nations, particularly since the U.S. is the staunchest oil hog out there, and has long maintained unholy alliances with countries such as Saudi Arabia as long as they play along. These regimes generally need the U.S. consumer more than the U.S. needs them. Europe will turn on oil long before the U.S. will, not to mention, Europe won't lead a military charge in defense of oil producing nations, as the U.S. has (see gulf war I). I went looking for some links, and spent most of my time reading the plethora of links that concurred with the one you posted. There are good points, and I believe, a bit of merit, however, not enough merit to override the realities of invading or even bombing Iran. I'll continue to look for what I believe to be a more realist link...as soon as I get done reading through the monetary conspiracy theorist libraries of links that are strangely addictive.
That analogy is incorrect.  The situation is closer to this:  you and I agree that the string of written characters "five" represents the number of fingers on a normal human hand, but I think it is pronouced "fiv", while you think it is pronouced "sank".  
I really enjoyed this article. I have been telling everyone I know to do something they love, but they always, and I mean always, don't believe that it is possible. Whether it is my mom being a librarian because she simply loves books, and figures that there is indeed some tough times that will have to be had before the goal is met, or friends who just don't understand how to translate what they love (what they would do  as work without being paid) into a living. For me, the concept of making money is easy. I am a born entreprenuer, but with all the businesses and ventures I have started, they have always been about money. So yes, I know how to make money. And I do indeed know now after reading this article that you MUST love what you do to get past this 70% barrier I have sufferred from most of my life, except for this brief period when I was in grade 9, living with my father, when I excelled into the 90%+ range, as far as school was concerned. Reflecting now, it was simply because I enjoyed it. And the classes I didn't enjoy at that time, I was in the 70% range. I did it well, because the way you do anything is the way you do everything, but the fact is I did much better by default when I enjoyed what I was doing. So, find what you love. If you love to read, and love literature, figure out why. Maybe you could write reviews for a living? Startup a website and publish them! If it's cars you love, then look at them and see why you enjoy them.  If its the mechanics, become someone that designs cars for a living. Point is, find what you enjoy to do, right now. And see how you would like to spend every hour doing it - without being paid. Money will find its way to you, as long as you enjoy it.
No doubt things are more complex than his oversimplification. I don't think (hope?) Iran is going to be invaded, however the effects of the new oil bourse on the world economy are interesting to consider. Here's another link with some lengthy discussion (make sure you read about Tyrone and Jethro!)  http://www.econbrowser.com/archives/2006/01/strange_ideas_a.html
IE 4 whipped Netscape's butt, IE 5 whipped it so bad that they decided to open source Netscape as Mozilla. IE 6 whipped Mozilla's butt until about 2003, then all the geeks changed to Firefox.   Make no mistake. Nobody liked Netscape 4. I challenge someone to find a review of Netscape 4 than says it's better than IE 4 or 5. I loved Netscape 3, but Netscape 4 crashed so often, and was so slow that I ran to IE 4.
Wasn't St. John of Danforth Clarence Thomas's sponsor? Not that I care, but for The Washington Post, the GOP Center is the girl that would be medium hot if only she'd shave her legs &amp; lose the ugly glasses for some contacts. What Ms. GOP Center doesn't know is that there is a far hotter babe, sometimes Ms. Democratic Leadership Conference, sometimes somebody left of her, and that Mr. Washington Post will drop Ms. GC like a brick if the hotter babe is available. Kind of a cruel game, and one that deserves to be made into a screenplay by Neil LaBute, but amusing in its way.  
"Good government never depends upon laws, but upon the personal qualities of those who govern. The machinery of government is always subordinate to the will of those who administer that machinery. The most important element of government, therefore, is the method of choosing leaders." I feel that has quite a point, since past elections the demo part of democracy is hard pressed to have much more effect. Oh, and I would feel very nerdy quoting that, but I haven't read it:)
As to the poll:  57% Back a Hit on Iran if Defiance Persists  http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/nation/la-na-fornpoll27jan27,0,5687029.story?coll=la-home-headlines Poll: Majority Backs Use of Force in Iran (56%)  http://www.washingtonpost.com/ac2/wp-dyn/A23974-2003Jun23? I Googled iran war poll, also a lot of articles on Google News aggregator.
http://gethuman.com/uk/ for UK
Ass kissing is a lot different from schmoozing. Ass kissing is telling someone how great they are in order to get them to notice you. Schmoozing is being a socially aware person in order to make friends or contacts. Neither can be taught in a blog post, but it is interesting material.
The second link is from June 2003, the first one seems legit.
Good on these folks for taking Walmart to task. I like how they're seeking a total of $75 in damages. It's important to keep the big picture in mind. Emergency contraception really ought to be available over the counter. And the political leadership of the FDA has been thwarting the progress towards changing the status of Plan B. A U.S. Government Accountability Office's [report](http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d06109.pdf) (PDF) discusses the FDA's fishy decision process in depth. But the first paragraph of the "What GAO Found" section gives the gist of it.
I'm all for offensive humour but I would say a few of those particular cartoons are pretty creepy. To me they weren't at all funny and very closely resembled anti-Semitic cartoons of the 30's. I think there would rightly be huge uproar in the West if these cartoons had depicted Jews. It is generally accepted (in Europe at least) that freedom of speech doesn't encompass race-hate.
Next: God hates martyrs - we have statistical proof!
I notice "death by choking on ham sandwich" isn't included in the SUMMARY OF CAUSES OF DEATH
I, for one, mourn the dearth of current artists that are capable of producing an entire *album* of quality tracks.  If more "must have" albums were being created, there would likely be more consumers willing to shell out for ultimately more versatile physical media (without silly copy protection of course).
from [the front page](http://www.speakeasy.net/) click [home/home office](http://www.speakeasy.net/?dis=home). From there, click [onelink dsl](http://www.speakeasy.net/home/onelink/). From there, click [compare dsl pricing](http://www.speakeasy.net/home/compare/) on the upper left hand side.
Were you trying to reply to my comment?  If so, then actually I modded this up.  I was trying to see if BioGeek (and perhaps others) trolled http://del.icio.us/recent for things to post to reddit, since that's what I do.  I think it's a good thing. I also use http://www.populicio.us/newlinks.html  
Right, but are the giant cable ISPs going to pull the same bullshit as SBC &amp; Verizon w.r.t. traffic shaping, web host blackmail, and bandwidth withholding? Are there equivalents to the ILECs for cable internet access? Here in San Francisco, Comcast (cable) provides faster internet service than SBC, but for those of us that don't need or want phone lines or cable TV, DSL is cheaper. Just a tradeoff.
Feynman's own account of this is much longer, and one of his most excellent stories. You can find it in "What Do You Care About What Other People Think?" which is his second collection of anecdotes.
The languages haven't been written yet. But we do have lots of good concepts which have been tested in languages like Haskell and ML, which could really help game development scale better. Functional programming is especially useful when dealing with parallelism, and that's one of the big things Tim Sweeney is after.
sorry about that :-}
Me as well. People are starting to stare! This one just cracked me up:  Chuck Norris once ate three 72 oz. steaks in one hour. He spent the first 45 minutes having sex with his waitress.  It's sooooo stupid, but sooooooooooooooo funny!
http://rentzsch.com/suck/stopStopStopHurtingTheInternet *"I’m glad Microsoft is embracing translucency in Vista’s interface. With any luck, I’ll be able to make their atrocious user interface completely invisible."*
Islam is a religion of peace amongst progressive Muslims. How many they number I don't know. I can't blame them for not wishing to speak out too loudly. Amongst the rest, Islam is a religion of peace in the sense of peace as submission to Allah and to Islamic law, for believers that is, and dhimmitude for non-believers. So, yes, "peace" is misleading in the liberal, Western notion of that word. I think we ought to stop using the expression "religion of peace" with respect to Islam. 
What else did you think it would save?
I reckon there should be some kind of Malkovich Malkovich  Malkovich thing when you vote for reddit itself.
Oh, God, I have no idea. It just too complicated to use to back up any argument you're going cram into one sentence on a bulletin board conversation.
Seriously? Since 1990? Maybe I'm just completely uneducated on the subject. All I've been able to find on the subject is anti-Libertarian, and I haven't been able to find any Libertarian perspectives on Chile after 1995 or so.
No thanks.
good analysis and realistic too.
The Vin Diesel one is pretty funny: http://www.4q.cc/vin/
What you're saying is true, but my concern isn't with nationality of corporations. My concern is with class and property. If rich people do a good job of owning everything, median living standards could fall while net-human-wealth increases. We could be stuck with "what a Pakistani brickmaker would consider to be prosperity" while 1% of the population controls the wealth.
Got all that. And I know what a pitbull looks like. There are people who couldn't tell a long hair chihuahua from a cocker spaniel. Whatever.
I don't see how A) relates to this topic. With B) you are right, but why is Python more random than Java? There are examples even for Haskell used in successful businesses. So the point would be to standardize on the right platform, because if you and your competitor get the standardized-platform bonus, but you get some microsavings as well that's one point for you.
Update: See the guys in question missed out by a handful of runs...
But at least they have an equal chance of getting bank loans. Yes, I'm joking.
Glad to know that happens to other people too - the figuring out what you're asking as you write the question in an e-mail thing that is.
Yes, but the point is, who wants to "establish a relationship before [one] need[s] it"? Do we really want to make friends with people, not because they are fun, or nice, or clever, but because we might need them in the future, regardless of their present qualities?? What could me more boring and materialistic than discussing a specific brand of watches with a VC??? And from the point of view of the person being schmoozed, isn't it weird and unnatural that so many people suddenly love the Breitling talk? Wouldn't it be better if she spoke about Breitling only with people genuinely interested in the subject (any three of them)? Kawasaki's article is all well and good, and full of common sense (I voted for it, and even saved it!), but schmoozing itself feels so artificial...
Does anyone else see the irony of that letter when you read it in context with the Open Source movement? No wonder Linux caught him off guard - even 30 years ago he could not imagine giving solftware away for free...And just look how disatrous that decision turned out for him...I bet you he kicks himself about it every single day!
True, that's why I posted it :D
is there any thing wrong with that?
The title is quite misleading here. USA is seen second most negative from a selection of only nine countries; it's not like it were seen second most evil among the fifty biggest countries. Interesting article, though.
Nice old article on portability - Guru style :)
There doesnt seem to be much weight to the checks offered by the company. To quote...  &gt; "Subsequent to activation, the [location service provider] must send periodic SMS alerts to all locatees to remind them that their mobile phone can be located by other parties. These alerts should be sent at random intervals, not in a set pattern. The suggested text and minimum standard frequency for sending the alerts is set out in Annex D."  &gt;   &gt; In fact, Annex D is marked **confidential** For all any user knows, the frequency could be once a decade. 
McDonald's unavailable for comment. Also this entry is simply a repost of the nature article at http://www.nature.com/news/2006/060130/full/060130-7.html Boo!
hice
Cue Graham's essay on writing essays.
You could also try the pdf version  http://www.st.cs.uni-sb.de/edu/seminare/2005/advanced-fp/docs/sweeny.pdf
that's an uplifting and encouraging thought.  i don't think it would ever work in the real world, though.  the reason big restaurant chains work is that every store gets to share in the benefit from national advertising.  every location has to be as much like the others as possible, because sadly, consumers don't like to be surprised.  not even positive surprises would work, because then the customer would develop an expectation that *every* location would have to be just as good.
dude, cut it out with the ugly spamming.  go buy google adwords like everybody else does.
Repost of [mine](http://reddit.com/goto?id=16me) Mine has a lot more of the list.
The book is from 1992. That predates the 'street lingo' use of hater. 
'simplistic enough to be inane'?  One of the most infuriating things in software dev today? Thoughtless meritocracy. 'Hire the smartest 10%.' 'If they're not real hackers, don't let them in the building.' 'If you don't understand closures, you're not a real programmer.' What happens to the less smart 90% you don't hire? Billions of lines of code are written every year by developers who are just about good enough, who produce software that's just about good enough, that just about does the job.  So maybe they should be better. Then we need to work to help to make them better, not write them off as unworthy mortals. I can think of half a dozen folk I've worked with who produce good-enough but shabby internal production apps who'd benefit from the rather basic advice in the Irish Dev Network article. A 'real programmer' is someone who writes programs that are 'really used'. We'd do ourselves a lot of favours by not using it to mean 'exceptional coder', 'master craftsman', 'senior dev', 'guru in the making'...
really good analysis
Yeah, maybe the journalist's girlfriend never received a notification?
That is pretty intresting. (is: Merkilegt nokk!)
You're right, except that they're both 'legit'...I was trying to show that the % had not changed in 2.5 years.  I guess between 55-60% of Americans watch Faux News...
They're in good democratic company there: Iran, China, Cuba, Pakistan, Russia, Sudan...
1. People were offended, so the paper apologised. They didn't self-censor. Apology != self-censorship. 2. The Jyllands Posten had a perfect right to publish the cartoons. Offended Muslims had a perfect right to boycott Danish goods. 3. 'Other major papers, it seems, are cowering out of fear of triggering a boycott and endangering the profits of gummy bears and German coffee filters in Arabic countries.' Possibly; but possibly they're not printing the cartoons because they're not especially good or funny.
A third of the emails I write I never send. It helps my thought process to have written it, but after leaving it open on my desktop for 30 minutes, I'll decide that it's either trivial, or should be said in person.
This isn't about free press. Censorship of it is about not being allowed to get out the true story to people. This already doesn't really apply to columns as they tend to be fictional, and this this is the *funnies* section fer pete's sake. Don't play it's-my-rights victim. Because that's not central, especially since such national things don't quite apply the same internationally. I'm rather reminded of tourists that are arrogant enough to not adapt to or even to learn even just the important rules of the country they are in, despite that's how they stand legally, and pretty much morally as well. But like that doesn't apply to things made somewhere and judged elsewhere. However, these things aren't funny,  aren't constructive criticism, and are in general just... negative, so aren't sensible. The reaction is bloody large and a little inrealistic, but consider that they may think this is representative of the way 'we westerners' think, just as they may think that all Americans are people who just want to conquer people with different views on life, a thought I myself sometimes entertain. That's not much of a conceptual stretch, even. And now everyone's turning "look, they're offended by some pointless cartoon that I don't even really get myself" into "See? These are the violent people we need to protect you from." Sure, they're kicking up a large shitstorm about something they could condemn and ignore and that's not helping their case - but it's not like no one else around here is capable of that.
&gt;The anti-semetic cartoons that appear daily in Arab newspapers see http://reddit.com/share?id=18zr for an example of these
Small world ... I went to high school with that guy ...
By that logic, is that of Bush' Christianity not the same, given some of the scary things he has said? (I'm not saying I agree with that, just questioning how it would be different) More to the point, who the hell are you to extrapolate that to the religion instead of the people? An idea is not responsible for a followers, especially if it's a few one that turn out to be powerful and intent on being a pain.
I've inadvertantly done this many times.  When I don't have time to figure something out at home, I'll email the problem to myself at work, or vice versa.  It's amazing how different the problem seems when you read it the next day.
All owners of purebreed dogs can help fight cancer in dogs and in people!
Mologogo, alas, only works on the Nextel network.
It's funny how the whole article looks at how things are different now but doesn't talk much about how the changes are also making things worse. We may be making more money as a nation but the wealth divide is growing.  I don't think that's necessarily a bad thing as long as people aren't starving but the home ownership numbers are going up even as median wages after inflation are headed down. The question is whether or not the unravelling housing bubble will take the rest of the economy with it.
Some comments are quite insightfull.
Certainly national advertising campaigns are a typical benifit of franchises that you couldn't have in a model like this.  That could be a drawback.  These franchisees would really only need to advertise in their local communities (and online for 'google local', etc, no doubt), but aren't there other benefits to be had from franchising aside from advertising? And would they still be enough of a benefit to create such a network of restaurants? Maybe a cooperative is a better model than a franchise.  A series of restaurants pool some of their resources to hire out services they can all use.  But then, I don't know much about cooperatives, so maybe I've got that wrong.
Last.fm is very cool. INstall the plaugin for your favourite audio player and it auto-updates your listening profile, then starts making recomendations. Very cool.
Don't let school get in the way of your education.
Dad and son talking about Internet in the year 2019...
One of the most intelligent comments regarding the Danish cartoon outrage was made by the fromer editor-in-chief of the Jordanian newspaper "Shihan", Jihad Momani: &gt; "Who hurts Islam more: a foreigner who excels in depicting the Prophet, or a Muslim with an explosive belt who blows himself up at a wedding party?" [(source)](http://www.bangkokpost.com/breaking_news/breakingnews.php?id=77179) Mr. Jihad Momani was removed from office immediately after he published this comment and some of the cartoons.  He had to apologize for it since then. The fact that the same people whos religious feelings react highly sensitive to Danish cartoons remain largely passive when terrorists misuse the name of god to motivate their crimes is not enough discussed in the media.
God is not against science, is just ourselves making politics, tiring to separate believe from science.
New headline suggestion: "Garrison Keillor kicks a little ass here"
The question is.... why???
The author seems to be up in arms rather about the "secrets" and not the "successful". This is fair game I think.  
That's the truth. We need to reclaim science from the dirty scientists and put it back in the hands of politicans. That's the only sane thing to do.
They're the new Tom Peters, only less charasmatic.
&gt;"I actually don't know what I'm learning," Nailah said. "I think I'm just having a good time." I really liked this article until this point here.  What kind of practice is it for the real world if you only do what you feel like all the time? I'm sure I'm going to get a lot of flack from people who think people should ALWAYS do what they love (even when they grow up) but there are simply things in life we NEED to do that we dont want to do.
Those numbers are probably right but still inflated.  Since no  such strike* has been proposed, no one is trying to get out an opposing message.  If military intervention is proposed, those numbers will drop fast.
Megite is the newspaper for anyone interested in what's happening right now by intelligently uncovering the most relevant items from thousands of news sites and weblogs.
Hello Captian Obvious...
1. Approval ratings will change chaotically during the runup to such an invasion, which would be logistically impossible to set up without the knowledge of the electorate. 2. Air raids have not lead to war more often than they have lead to war.  See #1 about escalation. 3. No.  They thought the war was over and declared victory when plans for the Baathist insurgency were just getting underway.  Hence the weapons caches all over the country, the large numbers of guerillas with established hiding places, and Saddam's tactic of releasing his entire prison population just as Americans were getting close to Baghdad.
Do you know what these mean? Up the Duff, Cock up, Blower, Bung, Pussy I'll bet you're wrong...
Well Fanny is wrong, its not the breasts, it's the other place!
Einstein [supported socialism](http://www.monthlyreview.org/598einst.htm), not Communism. He supported socialism because he opposed the kind of bureacratic centralized planning inherent in capitalism, where a few major corporations plan how most of the economy is used. He writes: &gt; The achievement of socialism requires the solution of some extremely difficult socio-political problems: how is it possible, in view of the far-reaching centralization of political and economic power, to prevent bureaucracy from becoming all-powerful and overweening? How can the rights of the individual be protected and therewith a democratic counterweight to the power of bureaucracy be assured?
'The fact that the same people whos religious feelings react highly sensitive to Danish cartoons remain largely passive when terrorists misuse the name of god to motivate their crimes is not enough discussed in the media.' I don't know what the situation is in the media in Islamic countries, but in the UK and US media this point is made constantly on radio phone-ins, TV discussion programmes, the editorials and columns of major newspapers and most other high-profile current affairs contexts I can think of. It's a correct and well-made point, of course. But if there's a liberal conspiracy to deny this point, it's a very poorly implemented one.
Kawasaki's article misses the mark.   A good schmoozer (gawd I hate that word) schmoozes for the sake of schmoozing.  There are people in this world who love connecting with other people on many different levels.. for the sake of it, and not because they want to (eventually) sell you on Amway. Exchanging favours is then a by-product or a consequence of this and NOT a motivating factor.     
This cartoon was published in the Italian paper La Stampa in 2002: http://watch.windsofchange.net/pics/vignetta_stampa_small.jpg (caption reads: 'Don't tell me they want to kill me again). You might remember that it provoked fury in Israel and in Jewish groups worldwide (imo correctly, it's a vile piece of work). If you think one was worth an apology and the other wasn't, it's worth spending some time constructing a careful argument as to why. Incidentally: La Stampa also reprinted the Mohammed-as-bomber cartoons.
Have you got a source for this?  Not that I have any particular reason to disbelieve you, but this obviously completely undermines the article, so it's a pretty major claim.
You can have it both ways. In the US, the goverment props up the defense, oil, pharmaceutical, and technology industries. Who do you think AD, GD, Microsoft et al's biggest customers are? Who do you think began the internet? Pretending the US is a free market is a hilarious joke. Edit: no it's actually not funny. It's just sad that anyone believes in it.
The purpose was to keep Chile in line and crush their hopes of a stable economy. Giving them loans they couldn't ever possibly repay and then forcing them into a neoclassic economy under the IMF was intentionally intended to crush them. The Chicago boys did an excellent job of crushing them. Obviously, the side effect is that a lot of people think that crushing the Chilean economy is a shitty thing to do so they make anti-Libertarian websites. [linkpoo](http://www.coha.org/NEW_PRESS_RELEASES/New_Press_Releases_2004/04.100%20Chile%20the%20one.htm)
Thanks for the pointer - the game is very cool
Mine resembles a scraggly serpent of death... what the Founding Fathers always intended.
And when you work in a single-language company you are not allowed to choose another language for a new project.
Its simple: women like money -&gt; men like sex -&gt; men like money ;)
"Someone asked why Google even used Java at all?  Greg appeared to bite his tongue and then said that there are a lot of good java programmers out there and Google hires a few of them." An attitude some of the more .. uh .. impassioned folks around here should observe.
Most of these are correct. Some are wrong. As e078120 said, Fanny is lower down, and pussy is also used in the US context.
The article wasn't about how to choose the right tool. It was about the fact that many people (even Common Lisp fans) say "no" for the wrong reasons. "The task at hand" tells you nothing about the size of your picture and why it is right to take Common Lisp instead of COMAL or MUMPS.
livescience puts out the same story months apart:  http://reddit.com/goto?id=3866   gg livescience.com
I wonder how long the author and his fan club will remain married.  This essay reminded me of the works by professors, past their prime, overanalyzing the mundane to create themselves some work so as not to feel too useless while waiting to think their next great thought.
And the government is growing faster than ever.  Big government is incompatible with a healthy economy, and it's just going to get worse.
Interesting read discussing the various advertisers and their goals for their $2.5M ads during the Super Bowl.  Also interesting to read what ABC and the NFL do not want on the air, and who is trying to push the line.
I like the colors
[sure they do](http://www.flickr.com/photos/judgmentalist/92883481/)
He doesn't lean towards Erlang. He specifically says he needs descriptive error messages. &gt;:D
Just to confirm what the others are saying... no-one ever uses "fanny" to mean breasts.  It is a mild, even childish term for the femail genitalia. They also missed "Fag" which is a cigarette...
the disappearing one?
No, it goes to show you can't trust bleeding-edge hypotheses as dogma. (Yes, everything relating to quantum gravity is still bleeding edge, even 30 years old.) Which, of course, is simply a corollary to the fundamental skepticism demanded by the scientific method. 
Maybe they're counting the bullets too.
Overview of how Yahoo and Google's core businesses work.
But it is the followers who define and interpret the idea that they follow.  It's not just "a few" who are threatening unbelievers, and it is not "a few" who encourage suicide bombing.  The culture that these people live in is most certainly *not* one of peace.  And guess what?  A culture is defined by the people who live in it.  Nothing more, nothing less.
Ahh, the memories... (except I only had it in orange and black!)
He seemed to do okay in the software business in the end.
fwiw, [43people.com](http://www.43people.com) provides most all of the features of the social-network-wiki that I'd ask for.
scarfboy says:  "I'm rather reminded of tourists that are arrogant enough to not adapt to or even to learn even just the important rules of the country they are in, despite that's how they stand legally, and pretty much morally as well." The same would apply to those Muslims living in Denmark. They need to adapt to their adopted homeland, and become Danes.  That means dealing with the fact that Denmark is a liberal, constitutional monarchy that guarantees everyone the right to speak their minds.  If that means that someone is going to make fun of Muhammed, then the Danish Muslims can complain, they can demonstrate, or they can go piss up a rope, but they do not have the right to demand that no one can mock their religion.   And I have something of an interest in this, since mocking religion is one of my favourite pastimes.   
Yeah, and the great thing about standards is that there are so many to choose from. Don't forget about all the dead "standards", too. It's one thing to bless and rubber stamp some obscure specification as "standard". It's quite another thing for it to be effectively "standard" by the familiar concept of the adjective, that is, widely accepted, deployed, and understood.
Yet another one to the list of obvious-things-anyone-should-do. I am waiting to the blog post that says smart people shower, smart people breath, etc.
Maybe not, but I think the essential point was that we need a plain speaker who can present some unpleasant truths to people in an understandble way. 
bandwidth limit exceeded
[below, happytheman says they apologized](http://reddit.com/info?id=17dm#c18bg)
so I guess fascism and communism are OK, because totalitarianism can't be held responsible for the people who actually *implement* it.
There's something like a billion and a half Muslims in the world. That's a quarter of everyone there is. From a quick look at the census figures, 14% of the population in Russia are Muslim; 13% in India, 10% in France, 3% in the UK, 1.5% in America. Are you really saying the majority of this enormous number of people are threatening unbelievers and encouraging suicide bombing?
I can't believe this.  I'm at a loss for words. Well, this is one American who is saying, "Support Denmark - Buy Danish!"
&gt;Of course, the industry, forever the idiots, have been lobbying Apple to raise its prices at the iTunes store and even want a slice of iPod revenues. The ridiculousness of this request cannot be overstated. This is because the music industry is used to be treated like babies.  I don't know about in the USA, but in Canada the Record Companies get a cut everytime a blank tape is sold.
Does being offended give the offendees license to abduct, threaten and attempt to injure or kill? Because in case you haven't been following the stories too closely, that's exactly what people are doing. Boycotts, apologies, ok fine. But there are people out there who are looking to kill any random Dane they find because of the weak association of sharing a nation with the paper that published these cartoons. Like most extremism, it's the most specious of reasoning justifying the most heinous of reactions.
'so I guess fascism and communism are OK, because totalitarianism can't be held responsible for the people who actually implement it.' False analogy. Most fascist and communists regimes are oppressive and unpleasant. Most Muslims aren't suicide bombers. Otherwise there'd be a lot fewer tall buildings and a lot more holes in the ground.
I'll mirror and resubmit if it doesn't sort itself out tonight.
from the picture on the guy's website I think he is the sad-loner type.
This is not the first time Feynman has had to deal with the Washington bureaucracy.  There is an interesting exchange of letters that his daughter Michelle Feynman collected in "Perfectly Reasonable Deviations from the Beaten Track" (ISBN  0-7382-0636-9), concerning an invitation he'd received from the Soviet Academy of Sciences to attend a physics conference in Moscow.  Feynman wrote to both the State Department and the Atomic Energy Commission for advice.   After some crossed communications, both agencies told him that it would not be wise to go to the USSR, especially since Feynman had worked on the Manhatten Project and had knowledge of matters that were still classified.  Feynman agreed, and sent his regrets.  He did have a small regret about not going, for he missed a chance to meet Lev Landau, who was in many ways Feynman's equal.
Maybe the US State Dept will apologize to Bin Laden for the construction of the WTC.
Yet many people don't do this, unfortunately.
*They weren't trying to censor cartoons and they certainly aren't "in the business" of reprimanding cartoonists! It's a bad headline with the specific intention of misleading the reader.* Firstly, the headline doesn't say that they were trying to censor the cartoonist, nor does it imply that, so I'm not sure why you're using that as evidence that the headline is misleading. Secondly, they most certainly were reprimanding the cartoonist.  I suggest you look up the word "reprimand" if you honestly disagree. Thirdly, "in the business of" is a commonly used phrase merely indicating the concept of "doing".  No reasonable person with a native understanding of English would interpret it literally, as used in the headline. Fourthly, and most importantly, yes, the Joint Chiefs are entitled to their opinion, and to expressing it, but *no* they should absolutely not be expressing their personal political opinion in their official capacity as the heads of the military, especially in an attempt to put a chilling effect on criticism of the government.  This wasn't merely "I'm a guy and I think what you said is wrong" - this was the heads of the most powerful military on earth, explicitly calling attention to the fact that they are such and explicitly speaking in their official capacity as such, criticizing a political opinion.  If you think that the claim is that the problem with that is a legal one, you are *sadly* mistaken. (edited to get *italics* right instead of &lt;i&gt;italics&lt;/i&gt;.  reddit, support common html, dammit!)
Here's another. This is just bizarre.
I find the U.S. stance on this repugnant.  I'm at a loss.  This is the sort of free speech that is... or rather was... a pillar of liberty for the nation.  What has happened to us?
Best viewed in combination with the [OpenDir bookmarklet](http://www.zenzen.org/archives/000151.html).
Every government is a parliament of whores. The trouble is, in a democracy, the whores are us.  -- PJ O'Rourke
*I knew George Bush would say things that would hurt me and anger me and I knew that I couldn't disrupt the address because Lynn had given me the ticket and I didn't want to be disruptive out of respect for her.* Ok, so then why did she wear a shirt that said *2245 Dead. How many more?* if not to protest.  Like she wasn't trying to get some more face time on TV..  please.
This'll be a nice one for the evolutionists to explain =)
"but in Canada the Record Companies get a cut everytime a blank tape is sold" Are you serious? Can you verify with a link? - Canadian in Toronto
Perhaps the author of the article should take a good long look in the mirror and then realise that he is the dolt. 
"We all know kangaroos are pretty special, but it's their lack of flatulence, or more precisely the lack of methane emissions, that has researchers excited."
There's some content, if you can get over the snarky tone.  Which is a bit hard to do.  My irony meter went off the charts where he said that the original tips were simplistic, then for his own personal Top 7 tips for being a successful programmer, he says "learn how to program well".  Ah, gotcha.
Yep. You pay it on every kind of blank media - and recently even on iPods etc. I think that was removed. Been in place for years. It's the reason that downloading is "legal" in Canada. A few links: CPCC: They distribute the levy to rights holders  http://cpcc.ca/english/about.htm Wikipedia page:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blank_media_tax Commentary by Michael Geist:  http://www.michaelgeist.ca/resc/html_bkup/june62005.html Enjoy.
I was going to include the blank CDs, but the links you posted explain everything.
A day is all it takes to do a *lot* of damage. It's almost like the dialtone in the phone should change or something.
'there are people out there who are looking to kill any random Dane they find' are there? bloody hell! You've got evidence of attacks on random Danes, or credible death threats, right?
"...clearly Americans don't want muslims (or folks with turbans on their heads) in our country." I hope you're disagreeing with this statement... it's hard to tell from your post. There are few ways to reveal one's bigotry more clearly than by delineating between "Americans" and a particular racial or ethnic group.  Arab Muslims can be and are (in many cases) American citizens.  Being an American has nothing to do with your race, your religion, your ethnicity, your nation of birth, or the language you speak.  It has nothing to do with whether you wear a turban. While I agree that the US shouldn't be coming out against free speech on this matter, I don't really expect much from Bush these days.  He will do (has done) quite a bit more than this to keep the Saudis happy, I'd wager.
Kind of like [Seattle Wireless](http://seattlewireless.net/).
We read thos Edison made light, but in sun school they said you did it. So i bet he stoled you idea. Sincerely Donna patent infringement - will god sue?
I used to sop up Vonnegut as a teen.  His writings USED to be about possibilities and had a blance of terror from right and left-wing perspectives (if you doubt, re-read Harrison Bergeron).  I think he "lost it" at least 20 years ago, when he got caught up in the kind of lefty paranoia that also keeps Al Gore up at night.  It's sad to see a great mind ruined by socialism.
I've felt similar frustration at times, [voiced in part here](http://uwmike.com/articles/2006/01/17/reddit-jobmine). It's frustrating how the first two or three votes can sway the rest of the herd one way or another. I think the New page should a) not show current ratings and b) be a random selection of posts within the last siz hours.
Yes.  Intelligent design is clearly at work here: God said, "let there be a remote-control roach driving wasp, with larvae".
Smarter people may ask questions, but I seem to remember the idiots that ask questions more easily. This woman I work with - my boss handed her a self-evaluation. Boss said, "Complete this so we can discuss it during your appraisal." After about five minutes, the coworker asks, "So who is supposed to fill out this evaluation? Can anyone do it?"  I said, "Here. You give it to me. I'll fill out your SELF-EVAL. Are you kidding me?" She got promoted. 
that's interesting, but why link to the weak boing boing summary instead of the real thing?  here's the *real* article: http://loom.corante.com/archives/2006/02/02/the_wisdom_of_parasites.php
Or you could just unsubscribe from the service, given that, as _kam0_ pointed out above, it's a legitimate, straight-laced service which has been set up with combatting stalkers in mind.
Cheers for that.  Never doubted you for a second :).  It's ridiculous that such a well-respected publication can get away with publishing this bullshit.  I'm voting this down, for what little good it may do.
These pics look like they've been ripped from [Nathan's Toasty Technology page](http://toastytech.com/guis/win101.html) And while you're visiting the above site, check out the [Windows 1983 pre-Version 1.0 demo screenshots.](http://toastytech.com/guis/win1983.html) Or the [Apple MacOS 1.1 screenshots from 1984](http://toastytech.com/guis/macos1.html)
It's only karma.  I know the frustration, but it's not a big deal in the scheme of things. And I think displaying the exact ratings on both submissions and comments is one of reddit's best aspects.  Sites which hide what's going on from the user in the name of simplicity or usability or something are making a big mistake; in my view, the more information, the better. Plus I quite like the idea that people are 'rewarded' as much for coming up with an interesting title as they are for finding a worthwhile link.  I mean, if your link is good enough, it will be voted up anyway, but a title can really help an otherwise decent, but not brilliant, link to get votes.  It's kind've like charisma in real life.
You take great care to disguise your bigotry in these and other posts. You say you are just quoting the majority, but your lack of opposition to it is interpreted as support. Just because its what the majority wants, does not make it the right thing:  http://www.revision-notes.co.uk/revision/980.html It's called Tyranny of the Majority. Just because everyone was scared of Japanese in the 50's does not make it right to round them up and imprison them. Same goes for Arabs now. Grow a spine and say what you think. Simply spouting out bullshit about what the majority wants does not improve discussion. Saying what you think is write or wrong, and how to go about doing things does, even if we disaggree on all of it.
...mobiles don't have dial tones.
&gt; Turing did start seeing a Jungian analyst and developed a taste for Tolstoy,   &gt; but neither is an infallible sign of madness. Priceless :)
Sometimes motivational factors start off selfish, and move towards benevolent. I don't think it really matters why you are doing it if you make friends in the end. The difference is when you take advantage of people. I think the whole point of it is encouraging something positive and showing the positive (and real) benefits to be had. All in all, I suppose I agree with you, schmoozing should be an end in itself, not a means to an end.
Is this really news? I thought the Holographic Principle (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Holographic_principle) had pretty much disproved the idea that information was lost in black holes.
I would say that they sympathize with those notions. When you have people singing pop music about killing Jews and children being taught by their elders the Usama bin Laden is a hero and that if you die while killing infidels you'll get 72 virgins when you go to Heaven, then you are seeing a culture of hate and death.  Why is it that thousands of people will show up to a town square to scream for the death of Americans because someone put a Koran in a toilet?  I'm sure that there have been people who've torn off pages of the New Testament and used them to wipe their bottoms, but Jerry Falwell doesn't go on TV and tell his followers to kill them. We are dealing with a culture in which the agenda is being set by bloody-minded perverts who can count on the ignorance and bigotry of their followers.  That is why I can say with absolute confidence that "the majority of this enormous number of people are threatening unbelievers and encouraging suicide bombing".
That map gesture is pretty hot.
They forgot [chav](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chav) and [happy slapping](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Happy_slapping).  If you spend a day in a city here, you might become uncomfortably familiar with both.
i'm not physicist and i dont know the details, but i thought the holographic principle fell in line with nothing escaping. looking at this wikipedia entry it has something to do with event horizons, which i think hawkings doesnt believe in. (i just confirmed this on the event horizon wikipedia page)
It's not bad, but that's nothing to do with the score of my comments or the score of articles recommended for me.
so this is another thing that both evolution theory and intelligent design theory is trying to say proves their point? how annoying. going to another point, ID can be taught in schools as soon as they bring in some compelling evidence. the theory of evolution already has some good scientific support.
Countdown to the denial  10  9  8  7  6  5  4  3  2  1  ...
I'll give it a try. The wasp evolved this behavior in order to ensure easier reproduction. It was probably a cockroach eating wasp that already went for the head to kill quickly. Then by a freak accident a wasp was genetically predisposed to zombifiying and then laying eggs inside the roach. Then later on the behavior evolved where the wasp's offspring would have a better change of survival if the wasp managed to control where the roach went to avoid predators. Over time, predators killed all the population of that type of wasps without that behavior and voila.
"All your base are belong to us" has already gone through several cycles of being meta-ironically hip.
and?
Re: "John Thomas - A *man's* penis." Is there any other kind?
True Romance is better... *Vicious debate ensues*
The best blog  of Pixel sites.
I do not know for WTC, but after this Bush should definitely apologize for english movie "Life of Brian" made by Monty Python.   That movie caricatures Jesus Christ much more than these puny Mohammed cartoons. There goes freedom of speech :( 
"The Wisdom of Parasites". Sorta like the wisdom of crowds?
El peor blog, quieres decir.
The article linked to does not make the claim that unix is a programming language.  This is incorrect, misleading, and sensational.
&gt; Cue Graham's essay on writing essays. Inspired by that, I have been writing an essay on writing an essay on writing essays. Unfortunately, I haven't figured out what the base case is, so I can't seem to finish.
It's all so very... existential.
"Most fascist and communists regimes are oppressive and unpleasant." Indeed. And by saying "an idea is not responsible for [its] followers", one is saying that the value of an idea is irrespective of the people who implement it. Thus restricting civil and property rights and treating "political criminals" like chattel, as the canons of fascism and communism profess, is *not* considered the source for totalitarians rounding people up into cattle cars and shipping them to Siberia or Auschwitz. Sorry, I *don't* buy that. Oh and incidentally, you yourself use a false analogy in suggesting that most muslims aren't suicide bombers, which is true enough, but beside the point. And while we're beside the point, I'll note that while people (often rightfully) criticize christian fundamentalists for being extremists, a caricature of jesus results in a far smaller percentage of adherents chanting "death to [country of origin of caricature]". That most of the Middle Eastern/European Muslims are protesting and burning flags in the streets over some crude drawings speaks very ill of Islam in general, no matter how many of those protestors would actually *kill* someone.
Ordained at 17, White earned the nickname "The Minister of Defense" in college, but he didn't believe in ministers in his final years.   White, who used his considerable fame to preach the Bible, didn't believe in the Bible. White, who had his own church in Tennessee (one that was burned to the ground in a likely hate crime), didn't believe in churches.
&lt;hyperbole&gt;Nothing like basing a system of belief on freak accidents!&lt;/hyperbole&gt; 
we already knew this..  
Would be awesome if it had useful information instead of being a big advertisement for what is essentially note taking software.
yeah, I was about to say the same thing
the blog is a permalink, but the blog POST itself has no permalink. future readers will have to dig through the archive to find the article.
I am pretty sure we could just make it implicit that "Learn how to do X well" is a good tip for all cases of X.
[DHH perhaps](http://www.loudthinking.com)? Its one thing to disagree. Its another thing to be disrespectful of the hard work of others while doing so. DHH is a very smart guy (and a marketing genius), but sometimes he gets a little bit too rude trying to convert others to Rails. Sorry, a bit off-topic, but your comment made me think of that. BTW, I'm working on a Rails application right now, so don't think I'm simply flaming.
Good luck to 'em!  Hope they're not going down the path of "diworsification" that so often hamstrings 'successful' companies...  Running a network *might* not be as easy as they anticipate...
"The officer corps is also being hollowed out, as younger officers quit in such numbers that 100 percent of those remaining are automatically moved up the ladder. For example, last year the Army promoted 97 percent of all eligible captains, up from as historical average of 70 percent to 80 percent." That's worries me: the Peter principle meets an organization with a half-trillion dollar budget and lots of guns.
like lottery players? :-D
The he is me.
Does anyone have the full text of the state department's comments?
Pica, the founding fathers were very careful in crafting our nation to explicitly *not* let the majority opinion decide how decisions were made.  Our system is a Republic, a representative democracy, not a pure democracy.  If they wanted a pure democracy they would not have limited who could vote, and restricted what they could vote for.  Our founding fathers were familiar with history and knew about the failures of Athens and Rome, and tried to build a system that would be safer from the corrupting forces of power and the mob. In your post above you yourself appear to hold two contradictory positions - that the mob should rule, and that the (the Constitution) law should.  Those two never jibe.  There have been plenty of cases where the majority of Americans are poorly educated enough that they want unconstitutional things enacted.  Fortuntely our founding fathers were much more subtle then you in their analysis of how to make a government and run it, so they rejected mob rule, and embraced the rule of law. The internments were not just morally wrong, they were actally unconstitutional, which is why we paid (inadequate) reparations.  Side note - I have (distant) family that lost several hundred acres of farmland in southern California, which the government then resold while they were interned.  That land is now worth hundreds of millions of dollars.  My family members and their close kin got nothing.  They were American citizens, they paid their taxes, and were as supportive of the war as anyone else, but they were put in a camp, and had everything stolen from them because of the color of theis skin.  We should all do what we can to prevent that kind of anti-American activity from occuring again.
""Alright, that's it. We are detaining all muslims until we can somehow expel them, via a constitutional amendment if necessary," I have some questions about this. Can you tell who is a Muslim by looking at them? Can you tell who is a Muslim by DNA-testing them? If a Muslim rejected their religion, in this ethnic cleansing scenario, would she be released from the camps? If a Muslim wore a green star and agreed to have all his communications monitored, would he be released from the camps? Would children of Muslim parents also be interned in the detention camps, or would they be separated from their parents? Would you have to be a practising Muslim, or would coming from an Arab-American family and attending mosque occasionally do? If you think the 'majority' of Americans would be in favour of a policy of mass detention without trial and religious persecution - would you describe their opinion as 'completely bugfuck'?   
'When you have people singing pop music about killing Jews and children being taught by their elders the Usama bin Laden is a hero and that if you die while killing infidels you'll get 72 virgins when you go to Heaven, then you are seeing a culture of hate and death.' I think you're describing Palestine and Iran - highly publicised and exceptional cases in the Middle East. You may be aware that less than 20% of Muslims live in the Middle East. These pathologies aren't exactly common in Russia, India, France or the UK. 'I can say with absolute confidence that "the majority of this enormous number of people are threatening unbelievers and encouraging suicide bombing". Could you give some evidence that the majority of Muslims in countries outside the Middle East - the other 80%+ - are doing this?
It doesn't work for states with a single, at-large, representative like Wyoming, Montana, North or South Dakota.
It's more likely to be iwillteachyourpenistobebigger.com.   
Really Great stuff here. Not the usual google videos up here.
I don't think this is the authorative debunking it purports to be. Look at some of the conclusions: &gt; Whoever claims to be on a perpetual polyphasic schedule must be either suffering from a sleep disorder, or be a liar, a mutant, or a person with a mulishly stubborn iron-will that lets him plod through the daily torture of sleep deprivation. &gt; All the hype surrounding polyphasic sleep can be delegated to the same lunatic basket as miracle diets, scientology, homeopathy, water magnetizers, creation "science", electrolytic detoxifiers, [...] I think the good doctor has spoken too hastily, considering the growing number of people who have managed to sustain polyphasic sleep (of the uberman kind) for long periods of time (e.g. http://www.stevepavlina.com/blog/2006/02/polyphasic-mutants/ but also several people on the uberman Yahoo group).
happytheman says: "These pathologies aren't exactly common in Russia, India, France or the UK." Russia: Beslan India: Kashmir France: Paris riots UK: July 7th subway bombings So what is your point?
What a lot of alarmist nonsense.
Also fails where there is a meandering natural border.
who needs more than 640kb anyway?  nice pictures, the only problem is that they show how old I am.
See also: http://reddit.com/info?id=18re
That's one company, and do they do it because they are legally obliged or because they want to so to appear non-evil? Yes, it states it's a legal thing, but I wonder how strict each country is this way, and how violable it is in practice. Probably nothing to worry about, though.
A speculative look at psychology professor Seth Roberts' as yet unreleased Shangri-La diet, which is said to promote weight loss through the consumption of Canola oil and a dilute sugar water solution.
Coming to this space: comments on the importance of picking a good headline.
I find it amusing how creationists see this and think, "Haha! No WAY something like this evolved from random chance! This is the final nail in the coffin for evolution!" After all, this is a joke compared to evolution's grandest achievement, the most complex known object in the universe, that thinking lump of 100 billion interconnected units, the *human brain*. Why not use that as your argument instead? Oh yeah - I forgot your only argument is "WHOA THAT LOOKS COMPLICATED". People find it easier to believe in the evolution of a big homogeneous lump like the brain than of a complex behaviour. Creationists' arguments are almost always predicated on mistaken gut feelings like that.
Some of these are so prevalent in comment pages, you could almost call the post a duplicate.
Freedom of speech allows a person the ability to express themself, but does not (and should not) protect them from having their "expression" challenged by others, even by the government. I don't completely agree with Higgins' statement, "[Freedom of the press] must be coupled with press responsibility", but it is far from calling for a censorship of the media that many of these comments seem to imply.
Wow, what a horrible, horrible article. If those intangibles would really be so valuable and productive, then why is the trade balance so much in the red? And why are people living on borrowed money? The whole article generally reminded me of the the stock analysts arguing for the high valuation of Netscape/Yahoo/whatever during the dot-com. The same ones that this day recommend Google(I think Reuter mentioned that 22 of 26 analysts had a 'buy' on Google the day it dropped recently. Insane).
whoah!  she's hot.
Frankly, this seems like a simple and rather rational response to me. No one is claiming the cartoons were or should have been illegal. For the sake of tolerance and good taste, however, they *never* should've been published. And in this case, the publisher deserves every bit of chastisement they get. They should be ashamed for their editorial irresponsibility Yes, Monty Python makes fun of christianity. And, that does offend some people. But, it also comes as a predominantly christian culture making fun of itself, and so it's largely well taken. It would be quite another thing if they made fun of muslims, buddhists, hindus, or jews -- the "other".
It's puzzling that while things get objectively better, people think they get *worse*. Economist Bryan Caplan calls this [*pessimistic bias*](http://reddit.com/info?id=18ua).
http://reddit.com/static/spreddit/reddit2mockup.jpg
Wow,  I think they flew in Captain Obvious himself to write that article.   I'm waiting for an article about water being wet to mod up.
QUESTION: Yes? Can you say anything about a U.S. response or a U.S. reaction to this uproar in Europe over the Prophet Muhammad pictures? Do you have any reaction to it? Are you concerned that the violence is going to spread and make everything just -- MR. MCCORMACK: I haven't seen any -- first of all, this is matter of fact. I haven't seen it. I have seen a lot of protests. I've seen a great deal of distress expressed by Muslims across the globe. The Muslims around the world have expressed the fact that they are outraged and that they take great offense at the images that were printed in the Danish newspaper, as well as in other newspapers around the world. Our response is to say that while we certainly don't agree with, support, or in some cases, we condemn the views that are aired in public that are published in media organizations around the world, we, at the same time, defend the right of those individuals to express their views. For us, freedom of expression is at the core of our democracy and it is something that we have shed blood and treasure around the world to defend and we will continue to do so. That said, there are other aspects to democracy, our democracy -- democracies around the world -- and that is to promote understanding, to promote respect for minority rights, to try to appreciate the differences that may exist among us. We believe, for example in our country, that people from different religious backgrounds, ethnic backgrounds, national backgrounds add to our strength as a country. And it is important to recognize and appreciate those differences. And it is also important to protect the rights of individuals and the media to express a point of view concerning various subjects. So while we share the offense that Muslims have taken at these images, we at the same time vigorously defend the right of individuals to express points of view. We may -- like I said, we may not agree with those points of view, we may condemn those points of view but we respect and emphasize the importance that those individuals have the right to express those points of view. For example -- and on the particular cartoon that was published -- I know the Prime Minister of Denmark has talked about his, I know that the newspaper that originally printed it has apologized, so they have addressed this particular issue. So we would urge all parties to exercise the maximum degree of understanding, the maximum degree of tolerance when they talk about this issue. And we would urge dialogue, not violence. And that also those that might take offense at these images that have been published, when they see similar views or images that could be perceived as anti-Semitic or anti-Catholic, that they speak out with equal vigor against those images. QUESTION: That the Muslims speak out with equal vigor when they see -- that's what you're asking? MR. MCCORMACK: We would -- we believe that it is an important principle that peoples around the world encourage dialogue, not violence; dialogue, not misunderstanding and that when you see an image that is offensive to another particular group, to speak out against that. Anti-Muslim images are as unacceptable as anti-Semitic images, as anti-Christian images or any other religious belief. We have to remember and respect the deeply held beliefs of those who have different beliefs from us. But it is important that we also support the rights of individuals to express their freely held views. QUESTION: So basically you're just hoping that it doesn't -- I'm sorry I misspoke when I said there was violence, I meant uproar. Your bottom line is that both sides have the right to do exactly as they're doing and you just hope it doesn't get worse? MR. MCCORMACK: Well, I -- QUESTION: You just hope it doesn't escalate. MR. MCCORMACK: I gave a pretty long answer, so -- QUESTION: You did. I'm trying to sum it up for you. (Laughter.) MR. MCCORMACK: Yeah. Sure. QUESTION: A couple of years ago, I think it was a couple of years ago when, I think it was the Syrians and the Lebanese were introducing this documentary about the Jews -- or it was the Egyptians -- this Administration spoke out very strongly about that and called it offensive, said it was -- MR. MCCORMACK: I just said that the images were offensive; we found them offensive. QUESTION: Well, no you said that you understand that the Muslims found them offensive, but -- MR. MCCORMACK: I'm saying now, we find them offensive. And we certainly understand why Muslims would find these images offensive. Yes. QUESTION: One word is puzzling me in this, Sean, and that's the use of the word "unacceptable" and "not acceptable," exactly what that implies. I mean, it's not quite obvious that you find the images offensive. When you say "unacceptable," it applies some sort of action against the people who perpetrate those images. MR. MCCORMACK: No. I think I made it very clear that our defense of freedom of expression and the ability of individuals and media organizations to engage in free expression is forthright and it is strong, you know. This is -- our First Amendment rights, the freedom of expression, are some of the most strongly held and dearly held views that we have here in America. And certainly nothing that I said, I would hope, would imply any diminution of that support. QUESTION: It's just the one word "unacceptable," I'm just wondering if that implied any action, you know. But it doesn't you say? MR. MCCORMACK: No. QUESTION: Okay. MR. MCCORMACK: Yes. QUESTION: Do you caution America media against publishing those cartoons? MR. MCCORMACK: That's for you and your editors to decide, and that's not for the government. We don't own the printing presses. QUESTION: Sean, these cartoons first surfaced in late September and it's following this recent election with the Palestinian Authority. The EU mission was attacked or held, in effect, by Hamas yesterday near Gaza City. And the tact of some of these European newspapers, again, are to re-publish -- these cartoons. Is the election mood -- is this what is possibly fueling this and what is our media response to this, a la, what Katherine Hughes may or may not do versus international State Department and government media to the Muslim world, including Indonesia, Asia, and the Middle East? MR. MCCORMACK: I don't think your colleagues really want me to repeat the long answer that I gave to Teri, so I'd refer you to that answer.
"The government has always insisted military action was used as a last resort against Saddam Hussein's regime." This "last resort" claim made it so infuriating to read news in the lead up to the war. As a "last resort," the administration insisted that Iraq produce a report detailing all of its weapons and weapons programs. This would be the only way for Iraq to avoid war. Iraq complied, but when the report failed to include any indication of WMDs, the administration used that as "proof" that Iraq was not cooperating, and that war was necessary. Obviously the report would have served as proof that war was necessary regardless of what was in it. This kind of stuff pisses me off, and no one even pays attention or holds politicians accountable (except, apparently, in the UK).
I think I see a nipple there.
Some earlier attempts today tried to do just that. Corante couldn't handle the load and boing boing could.
If you could create anything you wanted, why not?
I wonder what the policy on racist or sexist cartoons are for American newspapers?
These things are not illegal nor should be, or are called for to be, but people seem to whine as if they were. They were, however, in bad taste by just portraying negatively and having no point in the process. The paper was probably right in saying "Okay, that was a little much, sorry about that" and this state department was probably right in saying "Yeah, that was disrespecful without any point." Because it was, and that's most of the point. By not making a point it becomes a thing indicating prejudice, not criticism. Even charicaturing stupid stereotypes.  It's not directly related freedom of the press, freedom of speech, nor surpression of truth. This is the funnies section, mild conjecture at best and inherently simplification - sort of risky in any case. It is not a report of an event that is under threat of having its truth surpressed, and no one threatened the Danish to stop this or -bloody-else. At least, "We call for tolerance" does not sound like that to me - but apparently it does to some. Maybe they should have been ignored, condemned. Yes, the response was over the top, but that's how offense can work - perhaps how it usually does work. 
Shiva, not Shakti.
There is a large difference: That was meant in fairly good faith, as constructive criticism mixed with some deconstruction of some ideas that probably deserve a good lookinh at, --and obviously humour. It's done in relatively good taste. So is, for example, Dogma, which pokes plenty of fun at Christianity, but does so with fair respect and clearly more knowledge of what it is criticising that most viewers have, and doesn't charicature much beyond the need of condensation into actual characters. The cartoon has just faith that it wouldn't stir up a shitstorm. Not necessarily bad, but it's hardly comparable in any way.
That is unrelated to I said (and a little moot). Many ideas are arguable against, however, people are held responsible for their actions, not their ideas. That's how morality and legal issues work. I see your quarrel with my argument, but it just doesn't make much sense in the end. It's like calling religion hateful because there are quite a few fundamentalists to every major religion, including Christianity, Islam and more. On the whole and at the core, neither approve in any real way of this polarized crap that has been happening as of late. We should remember that.
Yes, and that makes them the violators. Eh, it's an abstract point anyway... Not so imporant, actually. I was just trying to point out it's just too convenient to blame a large group just because you don't know many details. It's actually damn arrogant when it's a stupid overgeneralisation, akin to me denouncing *any and all* Americans because their current govenment is doing some rather questionable things. It would be stupid, and it would be about the same thing. Usually it is by far the minority that encourages strong violence, and it is the bulk that buys into that it is necessary. I guess you have a fair share of the opinions of that bulk - the bulk on this side, anyhow. No, it's not one of peace, but that's not the point. Thing is, the largest part of the small group of people with *real* antagonism, that to the point of action, are those against control, occupation - specifically those that *are* being controlled. And what's more annoying for some people to hear, they have some point. Yes, they're going about it badly, but so has America recently, which in some way goes to skew suggestions about intention. To play 'eye for and eye' purely in the realm of the blame game is just trying to rationalize shit. But I'm getting annoyed now and that's not doing my writing any good. G'night all.
Yes. I realized it shortly aafter I posted. I'd fix it if I could. Sorry.
Actually, need... No, that's a bit too strong. It's a continually debated question whether immigrants should be *forced* to abandon all their values, since that inherently means some degree of saying "your culture sucks. Ours rules. Do it or else we kick you back out"  Yes, they should definitely keep to laws, know how societry and the system of morality of everyone around them works, speak the language, and such things. But beyond that, requiring much would be assimilation that is often not warranted for any real reasons and is a form of arrogance as well. No, they cannot demand no one can mock their religion, but that is a nation-agnostic, nationality-agnostic, and just a basic moral point. If you're going to mock people publicly and on a large scale, do it with a point and carefully. That didn't happen in this case, and it's that that I primarily mind.   But it seems people here have a like to polarize, and that means I get grouped into haters of freedom instead of people questioning extreme points made - generally quantizing the discussion into very twitchy directions. **sigh**
ahh the old dark fiber rumor...
I skimmed the article. I guess I'm one of the unlucky ones who's too busy with work to read that article...at least right now.
Well said herdrick. Here's another American who will look for any excuse to buy Danish. http://hnn.us/blogs/entries/21097.html  (some links to danish goods you can buy - others should post more to reddit!)
...not that Google didn't make any concessions. However, a slightly restructed google is better than no google at all.
what's the name of the song playing in the background?  I had it stuck in my head a few months ago.
Novell has been polling the public for the last month to find out what Windows-only applications, if ported to Linux, would increase the likelihood that people would switch to Linux.   more than 10,000 votes have been counted since the first week of January.
I agree. THe marketing is often just sniping. Of course he has to do what he has to do, but it comes across as testosterone laden agression. And we wonder why there are few females in this profession. I bet they would carry on about things like this.
Well, to be fair the article says that Greg began using Python "after he saw an early demo of what eventually became Zope." It doesn't advocate Zope directly. IMHO, I thought Zope 2 was really un-Pythonic. Zope 3 was supposed to fix it, and maybe it has. I honestly haven't looked because of all the baggage the name Zope now carries with it. I'll probably look into Zope 3 eventually to see if it fixes things. But for now I'm really having fun with TurboGears and Django. http://turbogears.org http://www.djangoproject.com/
Provoke Europeans:   France:  http://www.spotlightingnews.com/article.php?news=976  Denmark:  http://www.turkishpress.com/news.asp?id=106274 Provoke Arabs:  Iraq: http://english.aljazeera.net/NR/exeres/183A286B-10C3-409C-9B74-F9EDA5C00EF0.htm   All false flag operations to herd the ignorant. Orchestrated to divide, instill fear, and preventing communication.  Confront your "enemies" and you will realize it is an illusion that agent provocateurs so skillfully choreographed.
hey
The pre-trial hearing is set for February 15th. If I had to guess ... and that's really all I can do ... I'd guess that this sentence from the news account is the key to understanding the situation: "Prosecutors and Kubby's attorneys are reportedly trying to work out a plea agreement that will allow Kubby to serve his sentence at home."
true, if you are a technologist
It's the virgin Mary!  Sell it to Golden Palace!
Why not five sigmas? Seven? Ridiculous and unreal marketing term, nothing more.
*Mohammed totally freaking out*  Jesus: Calm down, buddy. One day this happens to each of us.
what makes americans great is that they have the "freedom to fail".
notepad being used to take notes :). i thought it had always been the poor man's emacs
capitalism is defined as: 1. exploration of wealth  2. accumulation of wealth distribution of wealth is "implicitly" built in 1 &amp; 2 steps. socialism is defined as: 1. distribution of wealth exploration and accumulation of wealth is "implicitly" built in 1.
Guess that proves the theory that average faces look prettier.
I wonder what the first Java programmers had to do when trying to use Java at work. When I think of the first Java code and examples I've seen on the net, I don't picture these programmers as maverics. More like little children trying their sinus scrollers with a different language. 
So average is dark hair hanging down on the right (from the models view)?
Geez. A God who designs Necromancer-Wasps? Do you really want to worship suck a sick freak, anyway? If this proves ID, I'm converting to atheism.
Tell us something we didn't know.
Please read the full transcript (http://www.state.gov/r/pa/prs/dpb/2006/60394.htm) You can see that the state department spokesman tried hard to say that it was wrong to gratuitously insult a religion while maintaining that Freedom of the press is a basic American value.  The reporters took a part of his speech completely out of context write this ridiculous story.
Yeah, right. I once worked for a company where the boss switched the development to Java and XML because it was cool. One student who helped with some projects in the past had told him so ... 
Every programmer can pick up Common Lisp despite the many texts that say only demi-gods should use it. What argument is left? Still the "task at hand" thing? I haven't described any circumstances for such decisions or what the company is like I work for. Do you know if I even __have__ peers in programming?
The guy is obviously very smart. But I would not consider acting arrogently in an interview hilarious.
I think they are all red heads
No, this book is not good. See http://nearfar.livejournal.com/6792.html
That's so awful! The only nice thing about it is that there's one less roach in the world...
There was that one reddit post from a long time ago about that one guy who had like 1 million contacts in the contact database who would do lunch like 4 times a day and had aspirations of gearing his life around potentially meeting Donald Trump someday.  Now THAT's Schmoozing.
oh.  well, that explains it, then.
puffer fish vs otter is interesting as well
And tomorrow... Google opens chain of free hospitals operated by Google robots and powered by Google environmentally friendly nuclear fusion plants. Sigh, gmail just doesn't thrill me like it used to. 
The reason I posted this article is _not_ to say 'How dare the Arabs complain about the Danish cartoons when they are producing this kind of stuff themselves'. I thought that on seeing these pieces and understanding some of the background to the imagery, it would be clear to even the densest nitwit that this kind of expression of race hate is unacceptable, no matter who it refers to.  (However, I have absolutely no problem with blasphemy and think it should be generally encouraged). The bandwidth on the original was exceeded at http://www.tomgrossmedia.com/ArabCartoons.htm so I have put up a temporary mirror here (also see http://reddit.com/info?id=18br)
http://reddit.com/share?id=18zr
You're quite right, it was conducted like a classic witch-hunt. &gt; no one even pays attention or holds politicians accountable (except, apparently, in the UK) Sadly he was re-elected.
4 star deluxe hotel near Oxford Street, Marble Arch, business services for corporate travellers
&gt; In a democracy, what the majority wants is what everybody gets  No, that's populism, something practised by Mussolini.
A bit like a Blog to me. Intersting.
Unfortunately for ID people, no one has been able to demonstrate that something was irreducibly complex.  I don't see how could prove such a thing.  Attempts so far have basically just been appeals to common sense, which is not a good basis for science.  This doesn't bother ID people too much though since the they are not advancing a scientific explanation anyway.
¿Que?
The intended audience has a brain. 
I also threw out my TV in 1995. Believe me people, you don't need it. Nowadays you don't even need it to watch movies. Go rent a DVD and put it into the computer instead. The reason I threw out my TV was that I was a total TV addict. I could spend endless hours vegetating in front of the TV. Now I spend my time reading, listening to music, programming and what-have-you. I can really recommend it!
"You can't have it both ways." On the contrary, you have to have it both ways.  If the government makes pro Muslim publicity stunts like this they get more room to maoueuvre when invading Muslim countries.  It makes it slightly harder for the cries of "this is a war against Islam" to stick.
I have to say that it's pretty cool to be (wasting time) browsing reddit and discover that not only has somebody posted a link to your own rinky-dink site, but that the link has garnered 120 points!
Here's the [printable version](http://reddit.com/info?id=178j). I actually linked that before this page was linked. I almost submitted this, but figured the printable was more readable.
Following the success of Google Adwords,Google Toolbar, GMail and Google Talk, today Google announced its unique new product "Google Speak".
Has this man really developed the "third eye", as known in Buddhism, myth and religion.
will it for food
well written
Asking questions is an obvious thing that many smart people fail to do, but something his article did not go into more depth about is why smart people don't ask questions. This is a problem in our educational system: We are taught to know the right answer and not to think our way to the solution. There was an article a couple days ago about a teacher using the Socratic method to teach students binary math. I believe we could become much more productive as a society if our children were introduced to subjects by asking thoughtful questions that lead their minds in the correct direction for the topic.
I haven't watched tv for a long time, becouse everything what they spit out is pretty unuseful and annoying. Buy this and buy that.. blah...  I've read one article about brains and how they act when you watch tv.. they're passive compared to situation when you're reading something. Funny is'nt it.
Cf. [Why I hate frameworks](http://reddit.com/info?id=16g4) from a few days back.
This is getting pretty scary. Huge network in one hands. SKYNET!!!
As I see it, I think in many cases, it's useless to give up television.  If you're like me and you do happen to ponder the idea of giving up television, you'd most likely replace it with something as equally time consuming and pointless i.e. the Internet.  I think I'm going to take the opposite extreme, I'm going to combine all of those time wasting, pointless activities and do them all at the same time.  God bless multi-tasking, that evolution provided us.  That's right, television, IM'ing, internet surfing, video games, music listening, e-mail checking, cell phone talking, and cell phone texting.  Hedonism at it's best. Screw being a productive member of society.
Me, too. I still watch about two hours a week, when those shows are on and if I don't forget.
I quit my TV addiction freshman year of college... My roommate and I didn't have a TV. Its liberating not to schedule your life around TV. Of course now there is Tivo, but I wonder if that makes it worse for people since now they have more shows they **have** to watch, but no excuse to limit their choices.
One of the most pernicious effects of the television, in my humble opinion, is the extremely short snippets it operates in.  They shorten my attention span, and somehow, that really tends to make me unhappy, perhaps because my mind just starts flickering around in an evolutionary "what's wrong?" kind of manner.  The rapidly changing pace of the flickering screen is really disturbing if you're more used to things like reading books.
The author has a point, but I don't see it as a problem of Islam, the problem is with the general concept of religion. It just surfaces more obviously in the countries where religion does have more influence.
It's interesting that, at least on my system, the four Google ads at the bottom of this web page are for sales of . . . televisions!  :-)
that's longer than most gay relationships!
True dat, about the replacing. However, on the 'net, wasting your time is more your fault and your choice - you *can* actually be useful mixed with meddling about. At least, I've heard:)
Helpful to anyone interested in  jewelry.
A very informative site for anyone interested in fashion jewelry.
That looks fairly busy. I hope there'll be a way to disable all the distractions I don't need - one of the things I like about reddit is its minimalism and lack of Shiny Interface Distraction&amp;trade;.
I stopped visiting the MSN India because of that tiny ticklish ad that irritates me to no end.
I stopped watching TV when I was 13. That was right about the time we got the internet. College brought TV back to my life in small ways, but I quickly dropped it again. Now I just buy DVDs. Life is so much simpler without two addictions :)
I remember reading in the book Hacker Ethic: You have un-interacting family's watching interacting family's
"I'd hit it."
At some point BBC World were to show some of the cartoons and showed the one of "extra" images. After a complaint from Denmark, they changed the segment. In related news, the Danish embassy in Syria is on fire:  &lt;http://abcnews.go.com/US/wireStory?id=1579878&gt; 
One of the computer labs I used to go to had a teddy bear that you had to describe your problem to before you could get human attention.  I think they called it "confessional debugging".  I would assume that writing things out is even more effective.
What I don't like about the page is, it makes statements in the words under the pictures without backing them up with arguments.
More blogging/Web 2.0 hype in my opinion.
This is in WMV3 format which cannot be read by open source media players. I want to watch this, it sounds funny. Anyone have an open format version of this?
I wouldn't *now*, but this was the early eighties when the company was just one of many. Calling any interviewer "clueless" is probably bad policy, but hey, he made an impression and got the job, didn't he? It's all about reading the other person... I love to be one-upped, some people can't stand it.
Cut the cable 9 months ago - won't go back for anything.  We still keep the TV for renting movies and the occasional Xbox session, but that's about it.
With so many folk claiming to have stopped TV, I'm suprised I've never met another in person. I stopped around 1998. It was easy because I used to fix them -- you get real sick real quick.
Let's hope you're right.
I got the impression that the author of the text is at least as biased towards blindly believing Jews are always good as the authors of the cartoons are biased towards believing Jews are always bad. Of course both views are equally wrong, there are good and bad Jews as there are good and bad people  in any subset of the human race.
A comparison of thinking how to leverage the traditional core competency within company and the shift to thinking about how to deliver to the outside. To mine the "gold" that is outside the company.   Now compare this to tapping the community widom of reddit users?
you are commenting positively on something you posted yourself? is this your own blog too?
that's what I keep telling my boner.
Violence is a common reaction of fundamentalists, whatever their religion.  There are a lot of fundamentalist Muslims for various reasons, but in part because it is the policies of the United States since the 1950's, as we promoted Islamic fundamentalism as an ideological tool to use against both progressive nationalism and communism.  We originally promoted a very extremist reactionary form of Islam in Saudi Arabia to help foil communism and nationalism.  We trained the Taliban in Afghanistan to serve as a foil to the Soviets.  We even trained Osama Bin Laden himself and supplied him with money.  After the Cold War ended, the ideologies we were providing a foil against essentially disappeared, and fundamentalism filled the vacuum, much to our dismay.  I am not saying other factors were not involved, I am just saying that we helped to create the sorceror's apprentice that has now gone out of control. Fundamentalist Christians do not use violence as much an Muslims right now, thanks in no small part to the efffectiveness of our Western societies in maintaiing a respect for the rule of law, and a tend of promoting liberal democracy that finds violence abhorrent.  All the same, Christians in the US have in the name of religion blown up abortion clinics, murdered abortion providers, murdered gays, and threatened violence againt those whom they disagree with.  The extremists in the Christina Identity movement in the US have killed police officers, committed bombings, plotted a number of terrorist attacks (fortunately virtually all were foiled by the FBI), and committed many hate crimes.  They just don't get a lot of news coverage by the 'liberal' media. In the US politicians are courting them and promoting policies that help them grow, and thanks to Bush we are funding their programs.   Going into speculation land, I expect that there will be a breaking point at some point when there is a lot of tension in our society, for instance when fosil fuel becomes scarce or when environmental changes become more sever, where fundamentalists in the US that will take even more control, and their violence will grow.
You're saying that creationists jump on this because it seems a lot more "irreducible" than the human brain. In other words, it is easy to see a slightly dumber brain being useful, than to see a slightly worse roach brain surgery being useful. Rubbish. You're just not being very creative. You know how a slightly worse roach brain surgery is useful? For immobilizing the roach, while keeping it alive so that the larvae can enjoy its warm entrails. Even if you can't move the roach where you want it to be, this is still pretty good. You know an even worse roach brain surgery is useful? For killing the friggin' roach! Delete your incredulity from your mind. These things only seem incredible because we can't understand millions of years multiplied by billions of cockroaches and wasps, each of which was a novel evolutionary experiment. *We just can't.* As a side note, the article makes this brain surgery appear much more incredible than it really is. It's not some delicate microsurgery that directly modifies the "escape reflex" - it's shooting a venom into the brain to destroy a whole chunk of it, resulting in a mostly docile being. If you've read about lobotomies, you'll know that those resulted in mostly dull, docile human beings. And that's jamming an icepick into the frontal lobe!
In my opinion, if they're so confident it works, they should run it into their own fingers, not a hot dog.
Great overview for beginners, and also not-so beginners
Great collection of smart quotations - don't miss the funny dictionary!
I guess you will have to try yourself. If you only accept your own achievement as proof while at the same time refusing to try you can bathe in your ignorance for a long time.
My thoughts exactly. I had read somewhere that the guy did test it on his finger, and I was hoping their website had that video. No such luck. There's probably a disclaimer, "SawStop only works on frozen hotdogs. We are not responsible for any injuries occured while using SawStop."
I would highly recommend this to everyone. I myself, have not watched television on anything even remotely like regular basis for roughly three-four years now.  I still watch a few shows occasionally -- but not television, rather via downloading them through a peer-to-peer network. The end result is that I have a lot more time in this world: I can watch the shows I like on my terms (e.g.: when I want, not when they're "on") -- thus I am not bound to any external schedule, I do not have to waste time watching commercials and I only follow shows that are critically acclaimed (and not whatever junk I happen to surf by). The internet beats television for news (and entertainment).
However those cartoons make hypocrites of Arabs who say we should not offend religions.
I suspect blood in a marketing video isn't going to help sell power tools.
There are pro-violent and pro-pacific pieces in the Bible. I'm sure the same can be said for the Koran. Violent people will use whatever they can to justify their actions or to convert others to violence.
As I already said in another thread. Koran is the literal word of Allah. The word of god is unquestionable.  Bible was written by humans. Hence it can be questioned and re-interpreted. This makes **a lot** of difference.
I haven't watched television in 10 years, but ever since then I've simply surfed the Web instead... I'm debating whether I've gotten anything out of that.
Some countries consider banning operation #1 in the male style.
"I'm sure the same can be said for the Koran. " Can anyone offer links to support this?  Any quotes from the Koran along the lines of, "Love your enemies, do good to those who hate you [...]"?   
"Koran is the literal word of Allah." So you say.  What if I said that Muhammed made it all up, or that he saw and heard what he said he saw and heard, but it was because he was stoned?  We don't really know if the Koran is the true word of Allah, because we only have Muhammed's word that it is, and he's been dead for more than a thousand years.   It's in the same category as the Book of Mormon: Joseph Smith said he was given some golden plates by an angel that had God's word written in some incomprehensable language.  In order to read them, he needed to put them inside a hat and look at them with a special stone. There's a great episode of "South Park" about it ("All About Mormons") that everyone should check out. 
As late as the 19th century, the Koran was open to interpretation, too. Averroes wrote a famous treatise about Islam and science where he said that if the Koran appeared to conflict with a scientific fact, then the common interpretation of the Koran must be wrong. I don't understand how it works today.
Yep, just buy a DVR and you are game.
I am not a Christian or a Muslim, and regard both as mythological world views from long ago that were successful because of their justification to systematically reject and wipe out other mythologies.   Both the Bible and the Koran have passages that can be used to justify violence.  "I come not to  bring Peace but a sword."  In the epistles in the N.T., they describe killing an early Christian for charging interest on a loan.  The Old Testament contains many bloodbaths perpetrated by the protagonists, with Yaweh egging on the slaughter, and rebuking those who show mercy or compassion, since his described goal is for the Israelites to conquer various lands he decreed to them and slaughter any who stand in the way.   But both the Bible and the Koran have passages that can be used to show that they are a religion of peace, you have cited some for the bible.  In the Koran there are many  peaceful and tolerant verses, easily Googled.  The idea of Jihad is presented as the struggle within oneself to overcome one's baser passions. Both books are awash with contradictions and inconsistencies, which is a real problem.  You can show that the Bible or Koran teach peach and tolerance, but you can also show that they teach intolerance and rabid zeal in attacking those who do not believe as you do. Fundamentalists despite claiming that their book is dictated by God, and is absolute truth, never read their religious books seriously or critically.  They always pick and choose passages that justify their views.  Whatever their religion, fundamentalists foment in their followers fear, alienation, and anger, and in their more extreme forms teach that extremism and violence in the name of religion are right.
There was a good article about this technology and the challenges the creator has faced in bringing it to market in Inc. Magazine last year: "He Took On the Whole Power-Tool Industry"  http://www.inc.com/magazine/20050701/disruptor-gass.html "Gass heard something different. To his ears, Lanier's message was this: If we all stick together and don't license this product, the industry can argue that everybody rejected it so it obviously wasn't viable, thereby limiting any legal liability the industry might face as a result of the new technology. (Lanier denies this was his point.) Gass was stunned."
How hard is it to give up a 19" TV?  But I guess the 13" one is better if you're going to be watching in a closet - especially if you also have to get a DVD and VCR player in there.
Actually TiVo can make it worse, since then you will always have something available that you want to watch.  My advisor used to say "wouldn't it be terrible if TV was actually good?"  and DVRs have made his nightmare come true.
&gt; the author is pro-Jew Would you prefer he was anti-Jew?
Don't stop with the Book of Mormon and the Koran; What about the New Testament and the Hebrew bible?  The bible as we know it went through many changes before the first protestant religion even popped up. Councils of old Catholics, fat off the selling of indulgences, voted on what books should be in and what shouldn't. Hell, some of what became obscure apocrypha is probably there because certain contingents of Bishops had food poisoning that day, though I'm sure God guided it all with an unseen hand..... Oh, and one quick question. How come God doesn't send colorful miracle-working prophets anymore? And why did they  have a penchant for showing up in times and places where documentation consisted of the generational, word of mouth variety? Coincidence....?
&gt; I think a lot of people want to imagine that the Arabs want peace, because they want to imagine that Arabs are somehow "good" people (where "good" implies "peaceful like the Danes") I don't imagine one way or the other, in all fairness your making the assumptions not me. I know the Muslim faith at this moment has been hijacked by extremists, but what I don't know is how many normal every day Muslims actually support them. This atleast in my case is impossible to find out. &gt; I think that's incorrect; if the Arabs wanted peace, they'd use Gahndi's strategy to win. I don't know where to start refuting that statement. How about Gandhi united one country, the Muslim world has so many different leaders with different agendas it would be next to impossible for one person to unite them. Also (in Palestine's case ), many countries and peoples looking for peace go about it the wrong way. Gandhi was an exceptional guy, practically unique in his success, trying to tell people that are being killed and persecuted that peaceful protest will work, is a very hard sell.
Previous work on this subject: http://www.msu.edu/~choijay/etiquette.pdf
Quit in 2003 because of Netflix.  Happy with Internet.
That's the best thing I've seen here in a while. I don't need a fancy algorithm/community system to point me to articles saying that George Bush is a nitwit or that religious nuts of all stripes cause problems.   On the other hand, I would have never found that article on my own.
"if the Arabs wanted peace, they'd use Gahndi's strategy to win." The Palestinians don't want 'peace', they want their country back - and that doesn't mean an archipelago of bantustans surrounded by tanks. I like the fact that you feel qualified to prescribe someone's philosophy without checking how to spell his name. Deep.
Is qujibo a Muslim that believes that or is he just trying to state the Muslim position? When I read his comment, my first reaction was that he was doing the latter.
There is a fundamental difference between the Koran and the Bible. Where as the Bible speaks of the life of Jesus in the new testament and mostly about how you as an *individual* should behave, the Koran (and the additional books on the ways of Muhammed) go beyond that and set rules for not only the individual, but also law &amp; punishment and government &amp; state (and even economy). By Islamic faith, the words in the Koran are 'set in stone', because they are *the* words of God him/herself. There is no changing the words of God. And herein lies the problem: as the world changes, Islam as a religion can't change. Muhammed and his followers where more or less nomads living in the arabian peninsula a thousand years ago. Maybe the laws for the individual and society worked back then, but not in the 21st century... I know this might sound provocative to some of you, but I think for the sake of Muslims and fellow human beeings, Islam as a religion must learn to change, and to let go of many of the old traditions.
You're still a consumer. Why not try using your time to produce something?
One little thing I wish to point out here. It's quite telling that this publication is using the poisoned term "pirate" in reference to what these litigious companies are doing. They are casting an aspersion on a legal activity. Frankly, I expected a bit more objectivity coming from an entity associating itself with MIT... I think these patent "pirates" are a fabulous conclusion to a completely broken patent system. By hitting large companies right in their pocketbooks, we will finally see some needed changes in the patent system. Our well-lobbied representatives in Congress will make sure of that.
&gt; The bible as we know it went through many changes before the first protestant religion even popped up. Councils of old Catholics, fat off the selling of indulgences, voted on what books should be in and what shouldn't. Hell, some of what became obscure apocrypha is probably there because certain contingents of Bishops had food poisoning that day, though I'm sure God guided it all with an unseen hand..... Umm...the Bible was canonized in 325 at Nicea...well before the whole indulgence problem popped up in the Catholic church. It also wasn't just a matter of voting in what you liked and what you didn't. They had a very strict set of criteria for what would be accepted and what wouldn't. * Apostolic Origin — attributed to and based on the preaching/teaching of the first-generation apostles (or their close companions).   * Universal Acceptance — acknowledged by all major Christian communities in the ancient world (by the end of the fourth century).   * Liturgical Use — read publicly when early Christian communities gathered for the Lord's Supper (their weekly worship services).   * Consistent Message — containing a theological outlook similar or complementary to other accepted Christian writings.  There was also the problem of several apocrphyal books being blatantly wrong in their account of history. I believe it is Judith which lists Nebudchadnezzar is king of the Assyrians, which obviously is not true historically. &gt; Oh, and one quick question. How come God doesn't send colorful miracle-working prophets anymore? You must not look very far, because there are MANY people who claim to be prophets, though for many of them, their claims are questionable. They certainly are colorful, though. Also in third-world countries, "miracles" are much more of a common thing. Maybe we have become so inundated with the material that we cannot see the spiritual any longer. &gt; And why did they have a penchant for showing up in times and places where documentation consisted of the generational, word of mouth variety? Coincidence....? Say again? 
Very important attention
I have not read all the comments about HTDWYL yet, but I will soon.  Here's my two cents: HTDWYL was, IMHO, written by an individual who possesses extraordinary insight into the process of living.  I compare his insight to that of Maxwell Maltz who developed Psycho- Cybernetics.  If you've read P-C, that is saying a LOT. HTDWYL could, maybe, be further developed into a practical approach about HOW goalless people (like me) could discover worthwhile goals.   In P-C Maltz never talked about HOW to engage in goal-setting, per se.....  He just assumed that you HAD a goal or goals, and he more or less proved that they're necessary for fulfillment.  Its impossible to deny his logic and wisdom.  But many people simply DON'T have them, for whatever reason. Lack of goals doesn't mean you're lazy, incompetent, or anything like that.  It just means that you have interests that are sufficiently varied to preclude intense focus on any particular one.  And maybe "focused" people are just autistic in a different way. Do we HAVE to have goals?  No.  We exist without them, obviously, but having one or two important goals must be a very good feeling.  I wish I had that feeling most of the time. Guess I should get back to painting my kitchen (its 4:45 PM as I type this).  Paul Graham DID mention discipline as I recall. rdeegan@sbcglobal.net Write me.   
A dilemma. A decent article but I must vote it down on principle. Title in all caps, you know.
What's interesting is that in other statistics of this nature that I've seen, the ease of starting a business corresponds strongly to the strength of the economy. Note also that this means how easy it is to do business, rather than how 'social' (taking care of the less fortunate, broadly) a country is.  Both anglo-saxon model countries as well as the nordic countries score well. Here in Italy, instead, it's very difficult to start a business, as you can see from the stats.  You have to have a significant amount of money already to do it, so it is beyond the reach of many people. The social model here is also (IMO) suboptimal in that there aren't many benefits for the unemployed or poor, but instead, it's hard to fire people, so that the burden is shifted to corporations, who are forced to pay for people they don't need, rather than, say, being taxed as in the nordic countries, so that the government fills that role.  Or, as the society sees fit, simply let people take care of themselves as in the US.  Of course that's a gross oversimplification, but I think it's interesting to look at each one and see what works and what doesn't.
&gt; Both the Bible and the Koran have passages that can be used to justify violence. "I come not to bring Peace but a sword." You might want to go back and read that in context. Christ was not condoning violence nor telling anyone to use it. He was simply saying that what he taught would be extremely provocative and would turn others (for example communities and families) against each other. And he was correct. &gt; In the epistles in the N.T., they describe killing an early Christian for charging interest on a loan. You took this out of context, too. You are speaking of the classic example of Ananias and Sapphira. *1Now a man named Ananias, together with his wife Sapphira, also sold a piece of property. 2With his wife's full knowledge he kept back part of the money for himself, but brought the rest and put it at the apostles' feet.*  *3Then Peter said, "Ananias, how is it that Satan has so filled your heart that you have lied to the Holy Spirit and have kept for yourself some of the money you received for the land? 4Didn't it belong to you before it was sold? And after it was sold, wasn't the money at your disposal? What made you think of doing such a thing? You have not lied to men but to God."*  *5When Ananias heard this, he fell down and died. And great fear seized all who heard what had happened. 6Then the young men came forward, wrapped up his body, and carried him out and buried him.* It has absolutely nothing to do with "charging interest on a loan" as you claim, and nothing to do with any human killing someone else. You *really* twisted the story there. &gt; The Old Testament contains many bloodbaths perpetrated by the protagonists, with Yaweh egging on the slaughter, and rebuking those who show mercy or compassion, since his described goal is for the Israelites to conquer various lands he decreed to them and slaughter any who stand in the way. You'll find those bloodbaths never occured to an innocent nation that did nothing. They occured when other nations attacked Israel first, particularly when they (the Israelites) were in a state of vulnerability. &gt; Both books are awash with contradictions and inconsistencies, which is a real problem. I've still yet to find someone who can find honest contradictions. Most of the time it has to do with the person taking the passages out of context (like you did in your above statements). &gt; Fundamentalists despite claiming that their book is dictated by God, and is absolute truth, never read their religious books seriously or critically. They always pick and choose passages that justify their views. Whatever their religion, fundamentalists foment in their followers fear, alienation, and anger, and in their more extreme forms teach that extremism and violence in the name of religion are right. That was quite the generalization. Listen, I have no problem with you being critical of any religion, just be honest when doing so. Blatantly twisting stories to make your point is not being honest.
j.p., The Inc. article below describes how he tested it on his own finger in 2000.
Overall his reasons are crappy and not really relevent to designers. 
&gt; I don't imagine one way or the other, in all fairness your making the assumptions not me. I know the Muslim faith at this moment has been hijacked by extremists, but what I don't know is how many normal every day Muslims actually support them. This atleast in my case is impossible to find out. Why do you say its been hijacked? Their violence is no different than that of Muhammad and the immediate Muslim leaders that followed him over the next 300 years.
What do you propose they do? They are a tiny nation that is surrounded by a bunch of nations that hate them and regularly kill their people through suicide bombings and other assorted actions. Need I remind you that Israel didn't even start doing this stuff until the entire Arab world tried to wipe them out in 1967? That's the kind of stuff they have to put up with on a day to day basis. Your "ethnic cleansing" statement is way off, and though the Israeli government does take harsh actions, it has to. It can't just stand by and be run over.
The argument is pointless, "though shall not kill" is the 6th commandment. We can't accuse the USA or Israel of following this rule when it comes to there treatment of Muslims.
We need a GOOGLE Filter
Man you have got to find out a little bit more about the social and political history of that region. Everything to you is about my Religion is better than yours.  The fact is, these fanatics did not have the control they have now a generation ago.
&gt; A president who lies under oath threatens our entire government, as he gnaws at the roots of our democracy. That's just meaningless rhetoric.  Democracy isn't founded on the absolute integrity of one man.  People are imperfect.  A president can make mistakes, and still do his duty to uphold the principles of democracy.
Best video I have ever seen.
When I clicked on the "comments" link for this article, I braced myself for the worst slashdot-style flameage.  Instead I find thoughtful and (mostly) polite conversation.  I don't know how much longer reddit will stay like this.  It would be marvellous if it were reddit's design that's making this happen: if the flamers hold back because they know they'll get modded down into the sub-basement.   That's probably too much to hope for, but this page, at least at this instant, shows how great it would be if that happened.
I'm not saying peaceful protest would not work, I think it would. But you have this idea that west (Christian?) countries would act differently under the same circumstances. Which in my opinion is wishful thinking, and not reflected in history. Also if talking about Palestinians don't say Arab, say Palestinian.  &gt; That's why they don't just exterminate the Arabs. I'd be hoping they don't do that, because it would be inhuman and go against the teaching's of their faith.
Given that modern-day Israel was once the home to several million palestinians - none of whom are there any more - it is the most thoroughly ethnically cleansed piece of land on the planet. Ever wonder why the 1967 war happened? a quick peek at the realm of historical fact reveals that close to two million palestinians were dispossessed and removed from the lands/homes they owned (i.e. they held deeds) during the creation of the israeli state.  no-one felt bad about this at the time because europe had just finished attempting to wipe jews off the face of the earth - so merely cleansing two million people from mandate palestine was ok if it helped recompensing for 6 million who had been killed.
In what way is his "ethnic cleansing" statement way off?  From what I've heard, the Palestinians literally have deeds to large amounts of land in what is now "Israel," and the current government won't let them back in because the government could then no longer be both democratic and have a state religion.  Isn't this so?
To say that Christians are less violent is certainly a matter of perspective.  Let's not forget that the Christian nations of the world also possess the biggest, most lethal, and well organized militaries -- this has been true since the days of the Emperor Constantine. By immeasurable orders of magnitude war is far more violent and destructive than any other act of human violence. All of the deaths and property damage caused by terrorism in the last 100 years combined cannot come close to the violence of even one war. While (some) Christian individuals may turn the other cheek, they also fund and condone extreme violoence through their war machines.  Muslims do not have this avenue for "flexing muscle" and their dismay carries little weight in the world.  Perhaps, it is their position of relative weakness combined with the lack of any effective means for expressing dissatisfaction that is the catalyst for "violent" reactions (or rhetoric).
You would have done better to end with "tanks."  When you go on to make fun of the guy for a typo, you just seem desperate.
how often are words used? 
Poor guy. Messed up for life for a theory.
Pretty funny. I just don't get the whole mouse head joke, or why they call southeast Asia Microsoft factory. Microsoft is software (obviously) besides the Xbox. I think they should rename it Wal-Mart Factory.
I think the reason the Israelis don't mistreat the Palestinians more is not just that they're afraid of losing support in the rest of the world, but that the country itself is divided.  In addition to the extreme zionists, there is a "silent majority" who see all too clearly the parallels between how Israel treats the Palestinians, and how jews have been treated by oppressive governments in the past.  A couple years ago, when the Israelis were killing large numbers of Palestinians, a cabinet member even spoke out against it, saying that the things he was seeing reminded him of the Warsaw ghetto.
Silly me, I'd started to think I wouldn't upgrade for a couple of years.
The author fails to consider that people are thinking individuals. If when the seat is left down is dependant upon the time, then surely the people involved will try to alter their behaviour so that it benefits them. I'm not sure whether this would help or hinder J or M tho. But in a race condition, it makes sense for M to go first in the morning. However would M try to change her daily patterns so she tended to use it more in the afternoon? If this occured the the distribution is not random anymore and perhaps the time of swapping should then be increased to 1-2pm (also considering that J should have some benefit for giving way in race conditions)?
The Bible doesn't condone what they did. Its very obvious by the Danites own theivery and use of idols that what they did was wrong via the OT laws of the time. *There the Danites set up for themselves the idols, and Jonathan son of Gershom, the son of Moses, [d] and his sons were priests for the tribe of Dan until the time of the captivity of the land. 31 They continued to use the idols Micah had made, all the time the house of God was in Shiloh.* That's the thing about the Bible...it records the good and bad portions of Israelite history, and thus some people take the bad parts and assume the Bible is glorifying those acts, when it isn't doing that as much as being an accurate depiction of history.
&gt; ...and the current government won't let them back in because the government could then no longer be both democratic and have a state religion. Israel does not have a state religion. Infact, much of the government is composed of secular Jews.
I apologize...in my mind I associated "ethnic cleansing" with genocide, though the two are not synonymous. But really when you at it, Isreal's policies aren't that different from those of many other modern nations. Ever since the US really got into the idea of nation-states, stuff like this has been going on, in Czechoslovakia, Yugoslavia, and several other nations where entire people groups were relocated in order to establish a nation for a particular people group. Again, I understand what the Israeli government does is harsh, but its not as if they haven't tried to make due with what more or less the UN created. After totally routing the Arab attacks in 1967, they could've kept those territories for a long time. But they haven't, and what do they get for trying to stand a middle position and giving back the Palestinians the West Bank and Gaza? More violence. So more or less Israel is between a rock and a hard place. Israel realistically needed to be created due to the rampant anti-Semitism that exists throughout the world, but now that they have a created state, they have to waver between keeping that state independent, and being accomadting to their neighbors - who more or less hate them. Its a hard place to be.
There are very many Christians who believe that the Bible is the literal, unquestionable word of God. That doesn't stop them from reading only the parts they want to see.
It's in all caps in the page &amp;lt;title&amp;gt; too, so in this case I think it was just a matter of negligence on the submitter's part rather than an overt attempt at attention-grabbing.
&gt; Man you have got to find out a little bit more about the social and political history of that region. Everything to you is about my Religion is better than yours. I know quite a bit about the social and political history of Islam, and there is no one who will deny that Muhammad spread Islam by the sword and that Islam reached its peak through warfare. I'm not trying to say anything about "my religion is better than yours", I'm just observing what happened in history.
Neither Judaism nor Islam has a commandment to "love thy neighbor" in their holy texts. There is a hadith that reads,  "None of you believes until he wishes for his brother what he wishes for himself," but hadiths come from Muhammad rather than God (not to say that Muhammad is fallible or anything). There is also Sufism, which is an esoteric sect of Islam with interesting and remarkable parallels to Buddhism, but some Islamic scholars have a dim view of Sufism.
Mouse -&gt; Moose?
Probably because lots of people that aren't active in communities like slashdot (which don't get mod points there but have mod powers here) are more thoughtful and polite than the active ones? Which is why modding seems a lot better here. But then I hope the system here isn't open to abuse at the same time..
&gt; Umm...the Bible was canonized in 325 at Nicea...well before the whole indulgence problem popped up in the Catholic church. No it wasn't. It went through many changes. Here's a link to a [university site timeline](http://www.columbia.edu/cu/augustine/a/canon.html). The 325  C.E. Council of Nicea was more about Constantine having the new Bishops solidify something for him to work with as he established the empire under a new religion (at mom's urging if I remember correctly.) I believe the historical importance of it with regard to orthodoxy was that it spelled out the Man/God combo of Jesus in the **Nicean Creed.** They still recite that badboy at Catholic services (among others), as it is permanently ingrained in my head after 20 years of indoctrination. That timeline, and the texts I was checking out only include what we know about. The theological councils of *The One Holy Catholic and Apostolic Church* were likely more secretive then than they are now. It looks like the big codification took place in response to that rebel, Martin Luther, who, I will admit, had balls the size of coconuts. With regard to the "colorful miracle working-prophets", colorful was an adjective to modify *miracle-working*. I'm curious why religions tend to have a consistent theme of miracle working prophets that existed hundreds or thousands of years ago, and had their stories passed on by word of mouth for generations before the first written accounts started popping up.  Have you ever played 'Telephone', that game where little kids whisper in each others ear, and the final kid compares his translation with the original? Take the innocent, harmless aspect of the game away, and then throw in the historical power politics that used religion to their advantage (How about Constantine and Nicea for example?). **Then** throw in the inherent human desire for a higher power. I'd like to believe in Christianity, or even another loving religion, but, you see, if God was gonna throw in Free Will as a crucial tenant, and then play the game of historical telephone, then I'll take agnosticism, thanks.
I think you'll find that the anti-semitic position was made very eloquently by the cartoons themselves. Anti-semitism and disagreement with Israeli foreign/domestic policy are two entirely different things but some dissemblers try to muddle them up.
Eh, it's quite a mix. They have fresh fruit daily, things like yogurt and juice, and some reasonably healthy snack items in addition to the junk food. It's up to the individual employee how they treat themselves. (When I was interning there, I ate *way* too much... but I also lived 6 miles away and biked both ways, so it all came out in the wash. ;) 
Shouldn't India be Dell's customer support too?
Pretty good.
I prefer this one: http://zen.chakuriki.net/world/
Cut you in half? You've been watching that German spoof safety video too much again.
God help us once Christians find out about loljesus.com.
Me too.  I thought I had quit television, but realized I've just replaced it with internet. I defintely zone out in front of blogs and news sites.
Why stop at Fundamentalists? Secular Humanists committed mass murder (Lenin, Stalin, Mao, and Castro). Basically violence is a terrible part of human nature.
might be because the Reddit community is still small ...
Which wars in particular are you talking about which the Christian's "War Machines" caused violent destruction? First World War? Europeans invade each other's countries. Not in the name of Christianity Second World War? Fascists try to take over the world. Fascists rejected Christianity wholesale. Rest of the world beats them. Cold War? Communists start taking over Europe. West gets concerned and arms. No particular Christian perspective to the war, except the Communists banned all religions. Vietnam War? North Vietnam funded by China attempts to annex South Vietnam. After a few years everyone in America gets tired of it and goes home. Can't see the Christian context there? The 2 Gulf Wars? Over Iraq Invading Kuwait and the search for WMDs. Again no particular Christian endorsement. In fact most Church leaders where quite anti-war. Methinks you've mixed up Christianity with the West. They are different you know. Not every decision made in the West is automatically Christian.
I feel just horrible for this cat.
Is there anybody from the UK who can give us Americans a better idea of the situation? Is this guy a military retiree who lives in a military pension home? Those are completely  unheard of in the States.
yeah, i was kind of miffed.  throwing a cat at a wall is never cool, gravity or no.
Funny the Islamic world would certainly have never bought these things in the first place: "Carlsberg and Tuborg Beers." "Danish Crown hams ... baby back ribs, because they come from Denmark. "
Ths is actually the user once known as moof1138.  After I got back from movies and shopping today, reddit somehow forgot my password and wouldn't let me log in, so I created a new account. The N.T. and O.T. do have passages that can be used to justify violence, but as I said most of those that use them to justify violence are not reading the passages critically or seriously - they are finding what they are looking for.  I agree that in general Jesus' message was one of peace.  But the various writers of the books of the N.T. slipped in a few passages that are pro-violence, and the Bible itself is both contradictory and gives plenty of material for those who want to use it to justify violence: Luke 22:35-38: 'And He said to them, "When I sent you out without money belt and bag and sandals, you did not lack anything, did you?" They said, "No, nothing." And He said to them, "But now, whoever has a money belt is to take it along, likewise also a bag, and whoever has no sword is to sell his coat and buy one. For I tell you that this which is written must be fulfilled in Me, 'And he was numbered with transgressors'; for that which refers to Me has its fulfillment." They said, "Lord, look, here are two swords." And He said to them, "It is enough."' - If Jesus is telling his followers to buy weapons, I expect Jesus means for them to use them. John 2:13-16 'When it was almost time for the Jewish Passover, Jesus went up to Jerusalem. In the Temple courts he found men selling cattle, sheep and doves and others sitting at tables exchanging money. So he made a whip out of cords and drove all from the Temple, both sheep and cattle; he scattered the coins of the money changers and overturned their tables. To those who sold doves he said: "Get out of here."'  Jesus was hitting people with a whip. Luke 19:26-27 'I say to you that to everyone who has, more shall be given, but from the one who does not have, even what he does have shall be taken away.  As for my enemies who do not want me to reign over them, bring them here and kill them in my presence' Matthew 10:34-35 "Do not think that I have come to send peace on Earth.  I did not come to send peace, but a sword.  I am sent to set a man against his father, a daughter against her mother, and a daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law" - Your previous interpretation is extra-textual. Gen 4:15 (et al) God is a vengeful God.  Exodus 15:3 (et al) God is a fierce warrior.  Leviticus 26:7-8 (et al) The spirit of God kills people.  Ezra 6:12 God is jealous and furious.  Gal 5:22-23 The fruit of the Spirit of God is peace , love, joy, patience, kindness, faithfulness, gentleness and self-control.   Gen 11:7-9 God himself sows discord.  Proverbs 6:16-19 God hates those who sows discord. Exodus 20:5 - Children should and do suffer for their parent's sins  Deuternonmy 24:16 - Children are not to suffer for their parent's sins. Gen 1:3-5 On the first day, God created light, then separated light and darkness.  Gen 1:14-19 The sun (which separates night and day) wasn't created until the fourth day.  Gen 1:11-12, 26-27 Trees were created before man was created.  Gen 2:4-9 Man was created before trees were created. Gen 1:20-21, 26-27 Birds were created before man was created.  Gen 2:7, 19 Man was created before birds were created. Gen 1:24-27 Animals were created before man was created.  Gen 2:7, 19 Man was created before animals were created. Gen 1:26-27 Man and woman were created at the same time.  Gen 2:7, 21-22 Man was created first, woman sometime later. Gen 10:5 There were many languages before the Tower of Babel  Gen 11:1 There was one language before the Tower of Babel 2 Kings 8:26 Two and twenty years old was Ahaziah when he began to reign.  2 Chronicles 22:2 Forty and two years old was Ahaziah when he began to reign. 2 Samuel 6:23 Therefore Michal the daughter of Saul had no child unto the day of her death   2 Samuel 21:8 But the king took...the five sons of Michal the daughter of Saul. In the N.T. there are two accounts of Jesus' genealogy which are contradictory.:  Matthew 1:1-17   Luke 3:23-38 There are two inconsistent accounts of his death: Luke23:46: And when Jesus had cried with a loud voice, he said, Father, into thy hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up the ghost."   John 19:30  When Jesus therefore had received the vinegar, he said, It is finished: and he bowed his head, and gave up the ghost. I could go on for many pages with more examples of contradictions and justifications for violence in the Bible.  The book is  a serious mess, and really could have used a few talented editors to clean it up.  We also have many outright errors in the bible:   I Kings 7:23-26 -  Pi is equal to three.  Lev 11:20-21 All fowls that creep, going upon all four, shall be an abomination unto you. -Except that birds don't crawl on all fours.  Lev 11:6 "And the hare, because he cheweth the cud..."  more hare chewing cud:  Deut 14:7 "...as the camel, and the hare, and the coney: for they chew the cud, but divide not the hoof."  Matt 13:31-32: "the kingdom of heaven is like to a grain of mustard seed which…is the least of all seeds, but when it is grown is the greatest among herbs and becometh a tree." - there are plenty of seeds smaller than a mustard seed.  Also mustard plants don't grow into trees. You are correct that I misrecalled the details of the Ananias and Sapphira as I was rushing through, and while I have read the N.T. (and have read Mark and John in Greek), it was a while back, so I conflated keeping a few buck for themselves with usury.  I really am afraid that I am not really interested in the Bible these days, so my memory of details is fading. As for generalizing about fundamentalists, would you say that the Christian fundamentalists *are* really understanding the true nature of their religion when they murder doctors, police, bomb buildings?  When you read their writings, and see their hate crimes, do you not find fear, alienation, and anger?  If not, what would you say drives people to murder their fellow men in the name of religion? Your notion that all the tribes that were slaughtered in the O.T. were somehow asking for it, and that the slaughter even their children and animals is utterly abhorrent.  Saying that the murder of children is acceptable due to their parent's transgressions is beyond the pale.
In honor of the latest multi-day, multi-site outage!
You'd probably make Google all do callisthenics in the parking lot too right?
Hmm I would love a US politics filter too. I hope reddit implements some kind of learning filter which demotes the kind of sites I always vote down
could it be true???............
used to love this mag, shame its closing
it begins again........
This is pretty awesome. 
What a total rip off of this one, which has been around for many years, and is much funnier:  http://www.welfarestate.com/map/
Looks pretty cool. There's a princible of user interfaces that suggests as you make something safer, people start using it for more critical tasks, or in a more dangerous manner. In this case, I imagine we're going to end up with people who are blasé around circular saws. That's not to say it's not an improvement.
I don't get it.
7:30 Report Interview - http://www.abc.net.au/7.30/content/2006/s1560216.htm Seven US senators call for AWB ban -  http://www.theage.com.au/news/National/Seven-US-senators-call-for-AWB-ban/2006/02/01/1138590547328.html World's largest consolidated miner BHP Billiton drawn into Iraq oil-for-food inquiry -  http://www.mg.co.za/articlePage.aspx?articleid=263180&amp;area=/breaking_news/breaking_news__business/
"Ten dozen centerfolds laying on top of each other? Shouldn't this have been posted at nsfw.reddit.com?"
I'd try it with my nob for 1 million english pounds.
What gave you that impression?  As far as I cant tell it is just a series of factual statements about what the cartoons are depicting, no?
I propose a test. Bloody up the Reddit alien a bit and see if there is a sudden surge of visitors. Heck, you could even lend him to the SawStop people so they could demonstate. If Reddit alien gets chopped in half, SawStop is a failure, but if he survives, Reddit gets free publicity (albeit Reddit alien may have a few scratches). What's not to like? The hottest table saw on the market vs the hottest alien. Something has to give.
Sorry about the misunderstanding, but it seemed to me that you where coming to your conclusion about Arabs agreeing with this stuff because the Palestinians voted for Hamas. Anyway my mistake.
gerrymandering can be a good: allowing two representatives to represent two different homogenous groups of people with similar political interest is more efficient than having each of those representatives representing more heterogynous groups. however, perhaps if the representatives had to deal with the heterogynous population they could find common solutions more easily.
The Talmud, and Jewish thought, strictly require the saving of life on the Sabbath. (Talmud Shabbos 30A) Your book by Israel Shahak is used as antisemitic propaganda, despite having been written by an embittered Jewish holocaust survivor who blames the holocaust and Israeli politics on the Jewish religion. Of course, you probably have no such excuse for your antisemitism.
I suspect that would be a violation of the terms of the labor agreement after last month's strike.
To those pointers, I would have to add today: Don't just use the default name that Windows gives your computer (L9RDK5000 or somesuch). That is a hideous thing to encounter on a LAN.
You can't be mass murderer and humanist at the same time. And what is Castro doing in that list?
According to you: "Neither Judaism nor Islam has a commandment to "love thy neighbor in their holy texts" I can't speak for Islam, but in Judaism here are two of several. "Love thy neighbor as thyself." - Leviticus 19:18 And as Rabbi Hillel said:  "What is hateful to you, do not do to your fellow: This is the entire Torah, the rest is but an elaboration. Now go and learn it!" (Babelonian Talmud, Shabbos 31A)
Yup, that's what it is - see the website of the Royal Hospital Chelsea: http://www.chelsea-pensioners.co.uk/admissions.asp
Conversely, I don't need an equation to alert me that if I drop the toilet seat half the time when I #1 it, the "Toilet Seat Burden" will be roughly split between my cohabiting girlfriend and I. Also, I enjoy antagonizing the religion apologists and GWB lovers, and the posters here happen to do it with *RELATIVELY* intelligent dialogue. Don't worry, it's an anamoly that I'm sure will end all too soon.
No joke. I used to work at a lumberyard and was nearly run through with a flying piece of wood caught between the fence and the blade. It was a piece of cedar I was ripping. The blade got quite hot, bound just a bit and the 2" wide and 8 foot long strip expelled from the saw with such a speed that I had no clue what happened. I was even looking right at it, but the thing moved so fast I couldn't tell what happened. I found it lying 50' away. It flew nearly perfectly flat for 50', dropping not more than 1" over that distance.  Since objects moving horizontally fall towards the ground at the same speed as objects falling straight down, I'm guessing that for a board to cross 50' and drop 1" it needs to be moving like a motherfuckering tornado shank. My face was but 2' from the board, my hands about 4" from it, when the thing went wooosh.
A [text editor](http://www.pspad.com/) is one of the best problem solving tools around. Or, if you want to get a little more abstract, try [mind mapping](http://freemind.sourceforge.net/wiki/index.php/Screenshots). 
Will it ever be enough? This stuff gets posted all the time. Where does it end? Mac mini inside a Cooper Mini. Mac Mini inside a womb. Mac mini inside a Mac mini. This and that inside something else. Blah.
Or they don't want to answer your question. I do this all the time.
I disagree, in that Islamic countries have *already* had an Enlightenment.  When Europe was going through its Dark Ages, Islam was flourishing and producing great things such as algebra.  The concept of "progress" is not a certainty, it is not inevitable, and we must be careful not to let our own culture slide backwards. You are especially right in that we must introspect on our own society.  The specter of fundamentalism is rising, it's [running our government](http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/2006/02/poor_superman.php), and if we're not careful in the future we'll end up poor, angry, violent, and at the whim of more powerful countries (such as China, from whom we borrow  to cover our massive deficit).
Who cares how fast he/she can read?  Reading (esp. a good book like the one I'm enjoying now: http://store.yahoo.com/doverpublications/0486270777.html).  Screw speed reading!  It is just another example of how the modern world wants us to cram more, more, more into less, less, less time and taking no pleasure in what we do .. just a constant rush to the next thing while the last thing is quickly forgotten.
And how can we forget the greatest arab contribution: fermented beverages. A people that invented algebra surely needed some balance in life.
The problem with the reddit system is the do gooder types that have this idea that you cannot criticize a link. Say anything good about the link, but don't dare say that the link is quite awful.
All those cigars -- lung cancer. Killer.
Man, I posted this 12 hours ago, and got -3 points within a short period of time, so I just said fuck it, and deleted a bunch of my postings including this one. My karma hasn't changed from 1 point ever since I joined. This really sucks. The lack of transparency around points is really starting to frustrate me.
So clever, yet it ignores one factor: John can piss standing or sitting, but if Marsha stands during pissing a mess ensues.  John has the benefit of pissing in multiple positions.
If you’re made of money, you might want to buy more robust hardware than Microtel sells. But the computer does seem to be reasonably sound (I just wouldn’t go dropping it on the floor, banging it with a spatula, or anything like that). If you’re looking for a good entry-level Linux OS and are willing to pay for it ($69.99 — less than Windows, at any rate), Xandros has significant advantages. If you want free, there’s other stuff out there that works fine.
I wonder if I see troll.
It's a little unfair to call sites like delicious a "digg clone", it's more the other way around if anything. Cool list though. Check out digg.de - a total ripoff of digg.com, but they have nothing to do with the actual digg people. Perhaps, I should start reddit.de... ;)
probably north korea
That is one of the smaller snack stations at the googleplex. I got fat as an intern :-(
Actually the Sumerians were the first culture we know of making beer.  They were not ethnic Arabs, though they were in the ancient near east.  FWIW, it is against most schools of Islamic law to drink alcohol, most of the schools that do permit it are in countries that Islam assimilated later, China, Malaysia, etc.
Saw my first motorized couch at Burning Man in 1999 ... old news.  :)
This looks better than digg and reddit. Fair rating of links.
I tried to use this as an argument to keep the names of my servers across Australia back in the '90s.  I had French, Saunders, Abbott &amp; Costello (both politicians in the ruling federal party at the time!  Disappointingly, I think they still are, although I have since departed Oz to escape them) and a bunch of others, all named after comedians (and with the same first letter as the city in which they were based).  I thought it was kinda cool; but it wasn't able to stand up to the Ops manager's desire for convention across all servers in the place. Looking back, I think this is a good example of why RFCs are mixed bag.  For every RFC1918 there is a RFC1149...
I lived within a mile of David Souter's house for 18 years, and can verify that all of the details, save one, about Weare are just about right.
That is the beauty of it. People make like or dislike an article for different reasons, but the good ones will end up voted up.
That is seriously awesome. 280 MPH? Good pilot, too. The thing would be a hell of a lot harder to land than a prop-driven model plane.
This article has reduced something to a singularity -- it's not so much about asking questions, but instead being engaged in learning. That's what you're suggesting. People who are engaged in learning take ownership in the experience. Ensuring they have asked questions to fill in the gaps in their mind is part. That isn't something unique to smart people, but involved learners.
I remember hearing this guy, Carl Zimmer, on This American Life. He discusses some other behavior of parasites during a piece on [the show.](http://www.thislife.org/pages/archives/archive04.html) Look for episode 274.  &gt;Carl Zimmer, author of the book Parasite Rex, talks with Ira about how parasites manage the trick of living inside of us, behind enemy lines, without us finding out. (11 minutes).
I think your claim is *more* difficult to take seriously.  He didn't lie about sexually molesting a woman, he lied about receiving plo chops.  Exactly what you cited.  And then you say that "gnaws at the roots of our democracy," when in fact its at the very most a nibble.  The sexual affairs of our presidents, and the lies they tell about such, has remarkably little impact on the functioning of our government. That is, they have little impact, unless a sex-crazed media and congress spend millions investigating it, for no discernible reason other than as a hatchet job.  Clinton had many faults, Monica was one of the least; his inconsistency regarding Bosnia and Rwanda, and even trifles such as Travel Gate were more important.
Castro has locked away whole populations of people for various reasons.  In the case I'm most familiar with from university, he marched thousands of male and female prostitutes into camps to be "reeducated" after he took power.   Apparently the revolutionaries felt that spending most of your life (many Cuban prostitutes were very young) fellating rich foreigners during the Batista regime caused one to be *unseemly* or *undignified* -- a condition that only years  of forced agricultural labor could cure. Interestingly, "undignified" men were treated much more harshly than "undignified" women.  You'd almost think that all those Good Cuban Marxists thought the men had committed some special *sin* or something. You can draw your own conclusions about whether secular Marxist humanism, or the humanist Catholicism it supplanted (yes, Catholicism is indeed a humanist tradition -- look it up) are workable apologist ideologies for crimes against humanity. Oh, yeah, and if for some reason you think that Castro doesn't deserve to be on the list with Mao (79 million citizens killed) and Stalin (40 million) for killing "only" a few thousand hookers, he's still got a long history of imprisoning journalists, suppressing political dissent (you think anyone disses the state in Cuba?), and confiscating his people's property through engineered currency revaluations.
I can't believe nobody's questioned the premise of this headline yet.  I don't know very many Muslims and none well, but none of the ones I knew were violent.  Taken literally, it's absurd to say that Muslims always, or even usually, resort to violence. Maybe the person who wrote that letter to the editor meant to say something else about the violence that we hear about in the news, but it's unclear to me what they were trying to say or why it's interesting enough to show up on reddit. 
Methinks these gentlemen have a very, to put it simply, odd definition of humanism. These men you speak of - secularists, yes. Humanists? Heck no.
Karma doesn't mean anything. You can submit a thousand stories and still have 1-2 karma. You get like 100+ when your story makes the "hot" page. It's just a pat-me-on-the-back like Digg's front page count.
Also reminiscent of this one: http://www.hansemun.de/images/ronald.jpg 
Well, at this stage it is still a theory, isn't it?  Though of course the political appointee probably meant, theory in the sense of something that contradicts the bible.
BMW.DE was doing "black hat search engine optimization" to try to enhance it's rankings in the search results. Google found out and banned 'em - dropping their PageRank to zero and clobbering 'em in the search results. Strong message to other web sites doing stuff like this.
He's just trying to get traffic to click on the insanely high-paying mesothelioma ads.  The article is poorly written and incomprehensible in places.
Regarding Japan... you're kidding, right?   
They mean India.  You know, programmers.
This is a lot funnier.  It's a map of America itself.  http://www.thepaincomics.com/weekly011010a.htm
Not so good with the geography, huh?
hmm, reality is stranger than fiction. i remember a website that had scanned drawings from american adults who had been asked to draw australia. some were pretty close, most were blobs, a couple looked like the united states, one or two people did an oval with a question mark next to it - no idea.  my friend was in new york, and was chatting to a lady on the street. he mentioned he was from new zealand and asked the lady if she knew where that was. she said 'yeah .. europe somewhere'.  'close, you're close', he replied.
I think she distrusted it despite believing this -- she certainly thought that there were better ways to ensure a positive outcome than through government intervention.
It is irresponsible to post a headline touting, "GOP candidate attacks opponent..." when the story it links to has NO proof that the assertion is true. I'm not saying that I think the GOP candidate didn't do it, only that insinuations are far from definitive.  It is not at all unreasonable to imagine a scenario where a blogger with ties to a candidate becomes over zealous and takes things too far. If one were to do a google search on "guilt by association" and fallacy, one would get many hits.
Actually, the vast majority of the much-lamented bloodshed in the 20th Century was perpetrated by atheists,  nationalists, and racists.  Honestly, have religious fundamentalists come even close to these numbers? * Military Casualties WWI ~8 Million (more than all previous  European wars?)  * Military Casualties in WWII: 25 million * Deaths due to Mao' Great Leap Forward: ~35 million  * Deaths due to Mao's Cultural Revolution/State Terror: ~30 million  * Deaths under Stalin: engineered famine/state terror: 20-40 million  * Polish non-Jews killed by Germans during WWII: ~1.8 million  * Jewish Holocaust Victims: ~6 million  * non-Jewish Holocaust Victims (disabled, homosexual, Jehovah's Witnesses, communists, Slavs, Russian POWs, Roma): ~ 2-6 million  * Civillian deaths in Russia, WWII:  11 million  * Russian Military Casualties, WWII: 10 million  * Civillian deaths in China, WWII: 6 million  * Military deaths in China, WWII: 4 million  * Deaths under Cambodian Communist regime(s): 2 million (extermination of urban population)  * Deaths under Vietnamese Communist regime: 1 million  * Deaths under various Eastern European communist governments: 1 million  * Deaths due to Soviet Aggression in Afghanistan: 1.6 million  * Deaths under North Korean Communist regime: 2 million  * Deaths under Iraqi Baathist regime: 290-500 thousand None of the victims are of any particular religion, unless you count the extermination of Eastern European Jews by Nazis.  But then, I would think that the Nazi campaigns against gypsies, homosexuals, communists, Jehovah's witnesses, Russians, Ukranians, Poles, Slavs, etc. show that the animus against Jews was at least partly racial as opposed to theological. None of the perpetrators of these crimes were of any particular religion, unless you argue that Marxism, Marxism-Leninism, or "Communism" are religions.  Hence, none of these crimes have really been perpetrated by "fundamentalists" -- although they were definitely carried out by fanatics. All of this is a rather roundabout way of saying, when you talk about the United States "using fundamentalism as an ideological tool against ... progressive nationalism and communism", or wax regretful over the many crimes of Christian fundamentalists in the US, or talk up the import of protecting "The West" from Muslim fundamentalists in the Persian Gulf, that we all have to keep these things in the proper perspective. Of course, if you note the relatively small numbers associated with the first two items on the list, you begin to wonder whether all the pap and sentiment we get on TV about "man's inhumanity to man" shouldn't really be phrased "The State's inhumanity to man".  Really -- why not?
